ALBERT R. MANN 
LIBRARY 



New York State Colleges 

OF 

Agriculture and Home Economics 




Cornell University 



Cornell University Library 
B 2823.E5K93 



The science of knowledge, 




3 1924 014 110 682 




Cornell University 
Library 



The original of tliis book is in 
tine Cornell University Library. 

There are no known copyright restrictions in 
the United States on the use of the text. 



http://www.archive.org/details/cu31924014110682 



THE 



Science of Knowledge. 



J. g9 FICHTE. 



<2^ ,,..,§•.<» M.\-c;'- V't'-i'^' *■ 



.),*_. -^1 ^ r' ' 



TRANSLATED FROM THE GERMAN BY A. E. KROEGER. 



PHILADELPHIA: 
J. B. LIPPINCOTT & CO. 

1868. 
J! 



Introductory. 



CONCERNING THE CONCEPTION 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



TRANSLATOR'S PREFACE. 



The object and general conception of the work, herewith 
submitted to the American public, is too^ clearly set forth in 
the Introduction which precedes it to require any additional 
explanation from me. SufiSce it historically to state, thai 
this its object was not achieved in Germany ; and that the 
motive which inspired its translation was the hope that it 
might be achieved in America. Whether success would come 
at once or after many years, I did not choose to speculate 
upon ; but the certainty has always been in my mind, that, 
sooner or later, the science of knowledge will be taught in 
every college and university of the land, as the science of all 
sciences, as the science which will, when once recognized, put 
a stop to those stale and unprofitable metaphysical specula- 
tions, by indulging in which mankind has wasted time and 
energies enough to advance true culture beyond the most 
daring dreams. Not to encourage metaphysical studies, but 
henceforth and forever to silence them, and to lead mankind 
back to true life, has this work been written and translated. ,'' 

A. E. Kroeger. 

St. Louis, December 28, 1866. 



Part First. 



CONCERNING THE CONCEPTION OF THE 
SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE GENERALLY. 

§ 1. HYPOTHETICAL CONCEPTION OF THIS SCIENCE. 

To unite divided parties it is best to proceed 
from the point wherein they agree. Philosophy is 
a science ; in this all descriptions of philosophy are 
as agreed as they are divided in determining the 
object of this science. This division, may it not 
have arisen, because the conception of that sci- 
ence, which they unanimously asserted philosophy 
to be, had not yet been wholly developed ? And 
may not the determination of this one character- 
istic, wherein they all agree, suffice to determine 
the conception of philosophy itself .' A science has 
systematic form. All propositions in it are con- 
nected in one single fundamental proposition or 
principle, and unite with it to form a whole. This 
is universally conceded. But does this character- 
istic exhaust the conception of a science .' 

Supposing somebody were to build up ever so 



12 introduction: 

systematic a natural history of certain spirits of the 
air, on the unproven and unprovable assumption, 
that such creatures exist in the air, with human 
passions, inclinations, and conceptions, should we 
call such a system a science, no matter how closely 
its several parts might be connected with each 
other into a whole ? On the other hand, supposing 
somebody were to utter a single proposition — a me- 
chanic, for instance, the proposition that a pillar 
erected on a horizontal base in a right angle stands 
perpendicular, and will not incline toward either 
side, however far you extend it into infinity — a pro- 
position which he may have heard at some time 
and approved as true in experience : would not all 
men concede that such a person had a scientific 
knowledge of the proposition, although he should 
not be able to evolve the deduction of his proposi- 
tion from the first fundamental principle of geome- 
try ? Now, why do we call the fixed system, which 
rests on an unproven and unprovable first principle, 
no science at all, and why do we assert the know- 
ledge of the mechanic to be science, although it 
does not connect in his reason with a system ? 

Evidently, because the first, in spite of its cor- 
rect form, does not contain any thing that can be 
known ; and because the second, although without 
a correct form, asserts something which is really 
known and can be known. The characteristic of 
science, therefore, seems to consist in the quality 
of its content and the relation thereof to the con- 
sciousness of the person of whom a knowledge is 



INTRODUCTION. 13 

asserted ; and the , systematic form appears to be 
only accidental to the science ; is not the object of 
science, but merely a means to attain that object. ^ 

This may, perhaps, be conceived in the following 
manner. If we suppose that from some reason or 
another the human mind can know only very little, 
and can have of every thing else only opinions, pre- 
sentiments, or arbitrary meanings ; and if we sup- 
pose, moreover, that from some reason or another 
the human mind can not well rest content with 
this limited or uncertain knowledge : then the only 
means of extending and securing that knowledge 
would be to compare all uncertain knowledge with 
the certain knowledge, and to draw conclusions 
from the equality or inequality of both as to the cor- 
rectness or incorrectness of the former. If an un- 
certain knowledge were thus discovered to be equal 
to a certain knowledge, it might be properly as- 
sumed to be also certain ; but if it were discovered 
unequal, it would now be definitely known as false, 
and could no longer deceive. We should be de- 
livered from an error, although we might not have 
gained positive truth. 

I speak plainer. Science is to be one and a 
whole. The proposition that a pillar erected in a 
right angle on a horizontal base occupies a perpen- 
dicular position, is doubtless a whole, and in so far 
a science for a person who has no connected know- 
ledge of geometry. 

But we also consider the whole geometry, which 
contains much more than that one proposition, a 



14 INTRODUCTION. 

science. How then, and by what means do a multi- 
tude of very different propositions unite into one 
science, into one and the same whole ? 

Clearly by this, that the separate propositions 
are not science, but form a science only in the 
whole, and through their connection in the whole. 
But by a composition of parts you can not put 
something into the whole which is not to be found 
in one of the parts. Hence, if none of the con- 
nected propositions had certainty, there would also 
be no certainty in the whole formed by them. One 
of the propositions, at least, therefore, must be 
certain, and this one, perhaps, communicates its 
certainty to the others in this manner : that if the 
one is to be true, then the second must be true, 
etc. Thus a multiplicity of propositioiis would at- 
tain only one certainty, and result in only one sci- 
ence, for the very reason that they all have cer- 
tainty and the same certainty. That one proposi- 
tion which we have just now spoken of as positively 
certain, can not obtain its certainty from its con- 
nection with the others, but must have it before- 
hand ; for by uniting parts you can not produce 
something which is in none of the parts. But all 
other propositions receive their truth from the first 
one. The first one must therefore be certain be- 
fore all connection with the others ; and all the 
i others must receive their certainty only through 
and after the connection. From this it imme- 
diately appears that our above assumption is the 
only correct one, and that in a science there can 



INTROD UCTION. I S 

only be one proposition which is certain before the 
connection with others. For if there were many 
such propositions, they would either be not at all 
connected with the former, and then they would 
not belong with it to the same whole ; or they 
would be thus connected ; but since they are only 
to be connected by one and the same certainty — 
that is, z/'the one theorem is true, then the other 
must be true — they can not have independent cer- 
tainty ; for in that case one proposition might have 
independent certainty, although others had no cer- 
tainty, and hence they would not be connected 
through common certainty. 

Such a proposition, which has certainty before 
and independent of all connection, is z. fundamental 
principle. Every science must have a fundamental ' 
principle ; nay, it might consist of simply such one 
principle, which in that case could not be called 
fundamental, however, since it would not be the 
foundation of others. But a science also can not 
have more than one fundamental principle, for else 
it would result in m.any sciences. 

The other- propositions which a science may con- 
tain get certainty only through their connection 
with the fundamental principle ; and the connec- 
tion, as we have shown, is this : If the proposition 
A is true, then the proposition B is also true ; and 
if B is true, then must C be true, etc. This con- 
nection is called the systematic form of the whole, 
which results from the several component parts. 
Wherefore this connection } Surely not to produce 



16 INTRODUCTION. 

an artistic combination, but in order to give cer- 
tainty to propositions, which have not certainty in 
themselves. And thus the systematic form is not 
the object of science, but an accidence, a means, 
and on the condition that the science is to have a 
manifold of propositions. It is not the essence of 
science, but an accidental quality thereof 

Let science be a building, and let the chief ob- 
ject of this building be firmness. The foundation 
is firm, and as soon as it is laid down, the object 
would therefore be attained. But since you can 
not live on the foundation, nor protect yourself by 
its means against the arbitrary attacks of enemies, 
or the unarbitrary attacks of the weather, you pro- 
ceed to erect walls, and over the walls you build a 
roof All the parts of the building you connect 
with the foundation and with each other, and thus 
the whole gets firmness. But you do not build a 
building in order to connect the parts ; rather you 
connect the parts in order to make the building 
firm ; and it is firm in so far as all its parts rest 
upon a firm foundation. 

The foundation is firm, for it is not built on an- 
other foundation, but rests on the solid earth. But 
whereupon shall we erect the foundation of our sci- 
entific structure ? The fundamental principles of 
our systems must and shall be certain in advance 
of the system. Their certainty can not be proven 
within the system ; but every possible proof in 
the system presupposes already their certainty. 
If they are certain, then of course all their results 



TNTRODUCTION. 17 

are certain ; but from what does their own certainty 
follow f 

And even after we shall have satisfactorily an- 
swered this question, does not a new and quite dif- 
ferent one threaten us ? We are going to draw • 
our conclusions thus : If the fundamental principle 
is certain, then another proposition also is certain. 
How do we get at this then f What is the ground 
of the necessary connection between the two, where- 
by the one is to have the same certainty which be- 
longs to the other ? What are the conditions of 
this connection, and whence do we know that they 
are the conditions and the exclusive conditions and 
the 07ily conditions of this connection ? And how 
do we get at all to assume a necessary connection 
between different propositions, and exclusive but 
exhausted conditions of this connection ? 

In short, how shall the absolute certainty of the 
fundamental principle, and how shall the authority 
to draw from, it conclusions as to the certainty of 
other propositions, be demonstrated ? That which 
the fundamental principle is to have itself and to 
communicate to all other propositions which occur 
in the science, I call the inner content of the funda- 
mental principle and of science generally ; the man- 
ner in which it communicates this certainty to other 
propositions I call \heform of science. The ques- 
tion is, therefore. How are form and content of a 
science possible .' or how is science itself possible .' 

That which would give an a'swer to this ques- 
2* 



1 8 INTRODUt TION: 

tion would be itself a science, and would be, more- 
over, the science of science generally. 

It is impossible to determine in advance of the 
investigation whether such an answer is possible or 
not ; that is, whether our whole knowledge has a 
cognizable, firm basis, or whether it rests, after all 
-^however closely its separate parts may be con- 
nected — upon nothing, that is to say, upon nothing \ 
for us. But if our knowledge is to have a basis 
for us, then such an answer must be possible, and 
there must be a science which gives this answer. 
Aixd if there is such a science, then our knowledge 
has a cognizable ground. Hence, in advance of the 
investigation, it is impossible to say whether our 
knowledge has a basis or has no basis at all ; and 
the possibility of the science in question can only 
be demonstrated by its actual realization. 

The naming of such a science, whereof the very 
possibility is as yet problematical, is altogether ar- 
bitrary. Still, if it should appear that all the terri- 
tory hitherto considered useful for the cultivation 
of sciences has already been appropriated, and that 
only one piece of uncultivated land has been left 
vacant for the science of all other sciences ; and if, 
moreover, it should appear that under a well-known 
name — the name of Philosophy — the idea of a sci- 
ence exists which pretends to be, or wishes to be, 
also a science, and is only in doubt where to settle 
down ; then it might not be improper to assign this 
science to the empty and uncultivated place. Wheth- 
er the word Philosophy has hitherto signified pre- 



INTRODUCTION. I9 

cisely that very same object is immaterial ; and, 
moreover, if this science should really thus turn out 
to be a science, it would doubtless very justly dis- 
card a name which it has hitherto borne from a 
surely not over great modesty, namely, that of a 
Dilettanteism. The nation which shall discover this 
science is well worthy of giving it a name from its 
own language, and might name it simply Science, 
or the Science of Knowledge. What has been here- 
tofore called philosophy would thus be the science of 
science generally. 

§ 2. — ^EXPLANATION OF THE CONCEPTION OF THE 
SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

It is not allowable to draw conclusions from defi- 
nitions. This rule signifies : from the fact that it 
is possible to think a certain characteristic in the 
description of a thing, which thing exists altogether 
independently of such a description, it is not allow- 
able to conclude that this characteristic is therefore 
really discoverable in the thing ; or, when we produce 
a thing after a conception formed of it, which con- 
ception expresses the purposes of the thing, it is 
not allowable to conclude from the thinkability of 
the purpose that it is actually realized. On no ac- 
count, however, can the above rule signify that we 
must have no well-defined purpose in our bodily or 
mental labors, but must leave it to our fancy or to 
our fingers what the result of our labor shall be. 
The inventor of the aerostatic balls was perfectly 



20 INTRODUCTION. 

warranted in calculating the relation of the gas in 
the balls to the weight of the atmosphere, and 
thus to discover the velocity of movement of his 
machine, although he did not know yet whether he 
would ever be able to discover a gas sufficiently 
lighter than air ; and Archimedes was able to cal- 
culate the machine by which he could move the 
globe out of its place, although he knew well 
enough that he could find no place beyond the at- 
traction of the earth from which to operate with his 
machine. Thus, also, with our science of know- 
ledge. It is not as such something which exists in- 
dependent of us, but rather something which must 
first be produced by the freedom of our mind, work- 
ing in a certain direction, that is, if there is such a 
freedom, which, of course, can also not be known as 
yet. Let us determine this direction in advance, 
and obtain a clear conception of what is to be our 
work. Whether we can produce it or not will ap- 
pear from the fact whether we do produce it, but 
this is not yet our purpose. We at present merely 
wish to see what it really is we intend to do. 

1st. First of all, the described science is to be a 
science of science generally. Every possible science 
has one fundamental principle, which can not be 
proven in it, but must be certain in advance of it. 
But where, then, is this first principle to be proven } 
Evidently in that science which is to be the ground 
of all possible sciences. In this respect the science 
of knowledge would have a twofold object : Firstly, 
to show the possibility of fundamental principles 



INTRODUCTION. 21 

generally ; to show how, to what extent, ana under 
what conditions, and perhaps in what degree some- 
thing can be certain, and indeed to show what it 
really means to be certain ; and, secondly, to prove 
particularly the fundamental principles of all possi- 
ble sciences, which can not be proven in those 
sciences themselves. 

Every science, which is to be a whole of compo- 
nent parts, has a systematic form. This form — the 
condition of the connection of the deduced propo- 
sitions with the fundamental principle, and the 
ground which justifies us in drawing conclusions 
from this connection, that the deduced propositions 
have necessarily the same certainty which pertains 
to the fundamental principle — can also, like the truth 
of the fundamental principle, not be demonstrated 
in the particular science itself, but is presupposed 
as the possibility of its form. Hence, a general ' 
science of knowledge must, moreover, show up the 
ground for the systematic form of all possible sci- 
ences. 

2d. The science of knowledge is itself a science. 
Hence it must also have ont. fundamental principle, 
which can not be proven in it, but must be presup- 
posed for its very possibility as a science. But this 
fundamental principle can not be proven in another 
higher science, since otherwise this other higher 
science would be the science pf knowledge. This ^ 
fundamental principle of the science of knowledge, 
and hence of all sciences and of all knowledge, is, 
therefore, absolutely not to be proven ; that is, it 



22 INTRODUCTION. 

can not be deduced from a higher principle, the re- 
lation to which might demonstrate its certainty. 

f Since, nevertheless, it is to be the basis of all cer- 
tainty, it must be certain in itself, through itself, 
and for the sake of itself. All other propositions 
will be certain, because it can be shown that they 
are in some respect related to it, but this one must 
be certain merely because it is related to itself All 
other propositions will only have a mediated cer- 
tainty derived from it, but itself must have imme- 
ate certainty. Upon it all knowledge is grounded, 
without it no knowledge were indeed possible ; but 
itself has its ground in no other knowledge, being, 
on the contrary, itself the ground of all knowledge. 

■^This fundamental principle is absolutely certain ; 
that is, it is certain because it is certain. You can 
not inquire after its ground without contradiction. 
It is the ground of all certainty ; that is, every thing 
which is certain is certain, because this fundamental 
principle is certain, and nothing is certain if it is 
not certain. It is the ground of all knowledge ; 
that is, you know what it asserts, simply because 

, you know any thing at all ; you know it immediate- 
ly when you know any thing at all. It accompanies 
aU knowledge, is contained in all knowledge, and is 

1 presupposed by all knowledge. The science of 
knowledge, in so far as it is a science, and is to con- 
sist of more than its fundamental principle — which 
seems necessary, since it is to furnish the funda- 
mental principles of all sciences — must have a sys- 
tematic form. It is evident that it can not derive 



Introduction. 23 

this form, either in regard to its detenninateness or 
in regard to its validity, from any other science, 
since itself is to furnish all other sciences their sys- 
tematic form. Hence, the science of knowledge 
must contain this form within itself, and must it- 
self show up the ground of this form. Let us con- 
sider this a little, and it will directly appear what 
this assertion means. That whereof any thing is 
known we will, in the mean while, call the content, 
and that which is known thereof ih.Q.forni of a prop- 
osition. (In the proposition, gold is a body ; that 
whereof is known is gold and the body ; that which 
is known of them is, that they are in a certain re- 
spect equal, and might in so far replace each other. 
It is an affirmative proposition, and this relation is 
its form.) 

No proposition is possible without content or 
without form. It must contain something whereof 
we know, and something which is known thereof. 
Hence, the first principle of the science of know- , 
ledge must have both content and form. Now, this * 
first principle is to be immediately and of itself cer- 
tain, and this can only signify: its content must>/ 
determine its form, and its form its content. Its 
form can only fit its content, and its content can 
only fit its form ; every other form connected with 
that content, or every other content connected with 
that form, would cancel that principle itself, and thus 
annihilate all knowledge. Hence, the form of the 
absolute first principle of the science of knowledge 
is not only contained in that principle itself, but is 



24 INTRODUCTION. 

also presented as absolutely valid for the content of 
that principle. Again : if there should be, besides 
this absolute first principle, still other fundamental 
principles of the science of knowledge — which in 
that case can only be partly absolute, and must be 
partly derived from the first principle, since other- 
wise in the first case they would not be fundamen- 
tal principles, and in the latter case not connected 
with the first and highest principle — then the abso- 
lute part of these other fundamental principles could 
only be either the content or the form ; and, like- 
wise, the conditioned or derived part of these prin- 
ciples could only be either the content or the form. 
If the content of these other fundamental principles 
be their absolute or unconditioned part, then the 
absolute first principle of the science of knowledge 
must condition the form of those contents ; or if 
the form of those other principles be the uncondi- 
tioned part, then their content must be conditioned 
by the first principle of the science of knowledge ; 
and thus indirectly also their form, that is, in so fai 
as the form is to be form of the content. In either 
case, therefore, the form would be determined by 
the first absolute principle of the science of know- 
ledge. And since it is impossible that there should 
be a fundamental principle not determined either in 
form or in content by the first absolute principle, 
(that is, if we are to have a science of knowledge at 
all;) it follows that there can only be three funda- 
mental principles : one absolutely in and through 
itself determined both in form and in content ; a 



INTRODUCTION. 25 

second one determined through itself in form ; and 
a third one determined through itself in content. 
If there are still other propositions in the science 
of knowledge, they must be determined both in re- 
gard to form and content by the fundamental prin- 
ciple. Hence, a science of knowledge must deter- 
mine the form of all its propositions, in so far as 
they are separately considered. But such a deter- 
mination of the separate propositions is only thus 
possible : that they reciprocally determine each 
other. But each proposition must be perfectly de- 
termined, that is, its form must suit only its and no 
other content, and its content must only suit its and 
no other form ; for else such a proposition would not 
be equal to the first principle, in so far as that first 
principle is certain, and hence would not be certain. 
If, nevertheless, all the propositions of a science 
of knowledge are to be different, which they must 
be if they are to be many propositions and not one 
proposition, then no proposition can obtain its com- 
plete determination otherwise than through a single 
one of all propositions. And thus the whole series 
of propositions becomes determined, and no proposi- 
tion can occupy another place in the system than that 
which it occupies. Each proposition in the science 
of knowledge has its position determined by a de- 
termined other proposition, and on its part deter- 
mines the position of a determined third proposi- l 
tion. Hence, the science of knowledge estabHshes ■ 
itself the form of its whole for itself 

This form of the science of knowledge is neces- 
3 



26 INTRODUCTION. 

sarily valid for its content. For if the absolute first 
principle was immediately certain, that is, if its 
form was fit only for its content, and its content 
only for its form, and if through this first principle 
all possible subsequent propositions are determined, 
immediately or mediately, in form or content ; if 
all subsequent theorems, in other words, are, as it 
were, contained already in the first one, then it fol- 
lows that what holds good for the first must also 
hold good in regard to the others ; that is, that 
their form is only fit for their content, and their 
content only for their form. It is true, this relates 
only to the separate propositions ; but the form of 
the whole is nothing but the form of the separate 
propositions, thought in one ; and what is valid for 
each separate must be valid for all, thought as one. 
But the science of knowledge is to give not only 
itself its own form, but is also to give all other pos- 
sible sciences their form ; and is to make certain the 
validity of this form for all other sciences. This 
can only be thought possible on condition that 
every thing which is to be a proposition of any 
other science must be already involved in some 
proposition of the science of knowledge, and hence 
must have obtained its proper form already in that 
science. This opens to us an easy way of getting 
back to the content of the absolute first principle 
of the science of knowledge, of which we can now 
say something more than was possible before. If 
we assume for the present that to be certain means 
simply to have an insight into the inseparability 



INTRODUCTION. 27 

of a determined content from a determined form, 
(which is to be only a definition of a name, since a 
real definition of knowledge is simply impossible,) 
then we might understand already to some extent 
how the fact that the fundamental principle of all 
knowledge determines its form only through its 
content, and its content only through its form, 
could determine the form of all the content of 
knowledge ; that is to say, if all possible content 
were contained in the content of that first prin- 
ciple. If, therefore, there is to be an absolute first ' 
principle of all knowledge, this assumption must be 
correct ; that is, the content of this first principle 
must contain all other possible content, but must 
itself be contained in no other content. In short,,, 
it must be the absolute content. 

It is easy to remember that, in presupposing the 
possibility of a science of -knowledge, and partic- 
ularly of its first principle, we always presuppose v 
that there is really a system in human knowledge. 
If such a system, however, is to be in it, it can be 
shown — even apart from our description of the sci- 
ence of knowledge — that there must be such an ab- 
solute first principle. If there is not to be any' 
such system, two cases only are possible. Either 
there is no immediate certainty at all, and then 
our knowledge forms many series or one infinite 
series, wherein each theorem is derived from a higher 
one, and this again from a higher one, etc., etc. 
We build our houses on the earth, the earth rests 
on an elephant, the elephant on a tortoise, the tor- 



28 INTRODUCTION. 

toise again — who knows on what ? — and so on ad 
i?tfimtum. True, if our knowledge is thus con- 
stituted, we can not alter it ; but neither have we, 
then, any firm knowledge. We may have gone 
back to a certain link of our series, and have found 
every thing firm up to this link ; but who can guar- 
antee us that, if we go further back, we may not 
find it ungrounded, and shall thus have to abandon 
it ? Our certainty is only assumed, and we can 
never be sure of it for a single following day. 

Or the second case : Our knowledge consists of 
finite series, but of many finite series, each series 
ending in a fundamental principle, which has its 
ground in no other one, but only in itself; all 
these fundamental principles having no connection 
among each other, and being perfectly independent 
and isolated. In this case there are, perhaps, sev- 
eral inborn truths in us, all more or less inborn, 
and in the connection of which we can expect no 
further insight, since it lies beyond these inborn 
truths ; or there is, perhaps, a manifold simple in 
the things outside of us, which is communicated to 
us by means of the impression produced upon us 
by the things, but into the connection whereof we 
can not penetrate, since there can not be any thing 
more simple than the simplest in the impression. 
If this second case is the truth, if human know- 
ledge is in itself such a piecework — as the real 
knowledge of so many men unhappily is — if origin- 
ally a number of threads lie in our minds, which 
are or can be connected with each other in no 



tntroduction: 29 

point, then again we may not be able to alter this 
state of things, and our knowledge is, as far as it 
extends, certain enough ; but it is no unit, it is a 
manifold knowledge. Our building stands firm, 
but, instead of being a connected structure, it is an 
aggregate of chambers, from none of which we can 
enter the other ; a building wherein we always get 
lost, and never feel ourselves at home. There is 
no light in it ; and in spite of our riches we always 
remain poor, because we can never calculate them, 
never consider them as a whole, and hence never 
know what we really- possess ; we can never use 
part of it to improve the rest, because no part is 
relatable to the rest. Nay, more : our knowledge 
will never be completed ; we must expect every 
day that a new inborn truth may manifest itself in 
us, or that experience may furnish us with a new 
simple. We must always be prepared to build a 
new house for ourselves. No general science of 
knowledge will be possible as containing the 
ground of other sciences. Each will be grounded 
in itself There will . be as many sciences as there 
are separate immediately certain propositions. But 
if neither the first case is to be correct, namely, 
that there are one or more mere fragments of a 
system, nor the second, that there are to be a 
manifold of systems, then a highest and absolute 
first fundamental principle must exist as the basis 
of a complete and unit-system in the human mind. 
From this first principle our knowledge may ex- 
pand into ever so many series, each of which again 
may expand into series, etc., still all of them must 



30 introduction: 

rest firm upon one single link, which is not de- 
pendent upon another one, which holds itself and 
the whole system by virtue of its own power. In 
this link we shall possess a globe, holding itself 
firm by virtue of its own gravitation, the central 
point whereof attracts with almighty force whatso- 
ever we have but erected upon its surface and per- 
pendicularly, and not in the air or obliquely, and 
which allows no grain of dust to be torn away from 
its sphere of power. 

Whether such a system and its condition, a first 
principle, exist, can not be decided in advance of 
the investigation. This fundamental principle can 
neither be proven as mere principle, nor as the 
basis of all knowledge. Every thing depends upon 
the attempt. If we shall find a proposition which 
has the internal conditions of the fundamental prin- 
ciple of all human knowledge, we shall try to dis- 
cover whether it has also its external conditions, 
whether every thing we know or believe to know 
can be traced back to it. If we succeed in this, we 
shall have proven by the r ealiza tion of the SGig.iice 
of knowledge that it is possible, and that there is a 
system of human knowledge, whereof it is the rep- 
resentation. If we do not succeed in this, there 
either is no such system or we have merely failed 
in discovering it, and -must leave the discovery to 
more fortunate successors. To maintain that there 
is no such system merely because we'ha.ve failed to 
discover it would be an assumption, the refutation 
whereof is beneath the dignity of earnest investiga- 
tion. 



Part Second. 



§ 3. DEVELOPMENT OF THE CONCEPTION OF THE 

SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

To develop a conception scientifically is to assign 
to it its place in the system of human sciences gen- 
erally, that is, to show what conception determines 
its position in the system, and of which conception 
it determines the position. But the conception of 
the science of knowledge generally, as well as of 
knowledge generally, can evidently have no position 
in the system of all sciences, since it is itself rather 
the place for all scientific conceptions, and assigns 
to all their positions in itself and through itself It ' 
is clear, therefore, that we can speak here only of a 
hypothetical development ; that is, the question is. 
If we assume that there are sciences, and that there 
is truth in them, (which can not be known in ad- 
vance of the science of knowledge,) how is the 
science of knowledge related to these sciences ? 

This question also is answered by the mere con- 
ception of that science. The latter sciences are 
related to it as the grounded is to its ground ; they 



$2 INTRODUCTION. 

do not assign to it its place, but it assigns to them 
their places in itself and through itself. All we 
can, therefore, propose to ourselves here is a further 
explanation of this answer. 

1. The science of knowledge is to be a science 
of all sciences. Here arises the question : How 
can the science of knowledge guarantee that it has 
furnished the ground, not only of all as yet discov- 
ered and known, but also of all discoverable and 
knowable sciences, and that it has completely ex- 
hausted the whole field of human knowledge } 

2. As the science of all sciences, the science of 
knowledge is to furnish to all sciences their funda- 
mental principles. Hence, all propositions, which 
are fundamental principles of the particular sci- 
ences, are at the same time inherent propositions 
of the science of knowledge ; and thus one and the 
same propositions may be regarded both as a pro- 
position of the science of knowledge, and as the 
fundamental principle of a particular science. The 
science of knowledge evolves from the same propo- 
sition further deductions ; and the particular science 
whereof it is the fundamental principle also evolves 
from it further deductions. Hence, either the de- 
ductions of both sciences are the same — and then 
thore is no such a thing as a particular science — or 
both sciences have a distinct and peculiar mode of 
deduction ; and this is impossible, because the 
science of knowledge is to furnish the form of all 
sciences ; or something is added to a proposition of 
the science of knowledge, which something must, 



INTRODUCTION. 33 

of course, be derived from the same science, where- 
by it becomes fundamental principle of a particular 
science. Here the question arises : What is this 
which is added ? or, since this additional is to frame 
the distinction, what is the definite boundary be- 
tween the general science of knowledge and every 
particular science ? 

3. Again, the science of knowledge is to deter- 
mine the form of all sciences. How this can be 
done we have shown above. But another science, 
under the name of logic, pretends to have this same 
object. Sentence must be passed upon the claims 
of both sciences, that is, it must be decided how the 
science of knowledge is related to logic. 

4. The science of knowledge is itself a science. 
What it is to accomplish as such we have shown 
above. But in so far as it is a mere science, a 
knowledge, in ' the formal significance of the word, 
it is a science of a something ; it has an object, and 
it is clear from the above that this object can be 
no other than the system of human knowledge gen- 
erally. The question arises : How is the science 
of knowledge, as science, related to its object as 
such ? 

§ 4. IN HOW FAR CAN THE SCIENCE OF KNOW- 
LEDGE BE SURE OF HAVING EXHAUSTED HUMAN 
KNOWLEDGE GENERALLY } 

The hitherto true or imaginary human knowledge 
is not human knowledge generally ; and, though a 



34 INTRODUCTION. 

philosopher had really exhausted the former, and 
shown by a perfect induction that it were contained 
in his system, he would yet by no means have sat- 
isfied the task imposed upon philosophy ; for how 
could he prove by his induction from present expe- 
rience that in the future some discovery might not 
be made which would not fit into his system ? 

Quite as unsatisfactory would be the excuse that 
he only intended to exhaust the knowledge pos- 
sible in the present sphere of human existence ; for 
if his philosophy is only valid for this sphere, he 
clearly confesses that he knows no possible other 
sphere, and hence, also, not the limits of that sphere 
which his philosophy claims to exhaust. Hence, he 
has arbitrarily drawn a limit, the validity whereof 
he can only prove by past experience, and which 
may, therefore, be contradicted by any possible future 
experience even within his own posited sphere. 
Human knowledge generally is to be exhausted, 
signifies : it is to be absolutely and unconditionally 
determined what man can know not only on the 
present stage, but on all possible and conceivable 
stages of his existence. 

This is only possible if it can be shown, firstly, 
that the accepted fundamental principle is exhaust- 
ed ; and, secondly, that no other fundamental prin- 
ciple is possible than the accepted one; A funda- 
mental principle is exhausted when a complete 
system has been erected upon it, that is, when that 
fundamental principle necessarily leads to all the 
propositions deduced from it, and when, again, all 



INTRODUCTION. 35 

deduced propositions necessarily lead back to it. 
When no proposition occurs in the whole system 
which could be true if the fundamental principle 
were false, or false if the fundamental principle were 
true ; then this is the negative proof that no super- 
fluous proposition has been accepted in the system ; 
for the superfluous one, which did not belong to the 
system, might be true though the fundarriental 
principle were false, or false though the latter were 
true. When the fundamental principle is given, all 
propositions must be given. Each particular one 
is given in and through the fundamental principle. 
This connection of the separate propositions of the ^ 
science of knowledge proves that the science has 
the required negative proof in and through itself. 
This negative proof shows that the science is sys- 
tematic, that all its parts are connected in a single 
fundamental principle. 

Again, the science is a system, or is completed, " 
if no further proposition can be deduced ; and this 
furnishes the positive proof that all the propositions 
of the system have been admitted. Still, of this -^ 
there must be other evidence ; for the mere relative 
and negative assertion, / do not see what other 
deductions might be made, is not sufficient. Some 
one else might arise hereafter, and see what I did 
not see. We need, therefore, a positive proof that 4 
no other propositions could possibly follow, and this 
proof can only arise if the same fundamental prin- 
ciple from which we started shall also show itself 
to be the final result ; since, then, we could not pro- 



36 INTRODUCTION. 

ceed without describing the same circle we should 
have already drawn. When the time comes to rep- 
resent this science, it will be shown, also, that it 
really describes this circle, leaving the student pre- 
cisely at the point from which it started, and thus 
furnishing also the second positive proof in and 
through itself. * But although the fundamental 
principle be exhausted and a complete system 
erected upon it, it does not follow that thereby hu- 
man knowledge generally is exhausted, unless we 
presuppose what ought first to be proven, namely, 
that this fundamental principle is the fundamental 
principle of human knowledge generally. Of course, 
nothing can be added or taken away from the com- 
pleted system which has been erected ; but why 
might not the future, through augmented expe- 
rience, cause propositions to arise in human consci- 
ousness which can not be grounded upon that fun- 
damental principle, and which, therefore, presup- 
pose one or more other fundamental principles ? 
In short, why could not one or more other systems 
coexist in the human mind with the first one .? To 
be sure, they would be neither connected with the 
first one nor with each other in any common point ; 
but neither is this required, if they are to form many 

* The science of knowledge has absolute totality. In it one leads 
to all, and all to one. But it is also the only science which can be 
completed. Completion is, therefore, its distinguishing character- 
istic. AH other sciences are infinite, and can not be completed, for 
they do not return to their fundamental principles. This the science 
of knowledge has to prove for all other sciences, and show up the 
ground of it 



INTRODUCTION. 37 

systems. Hence, if the impossibility of new dis- 
coveries is to be satisfactorily proven, it must be 
shown that only one system, can be in human know- 
ledge. Now, since the proposition that all human 
knowledge results only in one in itself connected 
knowledge — is itself to be a component of human 
knowledge — it can not be grounded upon any other 
principle than the one assumed as the fundamental 
principle of all human knowledge, and can only be 
proven by it. By this we have gained, at least for 
the present, so much that we see how such a future 
proposition as we supposed might possibly arise in 
consciousness would not only be another one, dif- 
ferent from the fundamental principle of our sys- 
tem, but would also be contradictory of the latter 
in form. For, according to all we have said, the 
fundamental principle of our system must involve 
the proposition that there is a unit-system in hu- 
man knowledge. Every proposition, therefore, which 
is not to belong to this system must not only be a 
different system, but must be a direct contradiction 
of it, in so far as the former system asserts itself 
to be the only possible one. It must be a contra- 
diction of the deduced proposition of the unity of 
the system ; and, since all its propositions are in- 
separably connected, of each single theorem, and 
particularly of the fundamental principle thereof 
Hence, it would have to rest on a fundamental 
principle directly opposed to the first fundamental 
principle. If, for instance, the first fundamental 



38 INTRODUCTION. 

principle shoiild turn out to be : I am I ; this 
second one would have to be : I am not I. 

Now, it would be wrong to conclude from this 
contradiction the impossibility of such a second 
fundamental principle. If the first fundamental 
principle involves the proposition that the system 
of human knowledge is a unit, it involves also, it is 
true, that nothing must contradict this system. But 
both these propositions are merely deductions from 
the first fundamental principle, and hence, by ac- 
cepting the absolute validity of the deductions, we 
already assume that itself is the absolute first and 
only fundamental principle of human knowledge. 
Here, therefore, is a circle which the human mind 
can never get out of ; and it is well to confess this 
circle plainly, lest its unexpected discovery at some 
time might confound men. This circle is as fol- 
lows : If the proposition X is the first, highest, and 
absolute fundamental principle of human know- 
ledge, then there is in human knowledge a unit- 
system, for the latter is the result of the proposition 
X. Now, since there is to be in human knowledge 
a unit-system, the proposition X, which really does 
establish such a system, is the fundamental princi- 
ple of human knowledge, and the system based 
upon it is that unit-system of human knowledge. 

It is unnecessary to be surprised at this circle. 
For to demand that it should be annihilated is to 
demand that human knowledge should be utterly 
groundless, that there should be no absolute cer- 
tainty, and that all human knowledge should be 



INTRODUCTION. 39 

only conditioned ; in short, it is to assert that there 
is no immediate truth at all, but only mediated truth, 
and this without any thing whereby it is mediated. 
Whosoever feels thereunto inclined may investi- 
gate as much as he pleases what he would know 
if his Ego were not Ego ; that is, if he did not exist, 
and if he could not distinguish a Non-Ego from 
his Ego. 

§ 5. WHAT IS THE LIMIT WHICH SEPARATES THE 

SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE FROM THE PARTICULAR 
SCIENCES ? 

We discovered above (§ 3) that one and the 
same proposition could not be in the same respect 
a proposition of the science of knowledge and of a 
particular science ; and that to be the latter, it 
would be necessary to have something added to it. 
This character which is to be added can only be 
derived from the science of knowledge, since it 
contains all possible human knowledge ; but can 
not, as is evident, be contained in that science in 
the same proposition which is to become funda- 
mental principle of the particular science. Hence, 
it must be, perhaps, contained in another separate 
proposition of the science of knowledge, which is 
connected with the proposition which is to become 
the fundamental principle of a particular science. 
Since we have here to meet an objection which 
does not arise from the conception of the science 
of knowledge itself, but merely from the presuppo- 



4° INTRODUCTION. 

sition that there exist also other separate sciences, 
we can meet it also only by a presupposition, and 
shall have done enough for the present if we but 
show a possibility of the required limitation. That 
it will be the true limitation — although it may, 
nevertheless, turn out so — we neither care nor need 
to prove here. 

Let it be, therefore, assumed that the science of 
knowledge contains those determined acts of the 
human mind which it — be it conditioned or uncon- 
ditioned — enacts necessarily and under compul- 
sion ; but that it posits at the same time, as the 
highest explanatory ground of those necessary acts, 
a power to determine itself, (absolutely and without 
compulsion or necessity :) to act generally. Under 
this assumption the science of knowledge will re- 
sult in a necessary and a not necessary or free act- 
ing. The acts of the human mind, in so far as it 
acts necessarily, will be determined by the science, 
but not in so far as it acts free. 

Let it be further assumed that the free acts also 
are to be determined from some reason or another ; 
then this determination can not occur in the science 
of knowledge. But since it is a determining, it 
must occur in sciences ; hence in particular sciences. 
The object of these free acts can be no other than 
the necessary, furnished by the science of know- 
ledge, since it furnishes every thing and since it 
furnishes only the necessary. Hence, in the fun- 
damental principle of a particular science, an act 
which the science of knowledge left free would be 



INTRODUCTION. 4 1 

determined. The science of knowledge would thus 
give to the act, that is, to the fundamental prin- 
ciple, firstly, its necessary character, and, secondly, 
freedom generally ; but the particular science would 
give that freedom its determination ; and thus the 
sharply drawn line of limitation would have been 
discovered. As soon as an in itself free act receives 
a determined direction, we leave the field of the 
science of knowledge generally, and enter the field 
of a particular science. 

I shall illustrate this by two examples : 
The science of knowledge furnishes, as necessary, 
space, and, as absolute limit, the point ; but it leaves 
imagination perfectly free to posit the point wher- 
ever it chooses. As soon as this freedom is de- 
termined, for example, to move the point against 
the limit of the unlimited space, and thus to draw a 
line,* we are no longer on the field of the science 
of knowledge, but on the field of a particular science, 
which is called geometry. The general problem, 
to limit space in accordance with a rule, or the con- 

* A question for mathematicians. Does not the conception of a 
line involve already the conception of straightness ? Are there 
other lines than straight ones .' And is the so-called curved line 
any thing but a combination of infinitely many and infinitely close 
connected points ? The origin of the curved line as the line of lim- 
itation of the infinite space (from the Ego as central point an in- 
finite manifold of infinite radii are drawn, to which our limited im- 
agination posits an end-point, and these end-points, when thought 
as one, are the original line of the circle) seems to guarantee this ; 
and from this it becomes clear that and iiDhy the problem of mea- 
suring it by a straight line is an infinite problem. It also appears 
from this why the straight line can not be defined. 

4* 



42 INTRODUCTION. 

struction in space, is fundamental principle of geom- 
etry, which science is thus clearly divided from the 
science of knowledge. Again : the science of 
knowledge furnishes as necessary a nature which, 
in its being and determinations, i-s to be considered 
as independent of us ; and also furnishes as neces- 
sary the laws, according to which nature is to be 
and must be observed.* But our power of judg- 
ment retains its full freedom to apply these laws or 
not, or to apply whatever law it chooses to any pos- 
sible object ; (for instance, to regard the human 
body as inorganic, or as organic, or as living mat- 
ter.) But as soon as the power of judgment is re- 
quired to observe a determined object by a deter- 
mined law, (for instance, whether animal life can be 
explained from the mere inorganic ; whether crys- 
tallization be the transition from chemical connec- 
tions to organization ; whether magnetic and elec- 



* Curious as it may appear to many explorers of nature, it will 
nevertheless show itself to be the strict truth, that they themselves 
first put the laws into nature which they believe to have learned 
from her, and that the smallest as well as the most extensive law 
the structure of a leaf of grass as well as the motion of the heavenly 
bodies, can be deduced in advance of all observation from the fun- 
damental principle of all human knowledge. It is true that no law 
of nature, and indeed no law whatever, arises to our cotisciousness, 
unless an object is given to which it can be applied ; it is true that 
not all objects necessarily, and not all objects in the same degree, 
must or can agree with the laws; but for that very reason is it 
true that we do not learn them from observation, but posit them as 
the ground of all observation, and that they are not sd much laws 
of independent nature as laws for ourselves how we have to ob- 
serve nature. 



INTKODVCTION. 43 

trie powers are the same or not, etc.,) then it is no 
longer free, but obeys a rule ; and hence we are no 
longer in the science of knowledge, but on the field 
of another science, which is called the science of 
nature. The general rule, to subsume every ob- 
ject of experience under a given law of nature in 
our mind, is fundamental principle of the science 
of nature. That science consists throughout of ex- 
periments, (not of a passive reception of the lawless 
influences of nature upon us,) which are arbitrarily 
undertaken, and with which nature may correspond 
or not ; and by this characteristic the science of 
nature is abundantly separated from the science of 
knowledge. 

Here, therefore, is already clearly seen why only 
the science of knowledge can have absolute totality, 
and why all particular sciences must be infinite. 
The science of knowledge contains only the neces- 
sary ; if this is necessary in every respect, it is 
necessary also in respect to quantity, that is, it is 
necessarily limited. All other sciences are based 
upon freedom, freedom of our mind as well as of 
the absolutely independent nature. If this is to be 
truly freedom, subject to no law, it is impossible to 
prescribe for them a limited sphere, since this could 
only be done by a law. Hence, their spheres are 
infinite. Let no one, therefore, apprehend danger 
from an exhaustive science of knowledge for the 
infinite perfectibility of the human mind ; on the 
contrary, instead of canceling that infinite perfecti- 
bility, the science of knowledge rather secures it 



44 INTRODUCTION. 

against all doubt, and assigns to it a problem which 
can not be completed in all eternity. 

§ 6. HOW IS THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE RE- 
LATED TO LOGIC ? 

The science of knowledge is to determine the 
form for all possible sciences. According to cur- 
rent opinion, in which there may be something 
true, logic does the very same thing. How are 
these two sciences related to each other, par,ticu- 
larly in respect to this problem, which each claims 
to solve ? 

By remembering that logic only pretends to de- 
termine the form of all possible sciences, whereas 
the science of knowledge is also to determine their 
content, an easy way is discovered to enter into 
this important investigation. In the science of 
knowledge the form is never separated from the 
content, nor the content from the form. In each 
of its propositions both form and content are insep- 
arably united. If the propositions of logic are 
therefore to contain merely the form of possible 
sciences, they are not propositions of the science 
of knowledge ; and hence the whole science of logic 
is not science of knowledge, nor even part of it. 
Curious as it may sound at the present state of 
philosophy, the science of logic is no philosophical 
science at all, but a peculiar, separate science ; a 
fact, however, which is not to disparage the dignity 
of that science. 



INTRODUCTION. 45 

If the science of logic is such a separate science, 
it must be possible to show a determination of free- 
dom by means of which the science of logic arises 
from the science of knowledge, and the limit of both 
may be ascertained. Such a determination of free- 
dom is indeed clearly to be pointed out. In the 
science of knowledge, as we have said, form and 
content are necessarily united. Logic is to repre- 
sent the pure form apart from the content ; and 
this separation of form and content can only — since 
it is not an original separation — occur through free- , 
dom. Hence, it is by the free separation of form ' 
from the content that logic arises as a science. 
Such a separation is called abstraction ; and hence " 
logic consists essentially in abstraction from all 
content of the science of knowledge. 

In this manner the propositions of logic would 
be merely form, which is impossible, for the concep- 
tion of a proposition involves (see § i) that it have 
both form and content. Hence, that which in the 
science of knowledge is mere form must be content 
in logic, and this content must again receive the 
general form of the science of knowledge, but which 
is now thought as the form of a logical proposition. 
This second act of freedom, whereby the form be- 
comes its own content and returns into itself, is 
called reflection. No abstraction is possible with- "'' 
out reflection, and no reflection without abstraction. 
Both acts, considered separately, are acts of freedom ; 
and when, in this same separation, they are placed 
in relation to each other, one of them is necessarily 



46 INTRODUCTION. 

the condition of the other. But in synthetical think- 
ing both are only one and the same act, viewed from 
two sides. 

From this results the determined relation of 
logic to the science of knowledge. The former is 
not the ground of the latter ; but the latter is the 
ground of the former. The science of knowledge 
can not be proven from the science of logic, and no 
logical proposition, not even the proposition of con- 
tradiction, must be accepted in advance as j^alid by 
the science of knowledge ; but, on the contrary, every 
logical proposition and the whole science of logic 
must be proven from the science of knowledge. It 
must be shown that all the forms contained in logic 
are really forms of a certain content in the science 
of knowledge. Thus, logic derives its validity from 
the science of knowledge, and not the science of 
knowledge its validity from logic. 

Again, the science of knowledge is not conditioned 
and determined by logic, but logic is conditioned 
and determined by the science of knowledge. The 
science of knowledge does not derive its form from 
logic, but has that form in itself. On the contrary, 
the science of knowledge conditions the validity 
and applicability of logical propositions. The forms 
which logic establishes must, in the common way 
of thinking, and in all particular sciences, be applied 
to no other content than that which they are con- 
fined to in the science of knowledge ; not neces- 
sarily to the whole of that content — for then we 
should have no particular sciences — but at least to 



INTRODUCTION. 47 

what is part of that content. Without this condi- 
tion the particular science to which such forms 
were appHed would only be an air castle, however 
correct its logical deductions might be. 

Finally, the science of knowledge is necessary ;/ 
not necessary exactly in so far as it is a clearly con- 
ceived and systematically arranged science, but at 
least necessary as a natural gift ; while logic is an ^ 
artificial product of the human mind in its freedom. 
Without the former, no knowledge and no science 
would be possible ; without the latter, all sciences 
would have been much later developed. The for- 
mer is the exclusive condition of all science ; the 
latter is a very beneficial invention to secure and 
facilitate the progress of sciences. 

Let me exemplify this : 

A=A is undoubtedly a correct logical proposi- ^ 
tion, and in so far as it is this it signifies : Tjf A is 
posited, then A is posited. Two questions arise 
here : Is A really posited .' and in how far and why 
is A posited if it is posited, or how are the if and 
the then connected ? 

Let us assume that A in this proposition signifies- '^ 
I, {Ego}) and that it has, therefore, its determined 
content, then the proposition would be this : I am 
I ; or, if I am posited, then I am posited. But ' 
since the subject of this proposition is the absolute 
subject, in this single case the content is posited at 
the same time with the form ; I am posited, because 
I have posited myself I am because I am. Hence, 
logic says : If A\s, then A is ; but the science of 



4? INTRODUCTION. 

knowledge says : Because A (that is, this particular 
A^Ego) is, therefore A is. And thus the ques- 
tion : Is A (this particular A) really posited ? is an- 
swered thus : It is posited, since it is posited. It 
is unconditionally and absolutely posited. 

Let us assume that in the above proposition A 
does not signify I, (Ego,) but something else, then 
the condition can be clearly realized, under which it 
would be possible to answer : A is posited ; and 
how we can be justified in drawing the conclusion : 
If A is posited, then it is posited. For the propo- 
sition A=A is valid originally only for the Ego ; 
it has been abstracted from the proposition of the 
science of knowledge, I am I. Hence, all the 
content, to which it is to be applicable, must be 
contained in the Ego. No A can, therefore, be any 
thing else but an A posited in the Ego ; and now 
the proposition reads : Whatsoever is posited in the 
Ego is posited ; if A is posited in the Ego, then it 
is posited, (that is, in so far as it is posited as pos- 
sible, actual, or necessary ;) and thus the proposi- 
tion is shown to be true, beyond contradiction, if 
the Ego is to be Ego. Again, if the Ego is posit- 
ed because it is posited, then every thing which is 
' posited in the Ego is posited because it is posited ; 
and if A alone is posited in the Ego, then it is pos- 
ited if it is posited ; and thus our second question 
is also answered. 



INTRODUCTION. 49 

§ 7. HOW IS THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE, AS 

SCIENCE, RELATED TO ITS OBJECT ? 

Let US first premise that this question has hith- 
erto been utterly abstracted from, and that hence 
all the foregoing must be modified by the answer- 
ing of this question. 

Every proposition in the science of knowledge ' 
has form and content ; something is known, and 
there is something whereof is known. But the 
science of knowledge is itself the science of some- 
thing, and not this something itself. This would 
seem to prove that the science of knowledge, with 
all its propositions, is form of a content which ex- 
isted in advance of it. How, then, is it related to 
this content, and what follows from this relation ? 

The object of the science of knowledge, we have 
seen, is the system of human knowledge. This ex- 
ists independently of the science of it, and the sci- 
ence olriy shapes it into systematic form. What, 
then, may this new form be, how is it distinguished 
from the form which must exist in advance of the 
science, and how is the science generally distin- 
guished from its object ? 

Whatever exists in the human mind, independently 
of science, we may also call the acts of that mind. 
These acts are the What which exists ; they occur 
in a certain determined manner, and by this deter- 
mined manner are they distinguished from each 
other. This is the How of the WJiat. Hence, 

there is in the human mind originally, and in ad- 

6 



50 INTRODUCTION. 

vance of our knowledge, form and content, and 
both are inseparably united ; each act occurs in a 
determined manner, in accordance with a law, and 
this law determines the act. Nay, there may be, 
even for an outside observer, a system in these acts, 
if they are mutually connected with each other, and 
if they follow general, particular, and specific laws. 

But it is not at all necessary that they should 
actually occur (that is, in time) in that systematic 
form which the outside observer frames in positing 
them as dependent on each other ; it is not at all 
necessary, for instance, that the act which com- 
prises all others, and which furnishes the highest 
universal law, should actually occur first in our 
mind, and be followed by the one next in impor- 
tance ; not necessary at all that they should all occur 
in a pure and unmixed state, or that many of them 
might not appear as one. Let us assume, for in- 
stance, that the highest act of the Intelligence be 
this : to posit itself. It is not at all necessary that 
this act should be in time the first act of our mind . 
which arises to clear consciousness ; nor is it even 
necessary that it should ever occur in consciousness 
in its purity ; that is, that the Intelligence should 
ever be able to think simply T am, without, at the 
same time, thinking another, which is Not I. 

Now, herein lies the whole content of a possible 
science of knowledge, but not that science itself 
In order to build up this science we need a new act of 
the human mind, not contained in all its other acts, 
namely, the power to become conscious of its man- 



INTRODUCTION. S I 

ner of acting generally. And since this act is not to ' 
be contained in all the other, acts, which are all ne- 
cessary, and which are all the necessary acts, it must 
be an act of freedom. Hence, the science of know- 
ledge, in so far as it is to be a systematic science, 
is built up in the same manner in which all possible 
sciences, in so far as they are to be systematic, are 
built up, that is, through a determination of free- 
dom ; which freedom is in the science of know- 
ledge particularly determined : to become conscious 
of the general manner of acting of the intelligence. 
Hence, the science of knowledge is distinguished 
from other sciences only in this, that the object of 
the latter sciences is itself a free act, while the ob- 
jects of the science of knowledge are necessary 
acts. 

Now, by means of this free act, something, which 
is in itself already form, namely, the necessary act 
of the intelligence, is taken up as content and put 
into a new form, that is, the form of knowledge or 
of consciousness ; and hence that free act is an act 
of reflection. Those necessary acts are separated 
from the order in which they may occur perchance, 
and are thus separated each free from all mixture ; 
hence, that act is also an act of abstraction. It is v 
impossible to reflect unless you have abstracted. 

The form of the consciousness, wherein the ne- 
cessary and general manner of acting of the intelli- 
gence is to be receivefi, undoubtedly belongs itself 
to the necessary modes of acting of the intelligence. 
Hence, the manner of acting of the intelligence 



52 INTRODUCTION. 

will undoubtedly be received in that consciousness 
like all its other contents ; and the question whence 
the science of knowledge is ever to get this form 
would thus appear to involve no difficulty. But, if 
we escape the difficulty in the question about the 
form, the whole difficulty centres in the question 
about the content. If the necessary manner of 
acting of the intelligence is to be received into the 
form of consciousness, it must be already known as 
such, and hence must have already been received 
into this form. We are clearly in a circle. 

This manner of acting is to be separated, ac- 
cording to the above, by a reflecting abstraction, 
abstracting from all that this manner of acting is 
not. This abstraction occurs through freedom, and 
in it the philosophizing judgment is not led by a 
blind compulsion. The whole difficulty, therefore, 
centres in this question : What rules does freedom 
follow in that separation \ or how does the philoso- 
pher know what he is to accept as the necessary 
manner of acting of the intelligence, and what he 
is to pass by as accidental .■' 

Now, this he can not possibly know, unless that 
which he is first to become conscious of is already 
in consciousness, which is a contradiction. There 
is, therefore, and can be, no ride for this procedure. 
The human mind makes many attempts ; by blind- 
ly groping it first discovers dawn, and only from 
dawn does it emerge to the light of day. At first 
it is led by dark feelings,* (the origin and reality of 

* Hence it follows that the philosopher requires the dim feelings 



INTRODUCTION. 53 

which the science of knowledge has to show up ;) 
and if we had not begun to feel dimly what after- 
ward we plainly recognized, we should be to-day 
yet the same lump of clay which arose from the 
earth, lacking all clear conceptions. This indeed 
the history of philosophy fully proves ; and we 
have now stated the true ground why that which 
lies open in every human mind, and which every 
one can grasp with his hands, if it is clearly ex- 
posed to him, could only arise to the consciousness 
of a few, after much straying into error. All phi- ^ 
losophers have proposed to themselves this same 
object, all have attempted to separate by reflection 
the necessary manner of acting of the intelligence 
from its accidental conditions ; all have thus se- 
parated it more or less purely and perfectly ; and, 
on the whole, the philosophizing judgment has 
steadily made progress, and drawn nearer to its 
final result. 

But since that reflection — not in so far as it is 
undertaken or not undertaken, for in this respect it 
is, free, as we have seen, but in so far as it is under- 
taken in accordance with laws, (that is, in so far as 
it is determined in character, if it is undertaken) — 
does also belong to the necessary manner of act- 
ing of the intelligence, its laws would necessarily 
occur in the system of that manner of acting ; and 
thus one might well observe — after the science were 

of the true, or requires genius in no less degree than the poet or 
the artist, only it is a genius of another kind. The artist requires 
the sense of beauty, the philosopher the sense of truth, 

5» 



54 INTRODUCTION. 

finished — ^whether they were correct ; that is, whe- 
ther they agreed with the former or not. In other 
words, it would seem that it were possible to fur- 
nish an evident proof of the correctness of our 
scientific system after it had been finished. 

But the laws of reflection, which we would thus 
discover in the course of the science of knowledge 
as the only possible ones whereby a science of know- 
ledge could be possible, are, after all — even though 
they agree with those laws of reflection which we 
had presupposed as the rules of our investigation — 
the result of their previous application, and we thus 
discover here a new circle. 

Certain laws of reflection have been presupposed 
by us ; and now, in the course of the science of 
knowledge, we discover the same laws as the only 
correct ones ; ergo, our presupposition has been 
true, and our science of knowledge is perfectly cor- 
rect in form. If we had presupposed other laws, 
we doubtlessly should have discovered other laws 
in our science of knowledge as the only correct 
ones, and the only question would have been whe- 
ther they agreed with the presupposed laws or not. 
If they did not, we should be sure either that the 
presupposed laws were wrong, or the discovered 
laws, or, which is most probable, both. It is, there- 
fore, not allowable to draw such a conclusion in a' 
circle. We merely conclude from the harmony of 
the presupposed and the discovered laws of reflec- 
tion that the system is correct. This, to be sure, 
is only a negative proof, which gives simply proba- 



. introduction: SS 

bility. If the presupposed and the discovered laws 
do not agree, then the system is surely false. If 
they do agree, it may be correct. But it must not 
necessarily be correct ; for although — if there is 
a system in human knowledge — such an agreement 
or harmony can only be discovered in 07te way, if 
the conclusions are rightly drawn, it always remains 
possible that the harmony may be the result of two 
incorrectly drawn conclusions, which cancel each 
other and thus produce harmony. It is as if I 
tested a calculation of division by multiplication. 
If I do not obtain the desired sum as product, I 
may be sure that I have made a mistake in calcu- 
lating ; but if I do obtain it, it is merely probable 
that I have calculated correctly ; for I might have 
made both in division and multiplication the same 
mistake ; for instance, might in both have counted 
5x9=36. It is thus with the science of know- v 
ledge. That science is not only the rule, but, at"^ 
the same time, the calculation. Whosoever doubts 
the correctness of our product, does not on that 
account doubt the ever-valid law that we must 
posit the one factor as many times as the other one 
has units ; he only doubts whether we have cor- 
rectly observed this law. 

Hence, even the highest unity of the system, " 
which is the negative proof of its correctness, leaves 
always soniething which can never be strictly prov- 
en, but only accepted as probable ; namely, that thi* 
unity has not been the result of chance, or of in- 
correct conclusions. Various means may be devised ' 



S5 INTRODUCTION. . 

to heighten this probabiUty ; the series of proposi- 
tions may be gone over in thought again and again ; 
one may reverse the method and compare the 
account from the result back to the fundamental 
principle ; or one may reflect again upon the reflec- 
tion, etc., etc. ; the probability always becomes 
greater, but never becomes certainty. If one is 
only conscious of having investigated honestly, and 
not having had in mind the final results one wished 
to discover, this probability may well suffice, and an 
objector to the correctness of our system may well 

/be required to show up the error in our conclusions ; 
but it will never do to claim infallibility. The sys- 
tem of the human mind, whereof the science of 
knowledge is to be the representation, is absolutely 
certain and infallible ; every thing grounded in it is 
absolutely true ; it never errs, and whatever has 
ever necessarily been, or ever necessarily will be, in 
any human soul, is true. If meji erred, the fault 
lay not in the necessary, but in the freedom of re- 
flection, which substituted orte law for another. And 
if our science of knowledge is a correct representa- 
tion of this system, it is absolutely certain and in- 
fallible as that system ; but_tfTe very qu estion is, 
whether our representation is or is not correct, and 
of this we can never furnish a strict conclusion, but 

t only a probable proof Our science of knowledge 
has truth only on the condition and in so far as its 
representation is a correct one. We are not the 
legislators of the human mind, but its historians ; 
not newspaper writers, it is true, but pragmatic his- 
tory-writers. 



■ INTRODUCTION. 57 

Add to this the circumstance that a system may 
really be correct as a whole, though its separate 
parts have not complete evidence. Here and there 
an incorrect conclusion may have been drawn, sug- 
gestive propositions may have been left out, other 
propositions which can be proven may have been 
asserted without proof or established by incorrect 
proof ; and yet the most important results may be 
correct. This seems impossible ; it seems as if a 
hair-breadth deviation from the straight line would 
necessarily lead to infinitely increasing deviation ; 
and thus indeed it would be if man had to produce 
all his knowledge by clear conscious thinking ; 
whereas rather the fundamental genius of reason 
unconsciously guides him and leads him by new 
errors from the straight path of his for7naliter 2in6. 
logically correct argument back to the materialiter 
only correct result, which he would never have 
reached again had he persisted in logically carrying 
out his wrong proposition. 

Even, therefore, if a universally valid science of 
knowledge should be established, the philosophical 
judgment will still have an infinite field wherein to 
work its ultimate perfection ; it will have to fill up 
blanks, to makq more strict the proofs, and clearer 
to determine the determinations. 

I have two more remarks to add : 

The science of knowledge presupposes the rules V 
of reflection and abstraction as well known and 
valid ; it must do so necessarily, and need not be 
ashamed or make a secret of it. That science may 



S8 INTRODUCTION. 

express itself and draw conclusions like any other 
science, it may presuppose all logical rules and ap- 
ply all conceptions which it needs. But these pre- 
suppositions are merely made to make itself intel- 
ligible ; hence, without drawing any consequences 
therefrom. Every thing provable must be proven ; 
with the exception of that first and highest funda- 
mental principle, all propositions must be deduced. 
Hence, for instance, neither the logical proposition 
of opposition or contradiction, which is the ground 
of all analysis, nor the logical proposition of the 
ground, (nothing is opposite which is not related 
in a third, and nothing is related which is not op- 
posed in a third, the proposition which is the 
ground of all synthesis,) is deduced from the ab- 
solute first principle, though they are deduced from 
the two fundamental principles which rest upon it. 
These two latter principles are also fundamental 
principles, it is true, but they are not absolute, only 
part of them is absolute ; herjce, these fundamental 
principles as well as the logical propositions which 
rest upon them need not be proven, but must be 
deduced. I explain myself clearer. 

That which the science of knowledge establishes 
is a proposition, thought and put into words ; that 
in the human mind which corresponds to it is an 
act of that mind, which in itself need not be thought 
at all. Nothing must be presupposed to this act 
than that without which the act as act would be 
impossible ; and this is not tacitly presupposed, but 
the science of knowledge has to establish it clearly 



INTRODUCTION. 59 

and distinctly as that without which the act would 
be impossible. Let the act be, for instance, D, the 
fourth in the series A, B, C, D ; then the act C 
must be preposited to the act D, and shown as the 
exclusive condition of the act D ; to the act C, 
again, the act B must be preposited, etc., etc. But 
the act A, the first act, is absolutely and uncondi- 
tionally possible ; and hence nothing is to be pre- 
posited as the condition of its possibility. 

The thinkijig of this act A is, however, a quite . 
different act, which presupposes far more. Suppose 
this thinking of A to be, in the series of acts about 
to be established, D, then A, B, and C must neces- 
sarily be presupposed as grounds of its possibility ; 
and since that thinking (of A) is to be the first 
business of the science of knowledge, A, B, and C 
must be tacitly presupposed. It is not till you get 
to D that the presuppositions of the first can be 
proven ; but as soon as you get this proof, you will 
have presupposed something else. The form of 
the science is thus always in advance of its con- 
tent ; and this is the reason why the science as "^ 
such can only attain probability. The represented 
and the representation are in two different series. 
In the first series nothing is presupposed which is " 
not proven ; but for the possibility of the second 
you always must presuppose what can not be 
proven till later. The reflection which rules in the 
whole science of knowledge, in so far as it is a 
science, is a representing. But from this it does 
not follow that every thing about which it reflects 



6o INTRODUCTION. 

must also be merely a representing. In the science 
of knowledge the Ego is represented ; but from this 
it does not follow that the Ego is represented as 
/merely representing ; for other determinations of 
the Ego may be discovered in it. The Ego as phi- 
losophizing subject is undoubtedly merely repre- 
senting ; but the Ego as object of the philosophizing 
may be something more. Representing is the 
highest and absolute first act of the philosopher as 
such ; but the absolute first act of the human mind 
may well be of another kind. That it will turn out 
to be so appears probable, in advance of all expe- 
rience, from simply this reason : that the repre- 
sentation may be completely exhausted, and that 
its acting is altogether necessary, and must, there- 
fore, have a final ground of its necessity, which, as 
final ground, can have no higher one. A science, 
therefore, which is erected on the conception of 
representation, might well be a very useful intro- 
duction to the science, but could not be the science 
of knowledge itself But this much follows cer- 
tainly from the above, that the collective modes of 
acting of the intelligence, which the science of 
knowledge is to exhaust, can be received in con- 
sciousness only in the form of representation ; that 
is to say, only in so far as they are represented. 



Fundamental Principles 



OF THE WHOLE 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



THE 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



§ I. FIRST AND ABSOLUTELY UNCONDITIONED 

FUNDAMENTAL PRINCIPLE. 

We have to search for the absolute, first, and un- 
conditioned fundamental principle of human know- 
ledge. It can not be proven nor determined if it is 
to be absolute first principle. 

This principle is to express that deed-act which 
does not occur among the empirical determinations 
of our consciousness, nor can so occur, since it is 
rather the basis of all consciousness, and first and 
alone makes consciousness possible. In represent- 
ing this deed-act it is not so much to be feared that 
my readers will not think what they ought to think, 
as that they will think what they ought not to think. 
This renders necessary a reflection on what may 
perhaps for the present be taken for that deed-act, 
and an abstraction from all that does not really 
belong to it. , j 

Even by means of this abstracting reflection, thatv ' 
deed-act, which is not empirical fact of conscious- 



64 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

' ness, can not become fact of consciousness ; but 
by means of this abstracting reflection we may 
recognize so much : that this deed-act must neces- 
sarily be thought as the basis of all consciousness. 

The laws* according to which this deed-act must 
necessarily be thought as basis of human know- 
ledge, or, which is the same, the rules according to 
which that abstracting reflection proceeds, have not 
yet been proven as valid, but are for the present 
tacitly presupposed as well-known and agreed upon. 
As we proceed we shall deduce them from that fun- 
damental principle, the establishment whereof is 
correct only if they are correct. This is' a circle, 
but an unavoidable circle. (See our Introduction, 
§ 7.) And since it is unavoidable and freely ad- 
mitted, it is also allowable to appeal to all the laws 
of general logic in establishing this highest funda- 
mental principle. 

In undertaking this abstracting reflection we 
must start from some proposition which every one 
will admit without dispute. Doubtless there are 
many such. We choose the one which seems to us 
to open the shortest road to our purpose. 

In admitting this proposition, the deed-act, which 
we intend to make the basis of our whole science 
of knowledge, must be. admitted ;. and the reflec- 
tion must show that this deed-act is admitted the 
moment that proposition is admitted. 

Our course 0/ proceeding in this reflection is as 

* The laws of general logic. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 6$ 

follows : Any fact of empirical consciousness, ad- 
mitted as such valid proposition, is taken hold of, 
and from it we separate one of its empirical deter- 
minations after the other, until only that remains, 
which can no longer be separated and abstracted 
from. 

As such admitted proposition we take this one : 
A is A. 

Every one admits this proposition, and without 
the least hesitation. It is recognized by all as com- 
pletely certain and evident. 

If any one should ask a proof of its certainty, 
no one would enter upon such a proof, but would 
say : This proposition is absolutely (that is, without 
any further ground) certain ; and by saying this 
wpuld ascribe to himself the power oi absolutely po- 
siting something. 

In insisting on the in itself certainty of the above 
proposition, you posit not that A is. The proposi- 
tion A is A is by no means equivalent to A is. 
(Being when posited without predicate is something 
quite different from being when posited with a pre- 
dicate.) Let us suppose A to signify a space in- 
closed within two straight lines, then the proposi- 
tion A is A would still be correct ; although the 
proposition A is would be false, since such a space 
is impossible. 

But you posit by that proposition : If K\%, then 
A is. The question whether A is at all or not, does 
not, therefore, occur in it. The content of the propo- 
sition is not regarded at all,: merely its, form. The 

6* 



66 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

question is not whereof you know, but what you 
know of any given subject. The only thing posit- 
ed, therefore, by that proposition is the absolutely 
necessary connection between the two As. This 
connection we will call X. 

In regard to A itself nothing has as yet been 
posited. The question, therefore, arises : Under 
what condition is A t 

X at least is in the Ego, and posited through the 
Ego, for it is the Ego which asserts the above 
proposition, and so asserts it by virtue of X as a law, 
which X or law must, therefore, be given to the Ego ; 
and, since it is asserted absolutely, and without fur- 
ther ground, must be given to the Ego through it- 
self 

Whether and how A is posited we do not know ; 
but since X is to designate a connection between an 
unknown positing of A (of the first A in the propo- 
sition A is A) and a positing of the same A, which 
latter positing is absolute on condition of the first 
positing, it follows that A, at least in so far as that 
connection is posited, is posited in and through the 
Ego, like X. Proof: X is only possible in relation 
to an A ; now X is really posited in the Ego ; 
hence, also, A must be posited in the Ego, in so far 
as X is related to it. 

X is related to that A, in the above proposition, 
which occupies the logical position of subject, and also 
to that A which is the predicate, for both are united 
by X. Both, therefore, are posited in the Ego, in 
so far as they are posited ; and the A of the predi- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 67 

cate is posited absolutely if the first one is posited. 
Hence, the above proposition may be also express- 
ed : If A is posited in the Ego, then it is posited, 
or then it is. 

Hence, by means of X, the Ego posits : that A is 
absolutely for the asserting Ego, and is simply be- 
cause it is posited in the Ego ; or that there is 
something in the Ego which always remains the 
same, and is thus able to connect or posit ; and 
hence the absolutely posited X may also be ex- 
pressed, Ego=Ego, or I am I. 

Thus we have already arrived at the proposition 
I nm ; not as expression of a deed-act, it is true, 
but, at least, as expression of 3. fact. 

For X is absolutely posited ; this is a fact of 
empirical consciousness, as shown by the admitted 
proposition. Now, X signifies the same as I am I ; 
hence, this proposition is also absolutely posited. 

But Ego is Ego, or I am I, has quite, another sig- 
nificance than A is A. For the latter proposition 
had content only on a certain condition, namely, if 
A is posited. - But the proposition I am I is uncon- 
ditionally and absolutely valid, since it is the same 
as X ; it is valid not only in form, but also in con- 
tent. In it the Ego is posited not on condition, 
but absolutely, with the predicate of self-equality ; 
hence, it is posited, and the proposition may also 
be expressed, T am. 

This proposition, / am, is as yet only founded 
upon a fact, and has no other validity than that of 
a fact. If "A=A" (or X) is to be certain, then 



68 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

" I am " must also be certain. Now, it is fact of 
empirical consciousness that we are compelled to 
regard X as absolutely certain ; hence, also, " I am " 
is certain, since it is the ground of the X. It fol- 
lows from this, that the ground of explanation of 
all facts of empirical consciousness is this : before all 
positing, the Ego must be posited through itself. 

(I say of all facts ; and to prove this I must show 
that X is the highest fact of empirical conscious- 
ness, is the basis of all others, and contained in all 
other facts ; which, perhaps, would be admitted by 
all men without proof, although the whole science 
of knowledge busies itself to prove it.) 

The proposition A=A is asserted. But all as- 
serting is an act of the human mind ; for it has all 
the conditions of such an act in empirical con- 
sciousness, which must be presupposed as well 
known and admitted in order to advance our re- 
flection. Now, this act is based on something 
which has no higher ground, namely, X or I am. 

Hence, that which is absolutely posited a^td in it- 
self grounded is the ground of a certain (we shall 
see hereafter of all) acting of the human mind ; 
hence its pure character ; the pure character of 
activity in itself, altogether abstracting from its par- 
ticular empirical conditions. 

The positing of the Ego through itself is, there- 
fore, the pure activity of the Ego. The Kgo posits 
itself; and the Ego is by virtue of this its mere self- 
positing. Again, vice versa : the Ego is and posits 
its being, by virtue of its mere being. It is both 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 69 

the acting and the product of the act ; the active 
and the result of the activity ; deed and act in one ; 
and hence tlie / am is expressive of a deed-act ; 
and of the only possible deed-act, as our science of 
knowledge must show. 

Let us again consider the proposition / am I. 
The Ego is absolutely posited. Let us assume 
that the first Ego of this proposition (which has 
the position of formal subject) is the absolutely posi- 
ted Ego, and that the second Ego (that of the pre- 
dicate) is the being Ego ; then the absolutely valid 
assertion that both are one signifies : the Ego is, 
because it has posited itself. 

(This is, indeed, the case according to the logical 
ibrm of the proposition. In A=A the first A is 
that which is posited in the Ego, (either absolutely, 
like the Ego itself, or conditionally, like any non- 
Ego ;) and in this positing of A the Ego is abso- 
lute subject ; and hence the first A is also called 
the Subject. But the second A designates that 
which the Ego, in now making itself the object of 
its own reflection, discovers thus as posited in 
itself, (since it has just before itself posited the A 
in itself) The Ego, in asserting that proposition 
A^A, predicates in truth not something of A, but 
of itself, namely, that it has found an A posited in 
itself ; and hence the second A is called predicate.) 
The Ego in the former and the Ego in the latter 
significance are to be absolutely equal. Hence, the 
above proposition may be turned around, and then 
it reads : The Ego posits itself simply because it is. 



70 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

It posits itself through its mere being, and is 
through its mere being posited. 

This, then, will explain clearly in what signifi- 
cance we here use the word Ego, (I,) and will lead 
us to a definite explanation of the Ego as absolute 
subject. The Ego as absolute subject is that, the 
being (essence) whereof consists merely in posititig 
itself as being. As soon as it posits itself, it is ; 
and as soon as it is, it posits itself; and hence the 
Ego is for the Ego absolute and necessary. What- 
soever is not for itself is not an Ego. 

Illustratiojt. 

The question has been asked. What was I before 
I became self-conscious 1 The answer is,' F was 
not at all, for I was not I. The Ego is onfy, in so 
far as it is conscious of itself The possibility of 
that question is grounded upon a mixing up of the 
Ego as subject, and the Ego as object of the reflection 
of the absolute subject ; and is in itself altogether 
improper. The Ego represents itself, and in so far 
takes itself up in the form of representation, and 
now first becomes a somewhat, that is, an object. 
Consciousness receives in this form of representa- 
tion a substrate, which is, even without the real 
consciousness, and which, moreover, is thought 
bodily. Such a condition is thought, and the ques- 
tion asked. What was the Ego at that time .? that 
is, what is the substrate of consciousness 1 But 
even in this thought you unconsciously add in 
thinking the absolute subject as looking at that sub- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 7 1 

strate ; aiid hence you unconsciously add in thought 
the very thing whereof you wanted to abstract, and 
thus you contradict yourself. The truth is, you 
can not think any thing at all without adding in 
thought your Ego as self-conscious ; you can not 
abstract from your self-consciousness ; and all 
questions of the above kind are not to be an- 
swered, since, maturely considered, they can not 
be asked. 

If the Ego is only in so far as it posits itself, then 
it also is oxAy for the positing, and posits only for 
the being Ego. The Ego is for the Ego ; but if it 
posits itself absolutely, as it is, then it posits itself 
necessarily, and is necessary for the Ego. / am 
only forme; but for me I am necessarily. (By saying 
for me, I already posit my being.) 

To posit itself and to be is, applied to the Ego, 
the same. Hence, the proposition I am because I 
have posited myself, can also be expressed : / am 
absolutely because I am. 

Again, the Ego as positing itself and the Ego as 
being are one and the same. The Ego is as what 
it posits itself, and posits itself as what it is. Hence, 
I am absolutely what I am. 

The inimediate expression of the thus developed 
deed-act may be given in the following formula : / 
am absolutely because I am, and I am absolutely what 
T am for myself. 

If this narration of the original deed-act is to 
be placed at the head of a science of knowledge 



72 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

as its highest fundamental principle, it may perhaps 
be best expressed thus : 

The Ego posits originally its own Being. 

(In other words, the Ego is necessarily identity 
of subject and object ; is itself subject-object ; and 
it is this without further mediation.) 

We started from the proposition A=A, not as if 
the proposition, I am, could be proven by it, but be- 
cause we had to start from some one certain propo- 
sition, given in empirical consciousness. And our 
development, also, has shown that A=A does not 
contain the ground of " I am," but, on the contrary, 
that the latter proposition is the ground of the 
former. 

By abstracting from the content of the proposi- 
tion I am, and looking merely to its form, namely, 
the form of drawing a conclusion from the being 
posited of something to its being, as we must ab- 
stract for the sake of logic, we thus obtain as fun- 
damental principle of logic the proposition A^A, 
which can only be proven and determined through 
the science of knowledge. Proven : for A is A be- 
cause the Ego which haa posited A is the same as 
the Ego in which" A is posited. Determined : for 
whatever is, is only in so far as it is posited in the 
Ego, and there is nothing outside of the Ego. No 
possible A (no thing) can be any thing else but an 
A posited in the Ego. 

By abstracting, moreover, from all asserting as a 
determined acting, and looking merely to the gene- 
ral manner of acting of the human mind, which is 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 73 

given through that form, we obtain the category of 
reality. Every thing to which the proposition 
A=A is applicable has reality, in so far as that 
proposition is applicable to it. That which is posited 
through the mere positing of any thing (in the Ego) 
is its reality, its essence. 

Remarks. 

Kant, in his deduction of the categories, has hint- \ 
ed at our proposition as absolute fundamental prin- 
ciple of all knowledge ; but he has never definitely 
established it as fundamental principle. Before 
Kant, Descartes has suggested a similar one, Cogito, 
ergo sum ; which, however, is not necessarily the 
minor and conclusion of a syllogism, of which the 
major would have to be, Quodcunque cogitat, est ; but 
which he may also have viewed as immediate fact 
of consciousness. In that case it would signify, 
Cogitans sum, ergo sum, (or, as we should say, Sum, 
ergo sum) But in that case the word cogitans is 
completely superfluous ; you do not think necessa- 
rily when you are, but you are necessarily when you 
think. Thinking is not the essence, but merely a*^' 
particular determination of the Ego ; and there are 
niany other determinations of the Ego. 

Reinhold speaks of representation, and his fun- 
damental principle would read in the Cartesian form, 
Reprcesento, ergo sum ,v or, more correctly, Reprmsen- 
tans sum, ergo sum. He goes considerably further 

than Descartes, but not far enough ; for representa- 

7 



74 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

tion, also, is not the essence of the Ego, but merely 
a particular determination of the Ego ; and there 
are many other determinations of the Ego, although 
they certainly must pass through the medium of rep- 
resentation in order to enter empirical consciousness. 

Spinoza, on the other hand, goes beyond our 
proposition in its established significance. He does 
not deny the unity of empirical consciousness, but 
he utterly denies its pure consciousness. According 
to him the whole series oi representations of a sin- 
gle empirical subject is related to the only one pure 
subject, as a single representation is related to the 
whole series. In his view the Ego (that is, that 
which he calls his Ego, or which I call my Ego) 
is not absolutely because it is, but because something 
else is. True, he considers the Ego to be Ego for 
the Ego ; but he asks what it may be for something 
outside of the Ego. Such an' " outside of the Ego" 
would also be an Ego, of which the posited Ego 
(for instance, my Ego) and all possible Egos would 
be modifications. He separates the pure and the 
^»2/'?W^<2:/ consciousness. The first he posits in God, 
who never becomes self-conscious, since pure con- 
sciousness never attains consciousness ; the latter 
he posits in the particular modifications of the God- 
head. His system, thus established, is perfectly 
logical and not to be refuted, because he has entered 
a sphere where reason can not follow him ; but his 
system is also groundless, for what justified him 
in going beyond the pure consciousness given in 
empirical consciousness ? 



TSE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 75 

§ 2. SECOND, AND IN REGARB TO ITS CONTENT, 

CONDITIONED FUNDAMENTAL PRINCIPLE. 

For the same reason why the first fundamental/' 
principle could not be proven or deduced, the sec- 
ond, also, can not be proven. Hence, we here, also, 
proceed from a fact of empirical consciousness in 
the same manner. 

The proposition not A is not A will doubtless be 
recognized by every one as certain, and it is scarce- 
ly to be expected that any one will ask for its 
proof 

If, however, such a proof were possible, it must 
in our system be deduced from the proposition 
A=A. 

But such a proof is impossible. For let us as- 
sume, at the utmost, that the above proposition is the 
same as — A is — A, (and hence that — A is equal to 
some Y posited in the Ego,) and that for this reason 
our proposition signifies now : i/the opposite of A is 
posited, then it is posited ; still we should only have 
the same connection posited (X) which we obtain- 
ed in our § i, and our proposition, — A is not A, in- 
stead of being derived from A=A, would, after all, 
be only the very same proposition. The chief 
question. Is the opposite of A posited, and under 
what condition of form of mere acting is it posited 1 
is altogether ignored. If our second proposition 
were a derived one, then this condition of the form 
of acting would have to be derived from the propo- 
sition A=A. But how can the proposition A^A, 



76 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

which involves only the form of positing, also in- 
volve the form of oppositing ? Hence, that form 
of acting, the oppositing, is posited absolutely, and 
with no attached condition. — A is posited as 
such simply because it is posited. 

Hence, as sure as the proposition — A not = A 
occurs among the facts of empirical consciousness, 
there occurs among the acts of the Ego an oppos- 
iting; and this oppositing, as far as its form is con- 
cerned, is absolutely and unconditionally possible, 
and is an acting which has no higher ground. 

Through this absolute act the opposite, as mere 
opposite, is posited. Every opposite, in so far as it 
is merely opposite, is simply by virtue of an abso- 
lute act of the Ego, and has no other ground. 
Opposition generally is simply posited through the 
Ego. 

But if any — A is to be posited, an A must be po- 
sited. Hence, the act of oppositing is also, in an- 
other respect, conditioned. Whether the act at all 
is possible depends upon another act ; hence, the 
act in its content, as acting generally, is conditioned ; 
it is an acting in relation to another acting. The 
foinn of the act, however, (the How "i namely, that it 
is not an act of positing, but of oppositing,) is uncon- 
ditioned. 

(Opposition is only possible on condition of the 
unity of consciousness of the positing and the op- 
positing. For if the consciousness of the first act 
were not connected with that of the second, then 
the second positing would not be an ^/-positing, 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. J 7 

but an absolute positing. Oppositing it becomes 
only through its relation to a positing. 

As yet.we have only spoken of the act, as mere 
act, of the manner of acting. Let us now examine 
its product, = — A. 

In — A we can again distinguish form and co7i- 
te7it. Through the form is determined, that it is an 
opposite ; the content determines that it is an oppo- 
site of a determined something, (of A,) that it is 
not this something. 

The form of — A is determined simply through 
the act ; it is an opposite because it is product of 
an oppositing ; the content is determined through A : 
it" is not what A is, and its whole essence consists in 
this, that it is not what A is. I know of — A simply 
tliat it is the opposite of A. But what^2iX is where- 
of I know this, I can only know by knowing A. 

Originally only the Ego is posited, and this alone 
is absolutely posited. (§ i.) Hence, an absolute 
oppositing can only refer to the Ego. The opposite 
of the Ego we call Non-Ego. 

As sure as the proposition — A is not A is un- 
conditionally admitted as fact of empirical con- 
sciousness, a non-Ego is absolutely opposited to the 
Ego. All we have said above in reference to opposit- 
ing generally, is deduced from this original opposit- 
ing, and hence is valid for it ; it is, therefore, uncon- 
ditioned in form, but conditioned in content. And 
thus we have also found the second principle of all 
human knowledge. 



78 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

Whatsoever appertains to the Ego, of that the 
opposite must appertain to the non-Ego. 

(The general opinion- is, that the conception of 
the non-Ego is a discursive conception, obtained by 
abstracting from all objects of representation. But 
the foolishness of this explanation can be easily 
demonstrated. If I am to represent an object, I 
must posit it in opposition to the representing sub- 
ject. Now, it is true that in the object of repre- 
sentation there can and must be an X, whereby it 
discovers itself to be not the representing, but a 
represented ; but no object of representation can 
possibly teach me, that every thing wherein this X 
occurs is represented object, and not representing 
subject ; on the contrary, only by presupposing this 
law do I attain any object.) 

By undertaking the same abstraction with this 
proposition, which we undertook with the first, we 
obtain the logical proposition — A is not A, which I 
should call the proposition of oppositing. In the 
present place, this proposition can not yet be pro- 
perly determined, or expressed in a formula, the 
reason whereof will appear in the following section. 

By abstracting from the determined act of as- 
serting this proposition, and looking merely to the 
form of drawing a conclusion from the being op- 
posited of something to its being, we obtain the 
category of negation. This also can not be clearly 
developed till in the following section. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 79 

§ 3. THIRD, IN ITS FORM CONDITIONED FUNDA- 
MENTAL PRINCIPLE. 

Every step we take in our science brings us 
nearer to the point where every thing can be 
proven. In the first principle, nothing could be 
nor was to be proven ; in the second, only the act 
of oppositing was not provable ; but, this act once 
admitted, it was strictly shown that the opposite 
must be a Non-Ego. The third principle is al- 
most throughout capable of proof, since it is not, 
like the second, conditioned in content, but only 
in form, and, moreover, conditioned in form by the 
two foregoing propositions. 

It is conditioned in form signifies, the problem of 
the act it establishes is given by the two foregoing 
propositions, but not the solution of the problem. 
The solution is the result of an unconditioned and 
absolute act of reason. 

We therefore commence with a deduction, and 
proceed as far as we can go. When we can go. 
no further, we shall have to appeal to this absolute 
act. 

I. In so far as the Non-Ego is posited, the Ego is 
not posited ; for the Non-Ego completely cancels 
the Ego. 

Now, the Non-Ego is posited in the Ego, for it is 
opposited ; and all oppositing presupposes the iden- 
tity of the Ego. 

Hence, the Ego is not posited in the Ego in so 
far as the Non-Ego is posited in it 



8o THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

2. But the Non-Ego can only be posited in so far 
as an Ego is posited in the Ego, (in the identical 
consciousness,) as the opposite of which it is posi- 
ted. 

Hence, in so far as the Non-Ego is posited in the 
Ego, the Ego also must be posited in it. 

3. The conclusions of our ist and 2d are op- 
posed to each other ; yet both are developed from 
the second fundamental principle ; hence, that 
second principle is opposed to itself and cancels 
itself 

4. But it cancels itself only in so far as the pos- 
ited is canceled by the opposited, hence in so far 
as itself is valid. 

Hence, it does not cancel itself The second fun- 
damental principle cancels itself and does not can- 
cel itself 

5. If this is the case with the second principle, it 
must also be with the first principle. That first prin- 
ciple cancels itself and does not cancel itself For, 

If Ego is = Ego, then all is posited, which is pos- 
ited in the Ego. 

Now, the second principle is to be posited and 
not to be posited in the Ego. 

Hence, Ego is not = Ego, but Ego is = to the 
Non-Ego, and Non-Ego = Ego. 

All these results have been deduced from the 
established principles according to the laws of 
reflection presupposed as valid ; they must be cor- 
rect, therefore. But if they are correct, the identity 
of consciousness, the only absolute foundation of 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 8 1 

our knowledge, is canceled. This determines our 
problem. We must find an X, by means of which 
all these results may be correct, without destroying 
the identity of consciousness. 

1. The opposites, to be united, are in the Ego as 
consciousness. Hence, X must also be in con- 
sciousness. 

2. Both the Ego and Non-Ego are products of 
original acts of the Ego, and consciousness itself 
is such a product of the first original act of the 
Ego, of the positing of the Ego through itself 

3. But our above results show that the act of 
which the Non-Ego is the product, that is, the op- 
positing, is not at all possible without X. Hence, 
X itself must be a product of an original act of the 
Ego. There must be, accordingly, an act of the 
human mind = Y, the product of which is X. 

4. The form of this act Y is determined by the 
above problem. It is to be a uniting of the oppo- 
sites (the Ego and the Non-Ego) without their mu- 
tually canceling each other. The opposites are to 
be taken up into the identity of consciousness. 

5. But the problem does not determine the How, 
or the manner of this uniting, nor even suggests it 
at all. We must, therefore, make an experiment, v 
and ask : How can A and — A, being and not be- 
ing, reality and negation, be thought together, 
without their mutually canceling each other .' 

6. It is not to be expected that any one will re- ^ 
ply otherwise but : They must mutually limit each 
other. If this answer is correct, the act Y is a 



82 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

limiting of both opposites through each other, and 
X would signify the limits. 

(Let me not- be understood as asserting that the 
conception of Umits is an analytical conception, in- 
volved in, and to be developed out of, the union of 
reality and negation. It is true our two funda- 
mental principles have given us the opposite con- 
ceptions, and our first principle has given us the 
requirement to unite them. But the manner of 
uniting them has not been given, and is determined 
by a particular law of our mind, which law our ex- 
periment was only to make us conscious of) 

7. The conception of limits, however, involves 
more than the required X ; for it involves also the 
conceptions of reality and negation, which are to 
be united. Hence, to get X pure, we must under- 
take another abstraction. 

8. To limit something signifies to cancel the re- 
ality thereof not altogether, but only in part. Hence 
the conception of limits involves, besides the con- 
ceptions of reality and negation, that of divisibility, 
(of quantitability generally, not of a determined 
quantity.) This conception is the required X, and 
hence, through the act Y, the Ego as well as the 
Non-Ego is posited divisible. 

9. The Ego as well as the Non-Ego are posited 
divisible; for the act Y can not sticceed the act of 
oppositing, for in itself the act of oppositing has 
shown itself impossible ; nor can it precede that 
act, for the act Y occurs merely to make the act 
of oppositing possible ; and divisibility is nothing 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 83 

but a divisible. Hence, the act Y and the act of 
oppositing occur in and with each other ; both are 
one and the same, and are only distinguished in re- 
flection. By oppositing, therefore, a Non-Ego to 
the Ego, both the Ego and the Non-Ego are posited 
divisible. 

Let us now see whether the here established act 
has really solved the problem and united the op- 
posites. 

The first result is now determined as follows : 
The Ego is not posited in the Ego in so far, that is, 
with those parts of reality wherewith the Non-Ego 
is posited. That part of reality, which is ascribed 
to the Non-Ego, is canceled in the Ego. 

This proposition at present does not contra- 
dict the second result : in so far as the Non-Ego is 
posited, the Ego also must be posited ; for both are 
posited as divisible in regard to their reality. 

And only now can you say of either, it is some- 
thing. For the absolute Ego of the first funda- 
mental principle is not something, (has no predicate 
and can have none ;) it is simply what it is. But now 
all reality is in consciousness, and of this reality 
that part is to be ascribed to the Non-Ego which is 
not to be ascribed to the Ego, and vice versa. 
Both are something. The Non-Ego is what the ' 
Ego is not, and vice versa. Opposed to the abso- 
lute Ego, the Non-Ego is absolutely nothing, (but it 
can be opposed to the absolute Ego only in so far 
as it is an object of representation, as we shall see 



84 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

hereafter ;) opposed to the divisible Ego, the Non- 
Ego is a negative qiia>ntity. 

The Ego is to be = Ego, and yet it is also to be 
opposed to itself. But it is self-equal in regard to 
consciousness ; and in this consciousness the abso- 
. lute Ego is posited as indivisible, and the Ego, to 
which the Non-Ego is opposed, as divisible. Hence, 
in the unity of consciousness, all the opposites are 
united ; for in it even the Ego, in so far as a Non- 
Ego is opposed to it, is opposed to the absolute 
Ego ; and this is, as it were, the test that the es- 
tablished conception of divisibility was the correct 
one. 

According to our presupposition, which can be 
proven only through the completion of the science 
of knowledge, only one absolute unconditioned,' one 
in its content conditioned, and one in its form con- 
ditioned principle is possible. Hence, no further 
principle can be possible. All that is uncondition- 
ally and absolutely certain has been exhausted, and 
I might express the total in this formula : 

The Ego opposits in the Ego a divisible Non-Ego 
to a divisible Ego. 

Beyond this cognition no philosophy can go ; 
but every thorough philosophy ought to go to it, 
and by doing so will become science of knowledge. 
Whatsoever is hereafter to occur in the system of 
the human mind must be deducible from what 
we have here established. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 85 



REMARKS. 

We have united the opposites, Ego and Non-Ego, 
through the conception of divisibility. By ab- 
stracting from the content (the Ego and Non-Ego) 
and looking at the mere form of uniting opposites 
through the conception of divisibility, we obtain the 
logical proposition of the ground ; that is, A is in 
part — A, and vice versa. Every opposite is re- 
lated to its opposite in one characteristic = X ; 
and all equals are opposed to each other in one 
characteristic X. Such an X is called, in the first 
instance, ground of relation; in the second in- 
stance, ground of distinction. This logical propo- 
sition our third fundamental principle both proves 
and determines. 

Proves : for every opposite = —A is opposed to 
an A, and this A is posited. Through the positing 
of a —A you both cancel and do not cancel A. 
Hence, you only cancel A in part ; and instead of 
the X in A, which is not canceled, you have pos- 
ited in —A not —X, but X itself; and hence A 
is = —A in X. 

Again, every opposite (== A ^ B) is self-equal 
by virtue of being posited in the Ego : A = A, 
B = B. 

Now, you posit B ^ A ; hence, B is not posited 
through A, for then it would be ^ A and not = B. 
(You would have only posited one, and not two.) 

But if B is not posited through the positing of 
A, then it is in so far = — A ; and through the 



86 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

positing of both as equal, neither A nor B, but an 
X, is posited, which X is = X and = A and = B. 

Thus it appears how the proposition A = B can 
be valid, which in itself contradicts the proposition 
A = A. X = X,A=X, B = X; hence, A = B 
in so far as both is := X ; but A = — B in so far 
as both is = — X. 

Opposites are related and equals opposed to 
each other in only one part. For, if they were op- 
posed in many parts, that is, if the opposites them- 
selves contained opposite characteristics, one* of 
both would belong to that wherein they are equal, 
and hence they would not be opposites, and vice 
versa. Every grounded judgment has, therefore, 
only one ground of relation and one ground of dis- 
tinction. If it has more, it is not one judgment, 
but many judgments. 

Determines : for only on condition that many 
things are posited at all as equals or as opposites, 
are they thus opposed or related in one character- 
istic. But it is by no means asserted that abso- 
lutely every thing which may occur in our conscious- 
ness, must be equal to another and opposed to a 
third. 

A judgment, therefore, concerning that to which 
nothing can be related or opposed, does not come 
at all under the rule of this proposition of the 
ground, for it is not under the condition of its va- 
lidity ; it is not grounded, since, on the contrary, 
itself grounds all possible judgments ; it has no 
ground, but furnishes itself the ground of all 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 8/ 

grounded. The object of all such judgments is the 
absolute Ego, and all judgments, whereof it is the 
subject, are valid absolutely and without further 
ground ; whereof more below. 

The act whereby, in comparing a twofold, you 
look up the mark wherein they are opposites, is 
called the antithetical proceeding, generally spoken 
of as mtalytical, which expression, however, is less 
proper ; partly because it permits the opinion that 
you can develop something out of a conception 
which you have not previously put into it by a syn- 
thesis, and partly because the expression antithet- 
ical signifies more clearly that it is the opposite of 
synthetical. For the synthetical proceeding con- 
sists in this, that in opposites that characteristic , 
is looked up wherein they are equal. In the mere 
logical form, judgments of the first class are called 
antithetical or negative, and judgments of the lat- 
ter class synthetical or affirmative judgments. 

Again : since we discovered, in the development of 
our third principle, that the act of uniting opposites 
in a third is not possible without the act of opposit- 
ing, and vice versa, it also follows that in logic anti- 
thesis and synthesis are inseparable. No anti- 
thesis — no positing of equals as opposites — without 
synthesis — without the previous positing of the 
equals as equals. No synthesis — no positing of 
opposites as equals — without antithesis — without 
the previous positing of the opposites as opposites. 
(As far as the content is concerned, mere analytical 
judgments have, therefore, no existence ; and not 



88 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

only do they not carry us far, as Kant remarks, 
but they do not advance us a single step.) 

Kant's celebrated question, which he placed at 
the head of his Critic of Pure Reason, How are syn- 
thetical judgments a priori possible ? has now been 
answered in the most universal and satisfactory 
manner. In our third principle we have estab- 
lished a synthesis between the opposites, Ego and 
Non-Ego, by means of the posited divisibility of 
both, concerning the possibility of which no further 
question can be asked nor any further ground as- 
signed ; it is absolutely possible, and we are justi- 
fied in establishing it without further ground. All 
other syntheses, which are to be valid, must be in- 
volved in this one ; must have been established in 
and with this one ; and as soon as this is proven, 
the most convincing proof has been shown up that 
they are equally valid. 

Must be involved in this one ; and this shows us 
at the same time in the most determined manner, 
how we must henceforth proceed in the develop- 
ment of our science. It is syntheses we are to ob- 
tain, and hence our whole course of proceeding 
hereafter will be synthetical ; every proposition will 
contain a synthesis. (At least in the theoretical -^ 
part of our science, for in the practical part the 
very reverse is the case, as will appear hereafter.) 
But no synthesis is possible without a previous ana- 
lysis ; from this analysis, however, in so far as it is 
an act, we abstract, and only look up its product— 
the opposites. Hence, at every proposition here- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 8g 

after we shall begin by looking up the opposites in- 
volved in it, and which are to be united. Again, 
all our syntheses are to be involved in the high- 
est synthesis, just shown up, and to be developed 
out of it. Hence, it will be our task to look 
up in the Ego and Non-Ego, which that synthesis 
unites, some opposite characteristics, which have not 
been united ; and to unite these opposites through 
a new ground of relation, which, again, must be in- 
volved in the highest ground of relation ; next, it 
will be our task to look up new opposites in the op- 
posites united by this second synthesis, and to unite 
them in a third synthesis ; and to continue this 
course until we arrive at opposites which can no 
longer be perfectly united, whereby we shall then 
be forced to enter the practical part of our science. 

As antithesis is not possible without synthesis, 
and vice versa, so neither is possible without a the- 
sis ; that is, without an absolute positing, whereby 
a certain A (the Ego) is posited, not as the equal 
of any other, nor as the opposite of any other, but is 
absolutely posited. This, when applied to our sys- 
tem, gives it completeness and surety. It must be 
a system and one system ; the opposites must be 
united so long as opposites still exist, and until the 
absolute unity is produced ; which absolute unity, 
as will be shown hereafter, can, however, only be 
prbduced by a completed approach to the infinite, 
that is to say, never in time. 

The necessity to opposit and unite in the above 
determined manner, rests immediately on our third 



go THE SCfENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

fundamental principle ; the necessity to unite at all, 
rests on the first highest and absolutely uncondi- 
tioned principle. T'^&form of the system is ground- 
ed in the highest synthesis ; but that a system is to 
be at all, is grounded in the absolute thesis. 

There is, however, another application of our 
above remark which can not be left unnoticed 
here ; that is, its application to the form of judg- 
ments. For as we had synthetical and antithetical 
judgments, we shall also doubtless find thetical 
judgments, which in some respect will be utterly 
opposed to the former. For the correctness of an- 
tithetical and synthetical judgments always pre- 
supposed a ground, and a double ground, namely, 
one of relation and one of distinction. A thetical 
judgment would, therefore, be one wherein some- 
thing would not be related or opposed to another, 
but would only be posited as equal to itself ; hence, 
it would presuppose neither a ground of distinction 
nor of relation. But since the logical form requires 
some presupposition, this presupposition in theti- 
cal judgments could only be a problem to find a 
ground. 

The highest judgment of this kind is / am, 
wherein nothing is asserted of the Ego, the place 
of the predicate being left empty for any possible 
infinite determination of the Ego. All other judg- 
ments (involved in this highest one) are of the 
same kind. For instance, Man is free. You may 
consider this either as a positive judgment — in which 
case it signifies, man belongs to the class of free 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 9 1 

beings ; and in that case a ground of relation ought 
to be shown up between man and the class of free 
beings, which ground as ground of that freedom 
ought to be contained in the conception of free be- 
ings generally, and particularly of man ; but, far 
from being able to show up such a ground, we can 
not even point out a class of free beings ; or you 
may consider it as a negative judgment, in which 
case you posit man in opposition to all beings, which 
are subject to the law of natural necessity ; but 
then you must first point out the ground of dis- 
tinction between necessity and not-necessity ; and 
you must show that the latter is not involved in the 
conception of man, but is involved in the concep- 
tion of the opposite beings ; and at the same time 
you must show a ground of relation wherein both 
are equal. But man, in so far as the predicate of 
freedom can be applied to him, that is, in so far as 
he is absolute, and not represented nor representa- 
ble subject, has nothing in common with the beings 
of nature, and hence also is not to be opposited to 
them. Still, the logical form of the judgment, 
which is positive, demands that both conceptions be 
united. But they can not be united in any concep- 
tion, and can only be united in the idea of an Ego, 
the consciousness whereof is determined by noth- 
ing external, but which rather through its mere con- 
sciousness determines all external ; and such an idea 
itself is not thinkable, but involves for us a contra- 
diction. Yet it is posited for us as our highest 



92 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

practical destination. Man is to draw infinitely 
nearer to the in itself unattainable freedom. 

Thus, again, the assthetical judgment : A is beau- 
tiful (that is, in A is a characteristic which is also 
in the idea of the beautiful) is a thetical judgment ; 
for I can not compare that characteristic with the 
ideal, since I do not know the ideal. It is rather a 
problem given to me, which is the result of my ab- 
solute self-positing, to discover that ideal ; but this 
problem can only be solved in a completed attain- 
ment of the infinite, that is, never in time. 

Hence, Kant and his successors have called these 
judgments very properly infinite judgments ; al- 
though not one, so far as I know, has explained 
them in a clear and definite manner. 

It appears, therefore, that for thetical judgments 
no ground can be adduced ; but their general pos- 
sibility and validity is grounded in the absolute 
self-positing of the Ego. It is useful, and will fur- 
nish the clearest insight into our science, if this 
manner of grounding thetical judgment is compared 
with that of grounding antithetical and synthetical 
judgments. 

All opposites, which are opposed in a conception 
expressing their ground of distinction, agree in a 
higher (more universal) conception, which is called 
the conception of species ; that is, a synthesis is 
presupposed, which contains both opposites, and in 
so far as they are equal to each other. Gold and 
silver, for instance, are contained in the higher con- 
ception of metal. (Hence, the logical rule of defi- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 93 

nition, that it must state the higher conception, the 
ground of relation, and the specific difference, which 
constitutes the ground of distinction.) 

Again, all equals are opposed to each other in a 
lower conception, expressive of some particular 
determination abstracted from in the higher concep- 
tion ; that is, all synthesis presupposes a previous 
antithesis. For instance, in the conception Body, 
you abstract from the peculiar determination of 
color, weight, smell, etc. ; and hence any thing which 
fills space, and is impenetrable, and has weight, may 
now be a body, however different in regard to those 
specific determinations. (The science of knowledge 
determines what determinations are more universal 
or more special, and hence what conceptions are 
higher or lower. A conception is higher in pro- 
portion as the mediating conceptions, whereby it 
is deduced from the highest, (that of reality,) are 
less. Y is a lower conception than X, if X occurs 
first in the series of its deduction from the highest 
conception, and vice versa)) 

Quite different is it in regard to the absolutely 
posited, the Ego. A Non-Ego is posited in relation 
to it, and at the same in opposition to it, not in 
a higher conception, however, (which in that case 
would contain both, and would presuppose a higher 
synthesis, or at least a higher thesis,) but in a lower 
conception. The Ego itself is posited into a lower 
conception, that of divisibility, so that it may be 
posited in relation (equality) to the Non-Ego ; and 
in the same conception of divisibility it is also op- 



94 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

posited to the Non-Ego. Hence, there is here no 
ascent, as in every other synthesis, but a descent. 
The Ego and the Non-Ego, as posited in equaUty 
and opposition to each other, are both something 
(accidences) in the Ego, as divisible substance, and 
posited through the Ego as absolute and unli- 
/mitable substance, to which nothing is equal and 
nothing opposed. Hence, all judgments, of which 
the limitable.or determinable Ego is logical sub- 
ject, ~or of which something that determines the 
, Ego is logical subject, must be limited or deter- 
mined through something higher ; but all judg- 
ments, of which the absolute, undeterminable Ego 
is logical subject, can be determined by nothing 
higher, because the absolute Ego is determined 
through nothing higher ; they have their ground 
and their determination altogether in themselves. 
Now, in this consists the essence of critical philo- 
sophy, that an absolute Ego is established as abso- 
lutely unconditioned and determinable by nothing 
higher than itself ; and in following up the results 
of this fundamental principle that philosophy be- 
comes science of knowledge. 

On the other hand, that philosophy is called dog- 
matic, which establishes something else as both 
equal and opposed to the Ego ; which something 
else is its pretendedly higher conception of the 
thing (ens) arbitrarily "established by that philo- 
sophy as the highest of all conceptions. In critical 
philosophy the thing is posited in the Ego, in dog- 
matic philosophy the Ego in the thing ; critical phi- 



THE SCIENC'E OF KNOWLEDGE. 95 

losophy is, therefore, immanent, because it posits all ^ 
in the Ego ; dogmatism is, on the contrary, transcen- ^ 
dent, because it proceeds beyond the Ego. In so far 
as dogmatism can be logical, Spinozism is its most 
logical product. If you wish to treat dogmatism 
from its own stand-point, as should be done, ask it 
why it assumes a thing in itself without higher 
ground, whereas it did ask for a higher ground in 
the case of the Ego. Ask the dogmatist. Why do 
you accept the thing as absolute, since you would 
not' accept the Ego as absolute .■" He can show no 
warrant for so doing, and you are perfectly justified 
in requiring him to hold fast to his own principles, 
and to assume nothing without a ground ; hence, 
to give you again a higher conception as the 
ground of the thing, and then again a higher con- 
ception for that higher conception, and so on ad 
infinitum. 

A thorough dogmatism either denies altogether 
that our knowledge has a ground, and that there is 
a system in the human mind, or it contradicts it- 
self. A logical dogmatism is a skepticism, which 
doubts that it doubts, for it must cancel the unity 
of consciousness, and hence the whole logic. It is, 
therefore, no dogmatism, and contradicts itself by 
pretending to be one. 

Thus Spinoza posits the ground of the unity of 
consciousness in a substance wherein it is neces- 
sarily determined as well in regard to its content 
(that is, in regard to its determined series of repre- 
sentation) as in regard to its form of unity. But I 



96 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

ask him : What, then, is that, again, which contains 
the ground of the necessity of this substance, as 
well in regard to its content (in regard to the dif- 
ferent series of representations contained in it) as 
in regard to its form, (the form that in it all possible 
series of representation are to be exhausted, and 
to constitute a complete whole ?) Now for this ne- 
cessity he gives no further ground, but says : It is 
so absolutely ; and he says this because he is com- 

' pelled to assume some absolute first, some highest 
unity ; but if he wants to do this, why did he not 
stop at the unity given in consciousness ? Why 
did he go beyond and imagine a higher unity, since 
nothing forced him to do so ?* 

It would be absolutely impossible to explain how 
thinkers ever could have gone beyond the Ego, oi", 
if they once went beyond it, how they ever could 

/have come to a stand-still, if there were not a prac- 
tical reason which explains this phenomenon. It 
was a practical and not a theoretical ground, as 
they believed, which drove dogmatists to transcend 
the Ego ; namely, a feeling of the dependence of 
our Ego, in so far as it is practical, upon a Non- 
Ego, which is in so far absolutely not subject to 
our legislation, and which 'is hence in so far free. 
Again, it was a practical reason which compelled 

( Translator's Note. — This criticism of Spinoza applies with equal 
force to the school of dogmatic idealists which followed Fichte, and 
which found its highest representatives in Schelling and Hegel. 
Believing that they must go beyond the Ego and discover some 
other absolute — not so " subjective," as they foolishly fancied the 
Ego to be^they fell into the same pit.) 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 97 

them to come to a stand-still somewhere ; namely, 
the feeling of necessary subordination of the Non- 
Ego to the practical laws of the Ego. But this 
subordination has not at all existence as object of a 
conception, but simply as object of an idea ; as 
something which is to be effected through us in 
an endless time, as will appear hereafter. 

And thus it appears, after all, that dogmatism is 
not at all what it pretends to be, and that we have 
done it wrong in logically carrying out its princi- 
ples. Its highest unity is indeed no other one than 
the unity of consciousness, and can be no other 
one ; and its thing is the substrate of divisibility 
generally, or the highest substance, wherein both 
the Ego and the Non-Ego ( Spinoza s Intelligence 
and Extension) are posited. 

Far from going beyond the absolute Ego, it 
never reaches even so far ; at the utmost, as in 
Spinoza's system, it goes to our second and third 
principles, but not to the first unconditioned one. 
It was reserved for critical philosophy to take this 
last step, and thus to complete the science. ,> 

The first part of our system (the theoretical) is 
really, as will be seen hereafter, systematic Spino- 
zism ; but our system also has a second, practical 
part, through which the first part is grounded and 
determined, the whole science of knowledge com- 
pleted, every thing which occurs in the human 
mind exhausted, and thus common-sense, which all 
pre-Kantian philosophy insulted, and which our 

theoretical system seems to bring into a collision 

9 



98 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

with philosophy, which has no hope of evef being 
settled, forever reconciled with our science. 

By completely abstracting from the determined 
form of the judgment in our third principle, name- 
ly, that it is an oppositing or r^/«^2«^ judgment, and 
looking only at the general manner of acting in it, 
namely, to limit one through another, we obtain 
the category of determination, (or, as Kant calls it, 
limitation.) For the positing of quantity generally, 
be it quantity of reality or of negation, is called 



11. 

Theoretical Part 

OF THE 

SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



THEORETICAL PART 

OF THE 

SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



INTRODUCTORY. 

We have now established three logical proposi- 
tions : that of Identity, which grounds all others ; 
and those of Opposition and of the Ground, which 
mutually ground each other in the first. The latter 
two make synthesis generally possible, establish 
and furnish the ground of its form. Hence, we 
need nothing more to be certain of the formal 
validity of our future reflection. On the other 
hand, the first synthetical act, whereby we have 
united the Ego and the Non-Ego, has given us a 
content for all future syntheses ; and, hence, we also 
need nothing further from this side. Our whole 
science of knowledge must be developed out of that 
first synthesis. 

But, if any thing is to be developed out of it, the 
conceptions united in that synthesis must contain 
other conceptions not yet established or united, 
and our task is, therefore, now to discover them ; 
which is done by looking up opposite character- 

9* 



102 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

istics in the conceptions of that synthesis, (which 
opposites were the Ego and Non-Ego, as mutually 
determining each other,) and this looking up is 
done through reflection, which is an arbitrary act 
of our mind. Our task is to discover them now, I 
said ; and this expression involves the presupposi- 
tion that they exist already, and are not, therefore, to 
be artificially made and produced by our reflection, 
(which, indeed, reflection could not do.) In other 
words, an originally necessary antithetical act of 
the Ego is presupposed. Reflection has to dis- 
cover that act ; and is in so far analytical. For to 
become conscious of opposite characteristics con- 
tained in a certain conception = A, as opposites, 
is, to analyze that conception A. In the present 
instance, however, our reflection is to analyze a 
conception, not at all given, but which must first 
be found through the analysis ; and the question 
arises here, therefore. How can an unknown con- 
ception be analyzed ? 

No antithetical act without a synthetical act, (§ 3.) 
Both are one and the same act, distinguished only 
in reflection. Hence, from the antithesis we can 
conclude as to the synthesis, and the third, wherein 
both are related, we can also establish ; not as pro- 
duct of the reflection, but as its discovery ; and as 
product only of that original synthetical act of the 
Ego ; which, for the very reason that it is such 
act, can not enter empirical consciousness. Hence, 
we shall hereafter meet only such synthetical acts, 
but which are not unconditional acts like the first. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. IO3 

Our deduction proves, however, that they are acts 
of the Ego ; for this they are as sure as the first 
synthesis, from which they result, and with which 
they constitute one and the same, is an act of the 
Ego ; and that first synthesis is such an act as sure 
as the highest deed-act of the Ego, that is, its self- 
positing, is such an act. 

Hence, the acts we shall hereafter establish are 
synthetical, although the reflection which establishes 
them is analytical. 

Those antitheses, however, which have been pre- 
supposed for the possibility of an analysis through 
reflection, must be thought as presupposed, that is, 
as such from which the possibility of our future 
synthetical conceptions is dependent. But no auti- 
thesis is possible without synthesis. Hence, a 
higher synthesis is presupposed in advance of 
them, and our first business must be to look this 
synthesis up and establish it definitely. True, it 
has been already established in our § 3. But it 
may appear necessary to determine it in this part 
of our work more definitely. 

DIREMPTION OF THE SYNTHESIS. 

The synthesis of our § 3 was this : 

In and through the Ego both the Ego and the 
Non-Ego are posited as each limitable through the 
other; that is, the reality of the one canceling that 
of the other, and vice versa. 

This synthesis involves, the following two pro- 
positions : 



I04 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

I. The Ego posits the Non-Ego as limited through 
the Ego. 

This proposition, which, in the practical part of 
our science will be of vast importance, seems use- 
less to us here. For as yet the Non-Ego is noth- 
ing, has no reality ; and it is, therefore, inconceiv- 
able how the Ego can limit a reality in the Non- 
Ego, which the Non-Ego has not got as yet. True, 
the proposition from which it results, the Ego and 
Non-Ego mutually limit each other, is posited ; but 
v/hether that proposition really involves the present 
one is the as yet problematical part. Perhaps the 
Ego can only be limited by the Non-Ego, in so far 
as it has first limited the Non-Ego, as the limiting 
has first proceeded from the Ego. Perhaps the 
Non-Ego does not limit the Ego in itself at all, but 
only the limiting of the Ego ; in which case our 
synthesis would remain true, although no reality 
were ascribed to the Non-Ego, and although the 
above problematical proposition were not involved 
in the synthesis. 

2. The Ego posits itself as limited through the 
Non-Ego. 

Of this proposition we can make use, and it must 
be accepted as certain, since it follows from the 
synthesis. For in it the Ego is posited first as ab- 
solute reality, and next as limitable reality, and 
limitable through the Non-Ego. 

It will appear that the second proposition grounds 
the theoretical part of our science, of course only 
after its completion ; and that the first one grounds 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. lOS 

the practical part of our science. But since the 
first one is itself problematical, the possibility of 
such a practical part also remains as yet problem- 
atical. Hence, our reflection must proceed from 
the theoretical part, although it will appear here- 
after that, far from it making possible the practical 
part, the practical part, on the contrary, makes pos- 
sible it. (Reason is in itself only practical, and 
becomes theoretical only in applying its laws to a 
limiting Non-Ego.) In other words, this seeming 
subordination in our system of the practical to the 
theoretical part results from this : That the think- ' 
ability of the practical principle is grounded in the 
thinkabiUty of the theoretical principle. And in re- 
flection we only have to do with thinkability. We 
now begin our task. 

A. 

GENERAL SYNTHESIS OF THE OPPOSITES OF OUR 
PROPOSITION. 

The Ego posits itself as determined througfi the 
Non-Ego. This proposition has been deduced from 
our synthesis, and hence must be equally valid ; 
and that synthesis must be valid if the unity of 
consciousness is to remain, and the Ego is to be 
Ego. Let us now analyze it, that is, see what op- 
posites it involves. The Ego posits itself as deter- 
mincd through the Noti^Ego. Hence, the Ego is not 
to determine, but to be determined ; and the Non- 
Ego is to determine, that is, to limit the reality of 
the Ego. Our proposition involves, therefore, 



I06 THE. SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

1st The Non-Ego determines (actively) the Ego, 
(in so far passive.) 

But, again, the Ego posits itself, as determined, 
through absolute activity. It posits itself, it posits 
the Non-Ego, it posits both as limitable. It posits 
itjself as deterniined signifies, therefore, the same 
as, 

2d. The Ego determines, itself, (through absolute 
activity.) 

Both results^ evidently contradict each other ;. 
they, therefcJre, cancel each other, and the proposi- 
tion which involves them cancels itself But that 
proposition can not be canceled if the unity of con- 
sciousness is to remain. Hence, we must seek to 
unite the opposites involved in it. (To unite them, 
not through an arbitrary invention of reflection, 
but simply, as we said above, by discovering the 
point of union of these opposites in our conscious- 
ness, where this point of union must be, since the 
opposites must be in it.) 

The one proposition affirms what the other de- 
nies. Reality and negation are, therefore, to be 
united, and this is done through limitation or deter- 
mination. 

The Ego determines itself, involves : The Ego is 
absolute totality of reality. It can determine it- 
self only as reality, for it is posited absolutely as 
reality, (§ i,) and no negation is posited in it. And 
yet it is to determine itself. This can not signify, 
therefore, the Ego cancels part of its reality, for 
then it would be, a self-contradiction ; but it must 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. lO/ 

signify : Tlie Ego determines the reality, and by 
means thereof determines itself It posits all real- 
ity as an absolute quantum, and this reality is po- 
sited in the Ego, and there is no other reality but it. 
The Ego is, therefore, determined, in so far as the 
reality is determined. (This absolute act of the 
Ego, whereby it thus determines itself, is indeed 
the same as already established in § 3, but in the 
present place it was necessary more clearly to de- 
fine it.) 

Now, the Non-Ego is opposed to the Ego ; and 
in it is negation, as reality is in the Ego. If, there- 
fore, absolute totality of reality is posited in the 
Ego, absolute totality of negation must be posited 
in the Non-Ego ; and the negation itself must be 
posited as absolute totality. 

Both totalities are to be united through determi- 
nation. Hence, the Ego in part determines itself, 
and in part is determined. 

But both must be thought as one and the same ; ' 
that is, in the same respect in which the Ego is 
determined, it must determine itself, and vice versa. 

The Ego is determined signifies : Reality is can- 
celed in the Ego. Hence, if the Ego posits in it- 
self only part of the absolute totality of reality, it 
thereby cancels the rest of that totality in itself, 
positing this rest, by virtue of the law of opposi- 
tion, (§ 2,) and of equality of itself and all quantity, 
in the Non-Ego, (§ 3.) In other words, whatever 
parts of negation the Ego posits in itself, so many 
parts of reality it posits in the Non-Ego ; which 



I08 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

reality in the opposite for that very reason cancels 
the same reality in itself. 

The Ego, therefore, posits negation in itself, in so 
far as it posits reality in the Non-Ego, and vice 
versa ; it therefore posits itself as determining it- 
self in so far as it is determined, and as determined 
in so far as it determines itself, and our problem 
seems solved. 

We have thus undertaken a new synthesis. The 
conception it establishes is involved under the 
higher conception of determination, for it posits 
quantity. But if it is to be a new and other concep- 
tion, it must have a ground of distinction from the 
higher one. This its specific difference is, that, while 
the higher conception of determination generally 
establishes quantity, without investigating the How } 
or In what manner .' our present synthetical concep- 
tion establishes the quantity of the one through that 
of its opposite, and vice versa. This more deter- 
mined determination may, therefore, be called. Reci- 
procal Determination. (Kant calls it Relation)) 

B. 

PARTICULAR SYNTHESIS OF THE OPPOSITES CON- 
TAINED IN THE FIRST OF THE OPPOSITES OF 
OUR PROPOSITION, THROUGH THE CONCEPTION OF 
RECIPROCAL DETERMINATION. 

If the fundamental proposition of our theoretical 
part is to involve all the opposites, which are here 
to be united, and if, moreover, we could unite 
these opposites generally through the conception 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 109 

of reciprocal determination, then the opposites 
again involved in these first opposites must also be 
already indirectly united through that conception ; 
or, in other words, the synthetical conception, which 
unites these new opposites, must already be in- 
volved in the higher conception of reciprocal deter- 
mination. 

Hence, we must proceed with this conception 
precisely as we did with the conception of determi- 
nation generally, that is, restrict its sphere to a 
smaller extent by an additional condition ; whereby 
we shall obtain synthetical conceptions, involved 
under the higher conception of reciprocal determi- 
nation. 

The first opposite discovered in our proposition 
was this : The Non-Ego is to determine the Ego ; 
that is, to cancel reality in the Ego. This it can 
only on the condition that it has in itself the same 
part of reality to be canceled in the Ego. Result : 
The Non-Ego has in itself reality. 

But all reality is posited in the Ego; and the non- 
Ego is opposed to the Ego, and hence has only ne- 
gation. All Non-Ego is negation, and it, therefore, 
has no reality at all in itself. 

Both results cancel each other ; but they are in- 
volved in the result : the Non-Ego determines the 
Ego. Hence, that result cancels itself But it can 
not cancel itself without destroying the unity of 
consciousness. Hence, it can not cancel itself ; 
and the opposites must be unitable. 

Our conception of reciprocal determination did 
10 



no THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

not unite them ; for by it we only obtained this re- 
sult : If the absolute totality of reality is posited as 
divisible, then we can certainly take parts from the 
Ego, and must, under that condition, posit these 
parts in its opposite, the Non-Ego. But the ques- 
tion, How can we posit the reality of the Ego as di- 
visible and abstract parts from it ? or. What justifies 
and compels us to establish any reciprocal determi- 
nation ? was left unanswered. 

In other words, Reality is absolutely posited in the 
Ego. But our § 3 posited the Non-Ego as a quan- 
tum, and every quantum is a something, hence also 
reality. Now, the Non-Ego is to be negation ; hence, 
as it were, a real negation, a negative quantity. 

According to the conception of mere relation, it 
is altogether the same to which of the two oppo- 
sites you ascribe reality and to which negation. It 
all depends from which of the two reflection starts, 
(It is thus in mathematics, a science which com- 
pletely abstracts from quality, and looks only to 
quantity.) So also here, as far as the result esta- 
blished by reciprocal determination is concerned. 
That conc-eption says only, Whatever is negation 
in the Ego is reality in the Non-Ego, and vice versa ; 
leaving it altogether in my discretion to call the 
Ego reality or negation. That conception estab- 
lishes only a relative reality. This ambiguity must 
be removed, or the whole unity of consciousness i^ 
canceled ; for, if it is not removed, the Ego is real- 
ity and the non-Ego is also reality ; both are no 
longer opposites, and the Ego is not = Ego, but is 
= Non-Eg^o. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. Ill 

We must, therefore, try to remove this ambi- 
guity ; and by removing it we shall probably be 
enabled to unite the contradiction discovered in the 
proposition : the Non-Ego determines the Ego. 

The Ego is the source of all reality. But the*^ 
Ego is because it posits itself, and vice versa. 
Hence, to posit itself and to be is the same. But 
the conceptions of self-positing and of activity ge- 
nerally are also one and the same. All reality \^/ 
therefore, active ; and every thing active is reality. 
Activity is positive (in opposition to mere relative) 
reality. 

It is important to think this conception of acti- 
vity here pure. It is to signify nothing not con- 
tained in the absolute self-positing of the Ego ; 
nothing not immediately contained in the T am. 
Hence, not only all conditions of time, but also all 
object of activity, must here be abstracted from. 
In positing itself, the deed-act of the Ego is not '' 
directed upon any object at all, but simply returns 
into itself Only when the Ego arrives at repre-/ 
senting itself does it become object. 

The Ego is to be determined, that is, reality or 
activity is to be canceled in it. Hence, the oppo- 
site of activity is posited in it, namely, passivity. 
For passivity is positive negation, in opposition to, 
mere relative negation. (Of course, here also all 
conditions of time must be abstracted from, as well 
as an activity producing this passivity. For pas- 
sivity is as yet the mere negation of the above pure 
conception of activity, and, of course, its quantita- 



112 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

tive negation, since that conception of activity is 
also quantitative ; and since the mere negation of 
activity, without regard to quantity, would be = O 
or rest. Every thing in the Ego, which is not thus 
immediately in virtue of the / am, which is not im- 
mediately posited in the self-positing of the Ego, is 
for the 'E.go passivity, or affection generally.) 

If the absolute totality of reality is to remain 
when the Ego is passive, then, by the law of reci- 
procal determination, an equal degree of activity 
must be transferred into the Non-Ego. 

And this solves the above contradiction. The 
Non-Ego has no reality in itself as Non-Ego, but it 
has reality in so far as the Ego is passive, by the law 
of reciprocal determination. 

This result, that the Non-Ego has (at least as yet) 
no reality for the Ego, except in so far as the Ego 
is affected, is very important in its consequences. 

The here deduced synthetical conception is in- 
volved in the higher one of reciprocal determina- 
tion, for the quantity of the one is in it determined 
through that of the other. But it is also specifical- 
ly different from it. For under the conception of 
reciprocal determination, it was all the same to 
which of the two reality or negation was ascribed ; 
only quantity and mere quantity was determined. 
Whereas here it is not the same, but decided which 
of the two has reality and which negation .' The 
present synthesis posits, therefore, activity ; and the 
same degree of activity in the one as of passivity 
in its opposite. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. I13 

This synthesis is called the synthesis of causality. 
That to which activity is ascribed, and in so far not 
passivity, is called cause, (original reality ;) that to 
which passivity is ascribed, and in so far not acti- 
vity, is called effect, (dependent reality.) 

(Here also empirical time conditions must be 
altogether abstracted from. Partly because we 
have not yet deduced time, and have, therefore, no 
right to use its conception ; partly because it is un- 
true that the cause, as such, that is, as active in the 
effect, must be thought in time in advance of the 
effect. Cause and effect, by virtue of their synthe- u 
tic unity, are- to be thought as one and the same. 
Not the cause, as such, but the substance, to which 
the causality is attributed, precedes the effect in 
time, from reasons which will appear hereafter. 
But in this respect the substance in which the ef- 
fect occurs also precedes the effect produced in it.) 



C. 



PARTICULAR SYNTHESIS OF THE OPPOSltES CON- 
TAINED IN THE SECOND OF THE OPPOSITES OF 
OUR PROPOSITION, THROUGH THE CONCEPTION 
OF RECIPROCAL DETERMINATION. 

The second opposite discovered in our funda- 
mental proposition was this : 

The Ego determines itself. This proposition con- 
tains itself two opposites, namely : 

1st. The Ego determines itself ; is active. 
10* 



114 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

2d. -It determines itself ; is that which is deter- 
, mined, and hence is passive. 

That is to say, the Ego is, in one and the same 
act, both active and passive ; which doubtless is a 
contradiction. This contradiction must be solved 
through the conception of reciprocal determination. 
It would be completely solved if its two opposites 
could be thus interpreted : The Ego determines its 
passivity through its activity, and vice versa. For 
in that case it would be both active and passive in 
one and the same act. The question is. Is that in- 
terpretation correct, and how can it be correct } 

The possibility of all determination (measuring) 
presupposes a standard of a measure. This stan- 
dard can only be the Ego, because only the Ego is 
absolutely posited. 

Now, in the Ego is posited reality. Hence, the 
Ego must be posited as absolute totality (hence, as 
a quantum, containing all quanta, and being, there- 
fore, a measure for all quanta) of reality ; and it 
must be thus posited originally and absolutely, if 
our problematical synthesis is to be possible, and the 
contradiction satisfactorily solved. 

The Ego, therefore, posits absolutely — without 
any ground, and under no possible condition — abso- 
lute totality of reality as a quantum, beyond which 
no greater quantum is possible ; and this absolute 
maximum of reality it posits in itself. (Every 
thing posited in the Ego is reality ; and all reality 
which is, is posited in the Ego. (§ i.) But this 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. IIS 

reality is a quantum, and an absolutely posited 
quantum. (§ 3.) ) 

Through this absolutely posited standard, the 
quantity of a deficiency of reality is to be deter- 
mined. But deficiency is nothing, and the deficient 
is nothing, (is not determined.) Hence, it can only 
be thus determined, that the remaining reality be 
determined. The Ego can, therefore, only deter- 
mine the restricted quantity of its reality ; and only 
through this determination of a quantity, of reality 
is it possible to determine the quantity of negation, 
(by means of reciprocal determination.) 

A determined quantum of reality is itself nega- 
tion, namely, negation of the totality. Every deter- 
mined quantum is Non-Totality. 

But if such a quantum is to be opposited to total- 
ity, and hence related to it, a ground of relation of 
both must be shown up ; and this ground is the 
conception of divisibility. (§ 3.) 

In the absolute totality there are no parts ; but it 
can be related to and opposed to parts ; and thus 
the above contradiction is solved. 

To show this more clearly, let us reflect on the 
conception of reality. This conception is equal to 
the conception of activity. All reality is posited 
in the Ego signifies, all activity is posited in the 
Ego ; all in the Ego is reality signifies, the Ego A 
is only active ; it is Ego only in so far as it is ac- sj 
tive, and in so far as it is not active it is Non-Ego'. 

All passivity is not - activity. Passivity can, -J 
therefore, be only determined by being related to 



tl6 THE SCIENCE OF KNOtVLEDGE. 

activity. A ground of relation must, therefore, be 
shown up. This can only be the general ground of 
relation of reality and negation ; that is, quantity. 
Passivity is relatable to activity through quantity 
signifies : Passivity is a quantum of activity. 

To think a quantum of activity presupposes a 
standard of activity, that is, activity generally ; 
(what we called above totality of reality.) The 
quantum generally is the measure. 

If all activity is posited in the Ego, then the po- 
siting of a quantum of activity is a lessening of that 
activity ; and such a quantum, in so far as it is not 
the total activity, is passivity, although in itself it is 
activity. 

Hence, through the positing of a quantum of ac- 
tivity, and through the opposition of this quantum 
to activity — not in so far as it is activity generally, 
but in so far as it is all (the total) activity — a passi- 
vity is posited ; that is, that quantum of activity «j 
such is itself posited and determined as passivity. 

We have now found an X which is reality and 
negation, activity and passivity together. 

X is activity in so far as it is related to the Non- 
Ego, because it is posited in the Ego, in the posit- 
ing, active Ego. 

X is passivity in so far as it is related to the to- 
tality of activity. It is not that acting generally, 
but is a determined acting ; a particular manner of 
acting contained in the sphere of general acting. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. II7 

Illustration. 

Draw a circular line, = A ; and the whole plane 
inclosed by it, = X, is opposed to the infinite plane 
of infinite space which remains excluded. Now, 
draw within A another circular line, = B, and the 
plane inclosed by it, Y, is, firstly, included in A, 
and, together with the X of A, opposed to the in- 
finite space excluded by A ; hence, in so far, fully 
equal to X. But if you regard Y as, secondly, in- 
cluded in B, it is opposed to the infinite space ex- 
cluded by B, and hence also opposed to that part 
of X which is not contained in it. Y is, therefore, 
opposed to itself ; it is either a part of the plane 
X, or it is its own plane Y. 

Again, / think is, firstly, an expression of activity ; 
the Ego is posited as thinking, and in so far as ac- 
tive. It is also an expression of negation, of pas- 
sivity ; for thinking is a particular determination of 
the Ego, and the conception thereof excludes all 
other determinations. Hence, the conception of 
thinking is opposed to itself ; it signifies an activity 
when related to the thought object, and a passi- 
vity when related to the Ego generally, for the Ego 
must be limited if thinking is to be possible. 

Every possible predicate of the Ego signifies a 
limitation thereof. The subject Ego is the abso- 
lutely active, or self-positing. Through the predi- 
cate, I think, I represent, etc., this activity is in- 
cluded in a determined sphere. 

It is now clear enough how the Ego can deter- 



Il8 THE SCIENCE- OF KNOWLEDGE. 

mine through its activity its passivity, and how it 
can be both active and passive together. It deter- 
mines itself, is the determining, the active, in so far 
as through absolute spontaneity it posits itself in 
one of all the spheres contained in the totality of 
its reality ; and in so far as we reflect merely on 
this its absolute positing itself into the sphere, and 
not on the limit of the sphere. 

It is determined, passive, in so far as we look upon 
it merely as posited in this limited sphere, abstract- 
ing from the spontaneity of the positing. We have 
found the original synthetical act of the Ego, where- 
by our contradiction has been solved ; and through 
it we have discovered a new synthetical conception 
which we have still to examine a little closer. Like 
the above conception of causality,' it is a closer 
determined reciprocal determination ; and we shall 
obtain in both conceptions the completest insight 
by comparing them with each other. 

According to. the rules of general determination',, 
both conceptions, that of causality and our new 
one, must be, ist. Equal to reciprocal determina- 
tion ; 2d, Opposed to it ; 3d, Equal to each other ; 
and, 4th, Opposed to each other. 

They are equal to reciprocal determination in 
this, that in them, as in it, activity is determined 
through passivity, or reality through negation, and 
vice versa. 

Opposed to it in this, that, whereas by the con- 
ception of reciprocal determination a reciprocity is 
only posited, but not determined, these two concep- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 19 

tions determine the order of the reciprocity, and fix 
the rule by which to go from reality to negation, or 
vice versa. 

Equal to each other, because in both conceptions 
the order is fixed. 

Opposed to each other in regard to the order of 
the reciprocity. In the conception of causality, ac- 
tivity is determined through passivity ; in our pre- 
sent conception, passivity is determined through 
activity. 

in so far as the Ego is regarded as embracing <* 
the whole absolutely determined sphere of all real- 
ities, it is substance. In so far as the Ego is posited 
in a not absolutely determined sphere, (how such a 
sphere may, nevertheless, be determined, we shall 
not investigate at present,) in so far the Ego is ac- 
cidental ; or, there is an accidence in the Ego. The 
limit, which separates acts of this particular sphere 
from the whole sphere, is that which makes the ac- 
cidence accidence, or is the ground of distinction 
between substance and accidence. This limit is in 
the whole sphere. Hence, the accidence is m and 
belonging to the substance ; it excludes something 
from the whole sphere. Hence, the accidence is 
not substance. 

No substance is thinkable without relation to an 
accidence ; for only through the positing of possible 
spheres within the absolute sphere does the Ego 
become substance ; only through possible accidences 
do realities arise ; for otherwise the reality would 
be simply one. The realities of the Ego are its >■ 



I20 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

modes of acting ; the Ego is substance, therefore, 
in so far as all its possible modes of acting (all its 
possible modes of being) are posited in it. 

No accidence is thinkable without substance ; for, 
to know something as a determined reality, it must 
be related to reality in general. 

The substance is all reciprocity, (interchange,) 
thought in general ; the accidence, a determined in- 
terchanging with another. 

Originally there is only one substance, the Ego. 
In it are posited all possible accidences, hence all 
possible realities. How several accidences, having 
some particular characteristic in common, may be 
comprehended together, and be themselves thought 
as substances, the accidences whereof are again 
mutually determined through the difference of those 
characteristics — this we shall see hereafter. 

The conception here established is called the 
conception of Substantiality. 

In the development of this conception we have 
left altogether unnoticed, ist. That activity of the 
Ego whereby it distinguishes and relates itself as 
substance and accidence ; and secondly. That which 
induces the Ego to undertake this act. (The lat- 
ter, we may suppose from our first synthesis, will 
show itself to be induced by the Non-Ego.) Hence, 
as in every synthesis, every thing is properly unit- 
ed and connected in the centre ; but the two end- 
points are left unconnected. 

This remark shows us again, from a new side, the 
method of our science. We must always continue 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 121 

to connect the opposites by central links ; but this 
does not completely solve the contradiction, and 
only removes it further from us. True, by a new 
central link we remove the contradiction last shown 
up ; but, in order to remove it, we have been forced 
to assume new end-points, which are again oppo- 
sites, and must again be united. 

The true and highest problem to be solved is^/ 
this : How can the Ego and the Non-Ego imme- 
diately determine each other, since they are both 
complete opposites 1 

We pla:ce some X between them, upon which- 
both may direct their causality, and thus, at least 
indirectly, influence each other. But we soon dis- 
cover that in this X there must also be a point 
somewhere in which the Ego and Non-Ego imme- 
diately connect. To prevent this, we interpose a 
new link = Y. But we soon discover that in Y 
also there must be a point wherein the opposites 
immediately connect. And in this way we should 
continue infinitely, if reason did not interpose its 
absolute assertion — which the philosopher does not 
create, but simply show up. There shall be no 
Non-Ego ! The Ego shall be absolutely self-de- 
termined! Whereby the knot is not untied, but 
cut to pieces. 

Or, in so far as the Ego is limited by the Non- 
Ego, it is finite ; but in itself, as posited through 
its own absolute activity, it is infinite. These two, 
infinity and finity, are to be united in the Ego. 

But such a uniting is in itself impossible. For a 
11 



122 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

long time we allay the conflict through mediation ; 
the infinite limits the finite. But finally, when the 
complete impossibility of the uniting is seen, finity 
must be altogether canceled ; all limits must vanish, 
and the infinite Ego must remain alone as the one 

and as all. 

Example. 

Posit in space ^ A, in the point m, light ; and 
in the point n, darkness. Now, since space is 
continuous, and since there is no hiatus between m 
and n, there must be between both points some- 
where a point o, which point is both light and 
darkness. But this is a contradiction. Hence, you 
place between both a connecting link, dimness. 
Let this extend from p to q, and dimness will be 
limited by light in p, and by darkness in q. But 
thereby you have not solved the contradiction ; for 
dimness is mixture of light and darkness. Now, 
light and darkness can limit each other in p only, 
if p is both light and dimness together ; and since 
dimness is distinguished from light only in this, 
that it is also darkness, p must be both light and 
darkness together. So likewise in the point q. The 
contradiction can, therefore, be only solved thus : 
Light and darkness are not at all opposites, but are 
merely to be distinguished in degrees. Darkness 
is only a very small quantity of light. 

It is precisely thus with the Ego and the Non- 
Ego. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 23 



D. 



SYNTHESIS OF THE OPPOSITION BETWEEN THE TWO 
DISCOVERED MODES OF RECIPROCAL DETERMINA- 
TION, CAUSALITY AND SUBSTANTIALITY. 

The Ego posits itself as detennined through the 
Non-Ego ; this was the chief synthesis from which 
we started, and which could not be canceled with- 
out canceling the unity of consciousness. It in- 
volved, however, contradictions ; and these we had 
to solve. First arose the question : How can the 
Ego both determine and be determined f By means 
of the conception of reciprocal determination we 
were enabled to say, to determine and to be deter- 
mined is one and the same ; by positing a quantum 
of negation in itself, the Ego posits the same quan- 
tum of reality in the Non-Ego, and vice versa. But 
the question remained : In which is reality to be 
posited, in the Ego or in the Non-Ego .' 

By means of the conception of causality we were 
enabled to say, negation or passivity must be posit- 
ed in the Ego ; and hence the same quantum of 
reality of activity is posited in the Non-Ego. ' Then 
the question arose : But how can passivity be posit- 
ed in the Ego .' 

Finally, by means of the conception of substan- 
tiality we were enabled to say, passivity and activity f' ' 
in the Ego is one and the same ; for passivity is 
only a smaller quantum of activity. 

But these answers have inclosed us in a circle. 



124 THS. SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

If the Ego posits a smaller degree of activity in 
itself, then, of course, it posits passivity in itself, 
and activity in the Non-Ego. But the Ego can not 
have the power to absolutely posit a lower degree 
of activity in itself, since, according to the concep- 
tion of substantiality, it posits all activity and noth- 
ing but activity in itself Hence, the positing of a 
lower degree of activity must be preceded by an 
activity of the Non-Ego, which must have first 
really canceled a part of the activity of the Ego. 
But this is equally impossible, since, according to 
the conception of causality, activity can be ascribed 
to the Non-Ego only iil so far as a passivity is pc 
sited in the Ego. 

In other words, under the conception of causality 
alone, it is well conceivable how an outside observer 
could ascribe activity to the Non-Ego ; but not 
how the Ego itself could ascribe the cause of its 
passivity to the activity of the Non-Ego. The Ego 
might be determined, but could never posit itself as 
determ'ined ; for the passivity in the Ego would be 
merely posited iti the Ego, but not posited in the 
'Ego for itself . 

On the other hand, under the conception of sub- 
stantiality, even supposing the Ego to have the 
power of absolutely limiting itself independently 
of any Non-Ego, and, moreover, the power of be- 
coming conscious of this limitation ; what warrant 
would the Ego have to refer its limitation to a Non- 
Ego .' To assume a Non-Ego as cause of the limi- 
tation ? None at all ; on the contrary, it would re- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. I2S 

gard itself as the cause thereof. Hence, the Ego 
would be determined, but not determined through 
the Non-Ego. 

Both conceptions in their separateness, therefore, 
do not explain what is to be explained, and the con- 
tradiction remains : If the Ego posits itself as de- 
termined, it is not determined through the Non- 
Ego'i and if it is determined through the Non-Ego, 
it does not posit itself as determined. 

Let us now establish this contradiction more 
definitely : 

The Ego can not posit itself as passive without 
positing activity in the Non-Ego ; but it can not 
posit activity in the Non-Ego without positing pas- 
sivity in itself. Hence, it can do neither alone. 

Result : 

1. The Ego does not posit passivity in itself, in 
so far as it posits activity in the Non-Ego, and vice 
versa ; it, therefore, does not posit at all. 

(Not the condition is denied, but the conditioned ; 
not the rule of reciprocal determination generally, 
but its application to the present instance.) 

2. But the Ego is to posit passivity in itself, and 
in so far activity in the Non-Ego, and vice versa. 

The one proposition denies what the secohd one 
affirms ; they are, therefore, related like negation 
and reality. These are united through quantity. 
Both propositions must be valid, hence they must 
be valid each only in part. Hence : 

The Ego ^o%\\.'& partly passivity in itself, in so far . 
as it posits activity in the Non-Ego ; but it posits 
11* 



125 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

partly not passivity in itself, in so far as it posits 
activity in the Ego, and vice versa. 

The Ego posits partly passivity and partly not 
passivity in the Non-Ego, in so far as it posits ac- 
tivity in the Ego. 

That is to say, an activity is posited in the Ego, 
to which no passivity in the Non-Ego corresponds ; 
and an activity in the Non-Ego, to which no passi- 
vity in the Ego corresponds. Let us call this sort 
of activity itidependent activity. But such an inde- 
pendent activity in the Ego and Non-Ego contra- 
dicts the law of oppositing, which has now been 
closer determined by the law of reciprocal determi- 
nation ; hence it contradicts chiefly the conception 
of reciprocal determination, which rules in our pre- 
sent investigation. For that conception says : All 
activity in the Ego determines a passivity of the 
Non-Ego, and vice versa ; and our new result estab- 
lishes an independent activity in the Ego, which 
does not determine a passivity in the Non-Ego, and 
n)ice versa. 

But both results must be valid. Hence, they 
must be united in quantity. Both must be valid 
only in part. The conception of reciprocal deter- 
mination is to be valid (j>nly in part, that is, is itself 
to be determined, to have its validity confined by a 
certain rule to a particular extent. Or the inde- 
'pendent activity of our result is to be independent 
only to a certain extent. 

In the Ego is to be an activity determining and 
determined by a passivity in the Non-Ego ; and in 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 27 

the Non-Ego is also to be an activity determining 
and determined by a passivity of the Ego. To this 
activity and passivity the conception of reciprocal 
determination is applicable. 

At the same time, there is to be in the Ego and 
in the Non-Ego an independent activity, not deter- 
mining a passivity in the other. 

Both propositions are to be valid. It must be 
possible, therefore, to think them as united through 
a synthetical conception in one and the same act. 

Such a conception would be about as follows : 

The reciprocal activity and passivity determines 
the independent activity, and the independent activity 
determines the reciprocal activity and passivity. If 
this be true, then, 

1. The independent activities of the Ego and 
Non-Ego do not reciprocally determine each other 
directly, but only indirectly, through their recipro- 
cally determined activity and passivity. 

2. And the law of reciprocal determination is 
valid only in so far as related to the reciprocal acti- 
vity and passivity and independent activity ; but is 
not valid as related to independent activity alone. 

This result involves the following three proposi- 
tions : 

1. An independent activity is determined through 
reciprocal activity and passivity. 

2. An independent activity determines the reci- 
procal activity and passivity. 

3. Both are mutually determined through each 
other ; and it is all the same whether we proceed 



128 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

from reciprocal activity and passivity to indepen- 
dent activity, or vice versa. 



An independent activity is determined through re- 
ciprocal activity and passivity. 

Concerning this proposition, we have first to in- 
quire its significance, and next to apply it to the 
conceptions of causality and substantiality in their 
contradiction. 

Its significance. We have said before, that our 
present undertaking involves a restriction of the 
conception of reciprocal determination. This is 
done by showing the ground of the application of 
that conception. 

According to that conception, by positing acti- 
vity in the one, (the Ego or Non-Ego,) passivity is 
immediately posited in its opposite, and vice versa. 
It is also clear from the rule of opposition, that, if 
a passivity is to be posited, it must be posited in 
the opposite of the active. But why is passivity to 
be posited at all, that is, why is a reciprocal deter- 
mination to occur at all .-' 

Activity and passivity, as such, are opposed ; and 
yet passivity is immediately posited through acti- 
vity, and vice versa. Hence, they must be equal to 
each other in a third conception, = X, which makes 
possible the transition from the one to the other, 
without destroying the unity of consciousness. 
This third is the ground of relation between activity 
and passivity in the reciprocity, (§ 3.) 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 29 

This ground of relation is not dependent upon 
reciprocal determination, but the latter is depen- 
dent upon it, becomes possible only through that 
ground of relation. True, in reflection, this ground 
is posited through reciprocal determination, but also 
posited as independent of it and its reciprocity. 

This ground is, moreoA*er, determined in reflection 
through the reciprocity ; that is, if the reciprocal de- 
termination is posited, the ground of relation of its 
activity and passivity is posited in that sphere, 
which contains within it the sphere of reciprocal 
determination. In other words, through this ground 
of relation a higher sphere is posited round about 
the sphere of reciprocal determination. The ground 
of relation fills up the sphere of determination in 
general, while reciprocal determination fills up only 
a part of that sphere. 

This ground is a reality ; or, if reciprocal deter- 
mination is thought as an act, is an activity. And 
thus an independent activity is determined through 
reciprocal activity and passivity. 

APPLICATION UNDER CONCEPTION OF CAUSALITY, 

By means of this conception, which gave us the 
first instance of an activity and passivity mutually 
determining each other, an activity of the Non-Ego 
is posited through a passivity of the Ego. This 
first instance of a reciprocal determination (of a re- 
ciprocity, as we shall usually call it) is now to de- 
termine and posit an independent activity. 



130 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

The reciprocal determination in this instance 
starts from passivity. Passivity is posited, and 
through and by means of passivity activity ^is posit- 
ed. The passivity is posited in the Ego. Hence, 
if an activity is posited in opposition to the passi- 
vity, the activity must be posited in the Non-Ego, 
the opposite, according to- the conception of reci- 
procal determination. Of course, in this transition 
from the Ego to the Non-Ego, there is also a ground 
of relation which we know already as quantity. 
(The absolute totality of reality or activity is always 
the same. If only part of it is posited in the Ego, 
or if passivity is posited in the Ego, the correspond- 
ing part of reality or activity is posited in the Non- 
Ego.) This ground of relation can be properly 
called here the ideal ground ; and, hence, the passi- 
vity of the Ego is the ideal ground of the activity 
of the Non-Ego. (Namely, since the whole activity 
is not posited in the Ego, the part not posited in 
the Ego is posited in the Non-Ego.) 

But why is an activity to be posited at all as op7 
posite of the passivity in the Ego, from which the 
conception of reciprocal determination starts. If it 
is posited, it must, certainly, as we have shown, be 
posited in the Non-Ego ; but why is it to be posited 
at all, why is the conception of reciprocal determi- 
nation to be applied here at all .'' 

In the Ego is posited a passivity ; that is, a quan- 
tum of its activity is canceled. This passivity, or 
this diminution of its activity, must have a ground ; 
for the canceled activity is a quantum, and every 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 13I 

quantum is determined through -another quantum, 
by means of which it is neither a smaller nor a 
larger quantum, but precisely this quantum, accord- 
ing to the law of determination in general, (§ 3.) 

In the Ego the ground of this diminution can not 
be, for the Ego only posits activity in itself, and not 
passivity ; it posits itself as being, not as not-being. 
Hence, the ground, by virtue of the law of opposi- 
tion, (§ 2,) must be posited in the Non-Ego ; or the 
Non-Ego contains the ground of this diminution. 

Here we speak no longer of mere quantity, but 
of quality. Passivity is opposed to the Ego here 
in so far as the Ego is only activity, and hence the 
ground of it can not be posited in the Ego, but 
must be posited in the Non-Ego. Now, the ground 
of a quality is called real ground. An activity of 
the Non-Ego, independent of the reciprocal deter- 
mination of the two opposites of activity and pas- 
sivity, nay, presupposed for the very possibility of 
that reciprocity, is thus the real ground of the pas- 
sivity of the Ego ; and this independent activity is 
posited, so that we may have a real ground of that 
passivity. Hence, through the above reciprocity is 
posited an independent activity, (of the Non-Ego.) 
We have now seen how, through the reciprocity 
between passivity of the Ego and activity of the 
Non-Ego, an independent activity of the Non-Ego 
is posited and determined. It is posited in order to 
get a ground for a passivity posited in the Ego ; 
and hence extends no further than this passivity. 
There is, hence, no original reality and activity of 



132 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE 

the Non-Ego for the Ego, except in so far as the 
Ego is passive. No passivity in the Ego, no acti- 
vity in the Non-Ego. This result is valid even when 
this activity is spoken of as an activity, indepen- 
dent of the conception of causality. Even the 
thing in itself is only in so far as the conception of 
causality extends, and has validity only in so far as, 
at least, the possibility of passivity is presupposed 
in the Ego. (A result which will receive its com- 
plete determination and applicability only in the 
practical part of our science.) 

Let it, therefore, be well remembered, that the 
conclusion as to the Non-Ego being real ground is . 
valid only in so far as it is true that the passivity 
in the Ego is qtialitative ; which it is only in the 
conception of causality. 

As soon as we get to the second reciprocal con- 
ception, substantiality, we shall see that under that 
conception the passivity of the Ego can not be 
thought at all as qualitative, but only as quantita- 
tive, as diminished activity ; and that under that 
conception, therefore, the Non-Ego again becomes 
merely ideal ground. 

A philosophy which starts from positing the Non- 
Ego as cause of all representation, and the repre- 
sentation as its effect, and which thus posits the 
Non-Ego as the real ground of all, the Non-Ego 
being simply because it is and what it is, (Spino- 
za's Fate,) and the Ego being simply an accidence 
of the Non-Ego, and not substance at all ; such a 
system is a dogmatic Realism, (or material Spinoz- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 133 

ism,) a system which presupposes the impossibi- 
lity of making the highest abstraction, namely, 
abstraction from the Non-Ego ; and which is ut- 
terly ungrounded, as it does not establish any final \ 
ground. 

On the other hand, a system which makes the "' 
Ego the substance of representation, and represen- 
tation the accidence of the Ego, the Non-Ego be- 
ing not real ground thereof at all, but merely ideal, 
ground, and having, therefore, no reality beyond re- 
presentation — such a system is a dogmatic Ideal- 
ism. In such a system no ground can be assigned 
for the limitation of reality in the Ego, (for the 
affection through which a representation arises.) 
Such a system has certainly undertaken the highest 
abstraction, and is therefore completely grounded. 
But it is incomplete, because it does not explain 
what is to be explained. 

The true question in dispute between dogmatic V* 
Realism and dogmatic Idealism is, therefore, in 
which manner shall We explain Representation .? 
Through the conception of Causality ! asserts Real- 
ism. Through the conception of Substantiality ! 
asserts Idealism. 

In the theoretical part of our science this ques- '^ 

tion will remain undecided ; or, rather, it will be 

answered thus : Both modes of explanation are cor- , 

rect. Under certain conditions you must take the * 

one, and under certain conditions the other. (A 

system which shows up this is a Critical Idealism, 

such as Kant has established in completest form.) 

12 



134 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

But this answer involves human — that is, all 
finite — reason in self-contradiction ; and this con- 
■ tradiction must be solved. It is solved in the prac- 
tical part of our science. 
'^ The absolute being of the Ego can not be relin- 
quished without annihilating the Ego itself, and 
- hence the question is finally decided in favor of the 
' Ego, precisely as dogmatic Idealism decides it Our 
Idealism, however, not being dogmatic, does not 
assert this to be so, but shows, that it shall be so. 
In other words, our system explains the problem by 
positing the Ego (which is in so far practical) as 
an Ego which shall contain in itself the ground of 
the existence of the Non-Ego, through which the ac- 
tivity of the Ego as intelligence is diminished. This 
being an (in time) infinite idea, our explanation, in- 
stead of explaining, rather shows that and why what 
is to be explained can not be explained. (Or, that 
to ask for an explanation is a self-contradiction.) 

APPLICATION UNDER CONCEPTION OF SUBSTAN- 
TIALITY. 

By means of the conception of substantiality, 
through activity in the Ego a passivity in the Ega 
is posited and determined. The reciprocal deter-^ 
mination of this activity and passivity in the Ego 
was the second instance of reciprocal determination, 
which we discovered ; and this reciprocity is also 
to determine an independent activity. 

In themselves, passivity and activity are oppo- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWELDGE. 1 35 

sites ; and we have seen how it is possible that, 
through one and the same act which posits a cer- 
tain quantity of_ activity in the one, the same quan- 
tity of passivity can be posited in its opposite. But 
it is an evident contradiction that activity and pas- 
sivity should both together be posited, not in two 
opposites, but in one and the same, (in the Ego.) 

True, this contradiction has been partly solved 
in the general deduction of substantiality, by show- 
ing that passivity is in its quality nothing but di- 
minished activity, and is in its quantity only not the 
totality of activity ; and that it, therefore, can be 
related to the totality of activity, and can thus be 
posited as diminished activity. The ground of re- 
lation between both being thus activity. 

But if the Ego posits within itself diminished 
activity, and if the Non-Ego is also to have dimi- 
nished activity, how are both these diminished acti- 
vities to be distinguished } that is, how are the Ego 
and Non-Ego to be distinguished .'' For the ground 
of distinction between the Ego and the Non-Ego has 
been destroyed. 

Unless this distinction is possible, the required 
reciprocal determination is also not possible, and 
indeed none of our deduced determinations are pos- 
sible. All our deductions would be canceled. 

Hence, the diminished activity of the Ego must 
have a character altogether peculiar to itself, whereby 
it may be characterized as the activity of the Ego, 
and can never be tafcen for activity of the Non-Ego, 
This character is absolute positing, (§ i.) But ab- 



1 36 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

solute signifies unlimited, and yet that activity of 
the Ego is to be diminished, limited. The dimi- 
nished activity is, therefore, to be both absolute 
and limited. That is, in so far as it is an acting in 
general, it is absolute, unconditioned ; you may act 
or not. But in so far as it is directed upon an 
object, it is limited ; when you act, the act must be 
directed upon this object, and can not be directed 
upon any other. 

We see, therefore, how this reciprocal determina- 
tion posits an independent activity. For the acti- 
vity in that reciprocity is itself independent, not 
however, in so far as it stands in that reciprocity, 
but in so far as it is activity. In so far as it enters 
the reciprocity, it is limited, and in so far passivity. 
We see, also, how the reciprocity determines this 
independent activity, that is, in the mere reflection. 
For the activity was assumed as absolute only in 
so far as to make possible the reciprocity. Hence, 
this activity is posited as absolute only in so far as 
reciprocal activity and passivity are to be determinea 
by it ; and itself is, therefore, determined by the ex- 
tent of this reciprocity. (It is not an absolute acti- 
vity in general)) An absolute activity of this cha- 
racter is called Power of Imagination, as we shall 
see in time. 



THE SCIENCE OP KNOWLEDGE. 13/ 



II. 

AN INDEPENDENT ACTIVITY DETERMINES A RECI- 
PROCAL ACTIVITY AND PASSIVITY. 

Let US first obtain the significance of this propo- 
sition, and its distinction firom the former. The 
former had reference merely to the content of the 
reciprocity, not to its form. It simply said, if a 
reciprocity is to be, then there must be hnks which 
stand in reciprocal relation and can be interchanged. 
Thus the question arose : How are these links pos- 
sible .' And then we were led to show up an inde- 
pendent activity as ground of these links. 

But now we have to start from that which con- 
stitutes the reciprocal determination as reciprocity, 
as an interchange, as a going from one opposite to 
another. Here, therefore, we do not seek the 
ground of the content of the reciprocity, but the 
ground of its form. This formal ground of the re- 
ciprocity is also to be an independent activity ; and 
it is this we now have to prove. 

Illustration. 

The magnet attracts iron ; iron is attracted by 
the magnet. These are two exchangeable proposi- 
tions ; that is, through the one the other is posited. 
This is a presupposed fact, presupposed as ground- 
ed ; and hence, if you look to the content of this re- 
ciprocal relation, you do not ask. Who posits the one 

proposition through the other, and how does this 

VI* 



138 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

positing occur ? You assume the reciprocity as hav- 
ing occurred if you look to the content of the reci- 
procity ; and you only ask, Why are these two pro- 
positions contained among the sphere of proposi- 
tions, which can be thus posited the one through the 
other? There must be something in both which 
makes it possible to interchange them. Hence, 
you look up this, their material content, which 
makes them interchangeable. 

If, however, you look to the form of the recipro- 
city, if you reflect on the occurring of the inter- 
change, and hence abstract from the propositions 
which are interchanged, then the question no long- 
er is : With what right are these propositions inter- 
changed .i" but simply : How is interchange effected 
at all } And then it is discovered, that there must 
be an intelligent being outside of the iron and mag- 
net, which, observing both and uniting both in -its 
consciousness, is compelled to give to the one the 
opposite predicate of the other ; (to the one the 
predicate of attracting, to the other the predicate 
of being attracted^ 

The first mode gives simply a reflection upon a 
phenomenon ; the second mode a reflection upon 
that reflection ; the reflection of the philosopher 
upon the mode of observation. 

APPLICATION UNDER THE CONCEPTION OF CAUSALITY. 

In the reciprocity of causality, passivity in the 
Ego posits activity in the Non-Ego. The mere 
formal expression of this reciprocity is a positing 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 39 

through a not-positing, that is, a transferring. Such 
is Xh^fotmal character of the reciprocity here ; and, 
hence, such is the material character of the activity 
which establishes that reciprocity. This activity 
is independent of the reciprocity, since the latter 
only is possible by means of it ; and is independent 
also of the two links of the reciprocity as such ; for 
only through it do they become reciprocally inter- 
changeable, since it is the activity which inter- 
changes them. But all positing belongs to the 
Ego ; hence this activity of transferring, to make 
possible a determination through the conception of 
causality, belongs to the Ego. The Ego carries 
over, transfers, activity from itself into the Non- 
Ego ; and thus posits through activity passivity in 
itself In so far as the Ego is active in carrying 
over this activity, in so far the Non-Ego is passive ; 
activity is transferred into it. 

(Of course, this contradicts our former conclu- 
sion establishing an independent activity of the 
Non-Ego ; but we must wait and see how both will 
be reunited.) It must al.so be remembered that 
this activity is independent of the reciprocity which 
first becomes possible through it. There might be 
another reciprocity which does not become possible 
through it. Our result, therefore, is this : Even in 
so far as the Ego is passive, it must also be active, 
though perhaps not merely active ; and this result 
may be important enough. 



140 THE SCIEJVCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

APPLICATION UNDER THE CONCEPTION OF SUB- 
STANTIALITY. 

In the reciprocity of substantiality, activity is to 
be posited as limited by means of absolute totality ; 
that is to say, that part of the absolute totality 
which is excluded by the limit is posited as not 
posited through the positing of the limited activity. 
Hence, the mere formal character of this recipro- 
city is a not-positing by means of a positing. That 
which is wanting in the limited activity is posited 
in the absolute totality ; is not posited in the limited 
activity ; it is posited as not posited in the recipro- 
city, (in the reciprocal determination of activity and 
passivity.) By this conception of substantiality we 
start, therefore, from an absolute positing, from a 
positing of the absolute totality. 

Hence, the material character of that act, which 
itself posits this reciprocity, must also be a not- 
positing through a positing, and through an absolute 
positing. We abstract utterly from the question 
whence the not-positedness in the limited activity 
may come, and what may be its ground. The limit- 
ed act is presupposed as existing, and the only ques- 
tion is : How may it interchange with unlimitedness I 
All positing in general, and particularly absolute 
positing, belongs to the Ego ; the act which posits 
the present reciprocity starts from absolute posit- 
ing, and therefore belongs to the Ego. It is inde- 
pendent of the reciprocity, for that becomes possible 
only through it. This not positing through a posit- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. I4I 

ing we may call an externalizing. A certain quan- 
tum of the absolute totality is excluded, externalized, 
from the posited diminished activity, is posited as 
not contained in it, but as outside of it. The cha- 
racteristic distinction between the externalizing and 
the previous transferriitg is this : in transferring 
something is certainly also excluded from the Ego ; 
but this we do not reflect upon, looking merely to 
its being posited again in the opposite, the Non- 
Ego. It is a transferring to another. But in ex- 
ternalizing we merely exclude from the Ego, and 
do not say whether the excluded be posited in an- 
other, and if so in what. 

To this activity of externalizing passivity must 
be opposed ; and it really is thus. For a part of 
the absolute totality is externalized, is posited, as 
not posited. The activity has an object ; a part of 
the totality is this object. To what substrate of 
reality this passivity may be assigned, whether to 
the Ego or to the Non-Ego, is not the question 
here ; and it is very important that no other conclu- 
sions should be drawn from our result than are 
contained in it, and that the form of the reciprocity 
be comprehended in all its purity. 

(Each thing is what it is ; it has those realities 
which are posited when it is posited, (A = A.) 
To call something an accidence of a thing is to say 
that something is not included in the positing of the 
thing, does not belong to its real nature, and is to 
be excluded from its original conception. It is this 
determination of the accidence which we have now 



142 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

explained. Nevertheless, in another sense the acci- 
dence is also ascribed to the thing and posited in itj 
How this is done we shall see hereafter.) 

III. 

BOTH THE RECIPROCITY AND THE ACTIVITY, INDE- 
PENDENT THEREOF, MUTUALLY DETERMINE EACH 
OTHER. 

Let us again, as heretofore, first try to get at the 
significance of this proposition, and then proceed 
to apply it. As we have now, however, acquired 
a twofold reciprocity, 2^ form and a content of it, and 
also a twofold independent activity, which, on the 
one hand, determines the form, and, on the other 
handj is (in reflection) determined by the content of 
the reciprocity ; we must make more clear the above 
proposition by uniting these several links through 
the synthesis of reciprocal determination. Hence, 
that proposition involves the following three : 

(a.) The activity, independent of the form of the 
reciprocity, determines the activity, independent 
of its content, and vice versa ; that is, both are syn- 
thetically united and mutually determine each 
other. 

(b) The form of the reciprocity determines its 
content, and vice versa ; that is, both are syntheti- 
cally united and mutually determine each other. 

{c.) The reciprocity (as synthetical unity) deter- 
mines the independent activity, (as synthetical imi- 
ty,) and vice versa; that is, both determine each 
other mutually and are synthetically united. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. I43 

(a.) The activity independent of the form, and the 
activity independent of the content of the reciprocity, 
are mutually to determine each other. 

That activity which is to determine the form of 
the reciprocity, or the reciprocity as such, but is to 
be absokitely independent of it, is a going over from 
one of the Unks of the reciprocity to the other. 

That activity which determines the co7itent of the 
reciprocity is an activity which posits that into the 
links whereby it is made possible to go from the 
one to the other. 

The latter activity gives the X which is in both 
links, and can be contained only in both, but not in 
one of them merely ; and which makes it impossible 
to remain content with the positing of the one link, 
but forces us to posit at the same time the other 
link, because it shows up the incompleteness of 
the one without the other. This X is that to which 
the unity of consciousness clings, and must cling if 
no hiatus is to arise in it ; it is, as it were, the coiv- 
ductor of consciousness. 

The former activity is consciousness itself, in so 
far as it floats over the interchanging links while 
clinging to X, and in so far as it is a unit; although 
it changes its objects, these links, and necessarily, 
must change them if it is to be a unit. 

The former determines the latter signifies, the 
going from the one link to the other is the ground 
of the content of the reciprocity ; the latter deter- 
mines the former signifies, the content of the reci- 
procal links is the ground of the going from the 
one to the other as act. Both mutually determine 



144 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

each other signifies, therefore : by positing the mere 
going over, you posit in each Unk that which makes 
this going over possible, and by positing them as 
reciprocal links you immediately go from the one 
to the other. The going from one link to the other 
becomes possible only by doing it ; and it is only 
possible in so far as it is actually done. It is an 
absolute act without any other ground. The ground 
of the going over from one link to the other lies in 
consciousness itself, not outside of it. Conscious- 
ness, because it is consciousness, must go from one 
link to the other, and would not be consciousness 
if it did not, because a hiatus would arise in it. 

(^.) The form of the reciprocity atid its content are 
mutually to determine each other. 

The reciprocity, as we have said before, is distin- 
guished from the activity presupposed through it, 
by abstracting from this presupposed activity, (for 
instance, by abstracting from the activity of an in- 
telligence which observes the reciprocity.) In this 
view, the interchanging links of the reciprocity are 
thought as iuterchanging through themselves ; we 
transfer into the things what in truth is only in us. 
How far such an abstraction may be valid will ap- 
pear in time. 

From such a stand-point, therefore, the links in- 
terchange through themselves. And their mutual 
joining is the form, while the activity and passi- 
vity, occurring in this joining, (namely, each joins 
and is joined,) is the content of the reciprocity. 
We shall call this content here the mutual Relation 
of the interchanging links. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. I45 

Now, that joining is to determine tlie relation of 
the links ; that is, immediately and through the 
mere joining of the links, zi, joining, is the relation 
to be determined, and vice versa. Their joining 
and their relation is to be one and the same. In 
other words : 

The relation of the links consists in this, that 
they interchange, and they have no other mutual 
relation. If they are not posited as interchanging, 
they are not posited at all. 

Again : through this- mere form of a reciprocity 
being posited between them, the content of the re- 
ciprocity is immediately and completely determined. 
The links interchange necessarily and only in one 
possible manner, which is absolutely determined by 
the very fact that they interchange. If they are 
posited, a determined interchange or reciprocity of 
them is posited ; and if a determined reciprocity of 
them is posited, then they are posited. The links 
and a determined reciprocity are one and the same. 

(<:.) The independent activity as synthetical unity 
determines the reciprocity as synthetical unity, and 
vice versa ; that is, both of these synthetical unities 
mutually determine each other, and are themselves 
synthetically united. 

The activity and synthetical unity has been dis- 
covered as an absolute going from one link to an- 
other, the latter as an in itself absolutely determined 
joining. The former determines the latter signifies, 
by the going from one link to the other their join- 
ing is posited. The latter determines the former 
signifies, as the links join, the activity must neces- 

13 



146 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

sarily go from the one to the other. Both deter- 
mine each other mutually signifies, the positing of 
the one posits the other, from each you can and 
must proceed to the other. It is all one and the 
same, and the whole is absolutely posited ; rests on 
itself. To make this important result clearer, we 
apply it to the propositions involved ki it. 

The activity which determines the form of the 
reciprocity determines all that occurs in the reci- 
procity, and vice versa. Determines the form : that 
is, the mere reciprocity in its form, or the joining 
of the links, is not possible without the act of go- 
ing from the one to the other, and only through the 
going from the one link to the other is their joining 
posited ; and vice versa. No joining of the links, no 
going from the one to the other ; no going from the 
one to the other, no joining. Both is one and the 
same, and is distinguishable only in reflection. 

Determines also the content : that is, through the 
necessary going from one of the links to the other 
these reciprocal links are first posited as such, and 
indeed since they are only posited as such, posited 
at all, and vice versa ; through the positing of these 
links as interchanging links is the activity first 
posited which goes from the one to the other. 

Hence, you may start from which of the moments 
you will, the positing of the one always involves 
the positing of the other three.* 

* Four moments and their unity, that is to say, five in all. This 
fivefold FiCHTE has shown up in other works with particular ear- 
nestness, as occurring in every synthesis of consciousness. — Trans- 
lator's Note. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 147 

The activity which determines the content of 
the reciprocity determines the whole reciprocity : 
that is, it posits that by means of which the going 
over is made possible, and hence necessary. It 
therefore posits the activity of the form, and through 
it all the rest. 

Hence, the activity returns into itself by means 
of the reciprocity, and the reciprocity returns into 
itself by means of the activity. Every thing re- 
produces itself, and no hiatus is possible ; from each 
link you are driven to all the others. The activity 
of the form determines that of the content ; the 
activity of the content determines the content of 
the reciprocity ; the content of the reciprocity de- 
termines its form ; the form of the reciprocity the 
activity of the form, etc. They are all one and the 
same synthetical condition. The act returns into 
itself through its circular movement. But the 
whole circular movement is absolutely posited. 
It is because it is, and there is no higher ground 
for it. 

And now, having shown the full significance of 
our proposition, let us proceed to apply it as here- 
tofore. 

APPLrCATION UNDER THE CONCEPTION OF 
CAUSALITY. 

Our proposition was : The reciprocity and the ac- 
tivity independent of it are mutually to determine 
each other. 



148 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

According to the just established scheme this 
involves the following : 

1st. The activity of the form determines that of 
the content, and vice versa. 

2d. The form of the reciprocity determines its 
content, and vice versa. 

3d. The synthetically united activity determines 
the synthetically united reciprocity, and vice versa. 

I. — The activity of the form, determines that of the 
content, and vice versa. 

As mere form, this activity was characterized as 
a transferring, that is, a positing through a not- 
positing. This activity of the form is to determine 
the activity of the content of the reciprocity, which 
latter was found to be an independent activity in 
the Non-Ego, which made possible a passivity in 
the Ego. This latter is determined by the former, 
means : The activity is posited in the Non-Ego 
through the Ego, but only in so far as something is 
not posited. The activity of the Non-Ego is thus 
inclosed in a limited sphere, that is, in the activity 
of the form. The Non-Ego is active only in so far 
as it is posited active through the Ego, in virtue of 
a not-positing. No positing by a not-positing — no 
activity of the Non-Ego. But, on the other hand, 
the activity of the content, or the independent ac- 
tivity of the Non-Ego, is to determine that of the 
form, that is, the transferring or the positing through 
a not-positing. 

This means, therefore : the activity of the Non- 
Ego is to determine the transferring as a transfer- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 149 

ring ; or, it is to posit the X, whereby the incom- 
pleteness of the one link is shown up, and thus 
the necessity of positing it, as interchanging link, 
or as a link in reciprocity with another link. This 
second link is a passivity, as passivity. Hence, 
the Non-Ego is the ground of a not-^ossSmg, and 
thus determines and conditions the activity of the 
form. No activity of the Non-Ego, no positing 
through a not-positing. 

Here we have again the conflict of Realism, 
which says that activity can not be transferred unless 
an independent reality of the Non-Ego is presup- 
posed ; and of Idealism, which says, that all reality 
of the Non-Ego is simply transferred to it by the 
Ego. This conflict is to be reconciled. 

This is done in the following synthesis : 

Activity in the Non-Ego is passivity in the Ego, 
and both are altogether one and the same. Neither 
is the ground of the other ; both are one and the 
same act. In so far as the Ego does not posit in 
itself, it posits in the Non-Ego, that is, in so far it 
is itself Non-Ego. 

Let us explain this : When the Non-Ego is con- 
sidered as limiting the Ego, it is not considered at 
all as positing, but merely as canceling ; hence, it is 
opposed to the Ego as qualitatively distinct, is real 
ground of a determination in the Ego. But when 
the Ego is viewed as limiting itself, it is still viewed 
as positing ; that is, as positing a negative ; hence, 
as in part positing, and in part not-positing. The 

Ego is, therefore, only quantitatively opposed to it- 

13* 



ISO THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

self — is only the ideal ground of a determination 
in itself ; and since it posits that which it does not 
posit in itself, in the Non-Ego, it is the ideal ground 
of the reality of the Non-Ego, to which that deter- 
mination corresponds. But that the ideal ground 
should thus become a real ground in the Non-Ego, 
this is what common sense can not comprehend. 

Ideal ground and real ground are, therefore, one 
and the same. The reason why common sense 
refuses to comprehend it is because it considers 
the Ego as an external thing. Just as in exter- 
nal things we distinguish the real ground of their 
mutual relation, that is, the independent content 
or quality which makes them related ; and the 
ideal ground of their relation ; that is, that we 
posit them as related ; so common consciousness 
posits its Ego as an external thing, related to other 
things by an inherent something ; for instance, as 
the magnet is related to iron. But in the Ego 
positing itself is the same as being. In it real and 
ideal ground are one and the same. Again, not 
positing itself, and not being, is for the Ego the. 
same. The Ego does not posit something as itself 
means, the Ego is not that something.^ The Non- 
Ego is to influence the Ego means, it is to cancel 
a positing in the Ego ; it is to cause the Ego not to 
posit. 

Again, the Ego is to recognize a Non-Ego means, 
it is to posit reality in the Non-Ego ; for the Ego 
recognizes no other reality but what itself posits. 

Activity of the Ego and of the Non-Ego are one 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 151 

and the same means : the Ego can only posit some- 
thing not in itself, by positing it in the Non-Ego ; 
and can only posit in itself by not positing in the 
Non-Ego. The Ego must posit, however, as sure 
as it is an Ego ; but it need not posit in itself. 

Passivity of the Ego and of the Non-Ego is also 
one and the same. The Ego does not posit some- 
thing in itself means, that something is posited in 
the Non-Ego. 

Activity and passivity of the Ego are one and 
the same. For what the Ego does not posit in 
itself it posits in the Non-Ego. 

Activity and passivity of the Non-Ego are one 
and the same. In so far as the Non-Ego is to in- 
fluence the Ego, to cancel something in the Ego, 
this something has been posited in the Non-Ego 
by the Ego. 

Thus the synthetical solution is complete. None 
of the moments are grounds of the others ; all are 
one and the same. 

The question. What is the ground of the passi- 
vity in the Ego .' is, therefore, not a proper one, for 
there is no such passivity. But one question may 
be put : What is the ground of this whole reci- 
procity .' To say simply it is because it is, is not 
allowable, for only the Ego is absolutely posited ; 
and the mere Ego does not involve this reciprocity. 
Such a ground, however, if it is to be found, is not 
to be found in the theoretical part of the science of 
knowledge, because it is not involved in its funda- 
mental principle, that " the Ego posits itself as 



152 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

determined by the Non-Ego." On the contrary, 
the theoretical part presupposes such a ground. 

At the same time, our expression, " limited, re- 
stricted activity of the Ego," is now perfectly clear. 
It is an activity which is directed upon something 
in the Non-Ego, hence an objective activity. The 
■activity of the Ego generally is not at all limited, 
and can not be limited ; but its positing of the Ego 
is limited by this, that it must posit a Non-Ego. 

II. — The form and the content of the reciprocity 
determine each other mutually. 

The form of the reciprocity is the mere mutual in- 
terchange of the' links — the content is that in them, 
which makes them capable of this mutual inter- 
change, and impels them to realize it. The charac- 
teristic form of the reciprocity is here (under the ca- 
tegory of causality) a becoming through a vanishing. 
(From time we must abstract as yet. The X which 
becomes through the — X, which vanishes, must both 
be thought together, or, rather, not at all in time.) 
The characteristic of the content of this reciprocity 
is essential opposition of the two links, or the qualita- 
tive incompatibility of both. 

The form is to determine the content means, the 
two links are essentially opposed, because and in 
so far as they cancel each other. Their actual 
mutual canceling determines the sphere of their 
opposition. If they do not cancel each other, they 
are not essentially opposed. (A seeming paradox, 
to be explained directly.) 

The content determines the form means, their 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. I S3 

essential opposition decermines their mutual cancel- 
ing ; only on condition that the links are opposed, 
and only in so far as they are mutually opposed 
can they cancel each other. Form and content 
mutually determine each other signifies, the essen- 
tial opposition of the links necessitates their mutual 
canceling, and hence their actual connection and 
influence upon each other, and vice versa. Both is 
one and the same. 

The real result of this synthesis is, that a neces- 
sary connection is posited between the links. This 
synthesis denies the possibility to distinguish a 
being in itself from a being in the reciprocity ; both 
are posited as interchanging links, and are other- 
wise not posited at all. Real and ideal opposition 
are one and the same. This is what appears para- 
doxical, but it does not appear so when it is re- 
membered that the one link is the Ego, to which 
nothing is opposed, which it does not posit as op- 
posed to itself, and which is opposed to nothing, 
but to what it posits itself as opposed. 

III. — The synthetically united activity and the 
syjzthetically united reciprocity mutually determine 
each other, and constitute in themselves a synthetical 
unity. 

The activity as synthetical unity may be called 
a mediated positing, (a positing of reality by means 
of a not-positing ;) the synthetically united reciy 
procity is the identity of essential opposition and real 
canceling. 

The former determines the latter signifies : The 



154 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

mediateness of the positing is the ground and the 
condition of the identity of essential opposition and 
real canceling. These two links are identical be- 
cause of the mediateness of the positing. 

If the interchanging links were posited immedi- 
ately, opposition and canceling would be distinct. 
Call these links A and B. Let A = A and B = B ; 
but now posit also A = — B, in some quantitative 
respect, and B = — A ; and, nevertheless, they do 
not necessarily cancel each other. For you may 
abstract from their characteristic as opposites, and 
again view them as having been posited immedi- 
ately and independent of each other, (A = A and 
B = B,) in which case they are no longer posited 
as interchanging links, but also as reality in them- 
selves. Interchanging links can only be posited 
mediately ; A is ^^ — B, and nothing else ; and 
B:^ — A, and nothing else ; and from this medi- 
ateness of the positing follows their essential op- 
position and their mutual canceling, and the iden- 
tity of both. For if A and B are thus posited, as 
existing merely in essential opposition to each 
other, and if they can receive no other predicate' 
(not even that of a thing) — if A can therefore 
not be posited as real otherwise than through 
not positing B, and B not except through not 
positing A — their common essence evidently con- 
sists in this, that the one is posited through the 
not-positing of the other, and hence — if we abstract 
from an intelligence which posits them — that they 
do cancel each other. Their essential opposition 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. ISS 

and mutual canceling are, therefore, identical, in so 
far as each link is only posited through the not- 
positing of another. 

Now, this is the case with the Ego and the Non- 
Ego. The Ego can transfer reality into the Non- 
Ego only through not positing the same in itself; 
and into itself only through not positing the same 
in the Non-Ego. (We speak here of transferred, 
not of absolute reality.) The essence of the Ego 
and the Non-Ego, therefore, as interchanging links, 
consists only in this, that they are opposed to each 
other, and cancel each other. The mediateness of 
the positing (that is, the law of consciousness, " no 
subject no object, and vice versa") is the ground of 
the essential opposition of the Ego and the Non- 
Ego, and hence of all the reality of the Non-Ego 
as well as of the Ego ; that is, in so far as this real- 
ity is posited simply as posited, or, ideal reality ; 
for the absolute reality remains, of course, in the 
positing. This mediateness, so far as we have now 
advanced in our synthesis, is not again to be 
grounded through that whereof it is the ground, nor 
can it be so in any proper application of the prop- 
osition of the ground. The ground of this mediate- 
ness, therefore, can not be contained either in the 
reality of the Non-Ego, or in the posited reality 
of the Ego. The ground must, therefore, be in the 
absolute Ego ; and this mediateness must be itself 
absolute, that is, grounded in and through itself 

This, on our present standpoint, very correct 
result establishes a new and still more abstract 



156 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

idealism than we had before. In that former ideal- 
ism, an itself posited activity was canceled through 
the nature and the essence of the Ego, canceled 
absolutely, without further ground ; and this abso- 
lute canceling made an object and subject, etc., 
possible. Representations developed themselves 
as such, out of the Ego in a manner utterly un- 
known and inaccessible to us. 

In the present idealism the activity has its law 
immediately in itself ; it is a mediate activity and 
no other, simply because it is mediate. From this 
its mediateness every thing else, reality of the 
Non-Ego, and, in so far, negation of the Ego ; and 
negation of the Non-Ego, and, in so far, reality of 
the Ego, can be completely explained. Representa- 
tions develop themselves out of the Ego according 
to a determined and cognizable law of its nature. 
It is only the ground of this law of mediation which 
is here inaccessible. 

This idealism necessarily abolishes the former, 
since it explains what to the former was inexplain- 
able from a higher ground. The fundamental prin- 
ciple of this latter idealism would be, the, Ego is 
finite simply because it is finite. 

Now, although such an idealism rises higher, it 
does not rise high enough, does not rise to the 
absolutely posited and unconditioned. True, finity 
is to be absolutely posited ; but all finite is, by its 
very conception, limited by its opposite, and abso- 
lute finity is thus, an in itself contradictory concep- 
tion. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 157 

I shall call the former idealism, which cancels 
something posited in itself, qualitative idealism; 
and the latter, which originally posits itself a limited 
quantity, quantitative idealism. 

2d. The latter determines the former signifies : 
the mediateness of the positing is determined by 
this, that the essence of the' interchanging links 
consists merely in their essential opposition ; only 
through the latter fact is the mediateness possible. 
For if their essence were not thereby exhausted, 
the not-positing of the one would by no means 
necessitate the positing of the other in its complete 
essence ; but if their essence consists only in this, 
then they can only be posited mediately. 

From this view the essential opposition is the 
absolute fact — not the mediateness of the positing 
as above — and is the ground of that mediateness. 

A system which takes this view, results in a 
quantitative realism, well to be distinguished from 
our previous qualitative realism. In the system of 
qualitative realism an independent Non-Ego, hav- 
ing reality in itself, impresses the Ego and restricts 
the activity thereof The quantitative realist re- 
cognizes, on the contrary, that reality is posited in 
the Non-Ego for the Ego only by the applying of 
the law of the ground, though he, also, does main- 
tain the real existence of a limitation of the Ego, 
whereof the Ego is not the cause. The qualitative 
realist asserts the independent reality of a determin- 
ing ; the quantitative realist merely the independent 
reality of a determination. The latter says, there is I 

14 I 



IS8 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

a determination in the Ego of which the ground 
can not be posited in the Ego. This to him is a 
fact ; that is, that determination exists for him abso- 
lutely without any ground. True, the law of the 
ground compels him to relate it to the Non-Ego as 
the real ground of that determination ; but he also 
knows that that law of the ground is his own, and 
hence he is not deceived by it. It appears at once 
that this system is the same as that of critical ideal- 
ism ; and Kant, indeed, has established no other 
than this, as indeed, from the standpoint of reflec- 
tion he had placed himself upon, he neither could 
nor wished to establish another one. 

The above quantitative idealism is distinguished 
from the present quantitative realism in this, that 
although both assume a finity of the Ego, the 
former system posits that finity as absolutely posit- 
ed ; the latter system as accidental, but also as unex- 
plainable. Quantitative realism abolishes quantita- 
tive idealism, because it explains without its assist- 
ance, though making the same error, the existence 
of an object in consciousness. I say, with the same 
error, for it also can not explain, how a real deter- 
mination may become an ideal one, how an in itself 
existing determination may become a determination 
for the positing Ego. 

True, we have seen now how the essential oppo- 
sition determines and grounds the mediateness of 
the positing ; but through what is pi'ositing itself 
grounded .' If a positing is to be realized, then, of 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 59 

course, it can only be through mediation ; but posit- 
ing in itself is an absolute act of the absolutely 
undetermined and undeterminable Ego. Hence, 
this system can not explain the possibility of pro- 
ceeding from the limited to the unlimited. The 
above quantitative idealism removes this difficulty 
by abolishing the unlimited altogether, but this 
involves it in the contradiction, that it absolutely 
posits a limited. 

Probably by uniting both syntheses we shall 
obtain a critical quantitative idealism as the true 
result. 

3d. Each is to determine the other signifies : to 
oppose and to be opposed, being and being posited, 
ideal and real relation is to be the same. This can 
only be when the positing and the posited of the 
relation is one and the same, that is, when the 
posited is Ego. The Ego is to be in relation to an 
X, which, in so far, must be a Non-Ego, by which 
relation the Ego is posited only through the not 
positing of this Non-Ego, and vice versa. The Ego, 
however, is in a relation only in so far as it posits 
itself in a relation. Hence, it is the same whether 
you say of the Ego it is posited in this relation, or 
it posits itself in this relation. Ideal and real rela- ^ 
tion are the same. 

Let us develop more clearly the important result 
of this synthesis, a result, however, which is only 
derived from the fundamental principle of the theo- 
retical part of our science, and has only validity so 
far as that principle has it. The Ego can only 



l6o THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

posit through a non-positing, that is, mediately ; 
can only mediately posit itself as well as the Non- 
Ego. It is always positing, but it is posited only 
through positing the Non-Ego, as not posited, or 
through negating it. In other words, the Ego is 
only the opposite of the Non-Ego, and vice versa. 
No Ego, no Non-Ego ; no I, no Thou ; no subject, 
no object. Subject is that which is not object, and 
has no other predicate as yet, and vice versa. 

This result establishes the critical quantitative 
idealism of which we spoke. 

The difficulty was to assign a ground for the de- 
termination of the activity of the Ego as such. 
Quantitative realism assigns this ground to the 
passivity of the Ego, caused by a real Non-Ego. 
Quantitative idealism assigns it to the positing of 
the Ego, that is, posits the Ego simply as absolutely 
limited through itself The present system asserts 
that both are wrong, that the law of that determina- 
j tion is neither a merely subjective and ideal, having 
I its ground only in the Ego, nor an objective and 
real one, having its ground not in the Ego ; but 
that it must be both in the object and subject. 
How f This question can not yet be answered. 

APPLICATION UNDER CATEGORY OF SUBSTAN- 
TIALITY. 

We have the same three propositions': 
1st. The activity of the form and of the content 
mutually determine each other. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. l6l 

2d. The form and content of the reciprocity mu- 
tually determine each other. 

3d. The synthetically united activity and the 
synthetically united reciprocity mutually determine 
each other. 

I. 

The activity of the form and of the content mu- 
tually determine each other. 

While the characteristic of the category of cau- 
sality was the positing through a non-positing, the 
characteristic of the activity of the form under the 
category of substantiality is the positing of some- 
thing as not posited through the positing of another 
as posited, that is, negation through affirmation. 
The not-posited is posited as not posited. Hence, 
it is not annihilated as before, but merely excluded, 
excluded from a certain sphere. Hence, again, it is 
not negated through positing generally, but through 
a determined positing. The not-posited has, there- 
fore, merely a negative character ; it is not this de- 
termined sphere. Call the posited sphere A, the 
excluded not-posited, B. A, by itself, is posited as 
absolute totality ; but this can not be if B is any- 
wise posited. A is, therefore, posited both as total- 
ity and not-totality ; totality with reference 'to A, 
not-totality with reference to B. But B is merely 
determined negatively as not A. Hence A is posit- 
ed as determined, and in so far total part of an un- 
determined whole, which whole embraces both 
spheres, the determined and the undetermined 

14* 



l62 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

spheres. This higher sphere must be posited to 
make both lower ones possible, and the activity 
which posits it is the activity of the content we are 
looking for. 

Example. 

Let us posit iron = A as absolute totality in 
itself. It excludes motion ^ B. Now take a piece 
of moving iron = C. By excluding motion = B 
from the .conception of iron = A, you do not deny 
the moving iron == C, ^ut you place this C in an 
undetermined sphere, because you do not know 
under what condition the motion ^ C is connected 
with the iron. The sphere, A, is totality of the 
iron, and also is it not, because it excludes = C which 
equally belongs to iron. Hence, you posit a higher 
sphere, embracing both moving and • not-moving 
iron. In so far as iron fills this higher sphere it is 
substance ; in A it is merely a thing. Motion and 
not-motion are its accidences. 

The activity of the form determines that of the 
content signifies : only by excluding from the abso- 
lute totality can you posit a higher sphere ; no ex- 
clusion, no higher sphere,; no accidence in the Ego, 
no Non-Ego. The absolute totality of the Ego is 
positing itself. If an object is posited by it, this ob- 
jective positing is excluded from that sphere, and 
placed in the opposite sphere of not-positing itself. 
Not to posit itself and to posit an object is the 
same. It excludes simply because it excludes, and 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 63 

did it not exclude, the higher sphere of general 
positing would not be possible. It will be seen 
that the word positing itself has here a double 
significance, first, that of absolute totality, and se- 
condly, that of a determined part of an undeter- 
mined whole. Also, that substance signifies the 
all-embracing, not the permanent, as is generally 
supposed. (This results again in a system of 
quantitative idealism.) 

The activity of the content determines that of 
the form signifies : the higher sphere is absolutely 
posited, and only through it is the exclusion (as real 
act of the Ego) possible. This again opens a quali- 
tative realism, which maintains that the Ego and 
the Non-Ego are posited as opposites, that the Ego 
is generally /^j?Vm^/ and that, if the Ego does not 
posit the Non-Ego, it must certainly posit itself ; but 
this must is accidental, and determined through the 
ground of the positing, which ground is not con- 
tained in the Ego itself According to this realism, 
the Ego is a representing being, which must be 
governed by the quality of the things^ 

Neither this result nor the previous one is to be 
valid ; both must, therefore, be mutually modified. 
Because the Ego is to exclude something from it- 
self, a higher sphere must be, and he. posited ; and 
vice versa. Or, there is a Non-Ego because the Ego 
posits something as its opposite, and it posits some- 
thing as its opposite because a Non-Ego is, and is 
■posited. This will again establish the above criti- 
cal idealism. 



164 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

II. 

The form and the content of the reciprocity mutual- 
ly determine each other. 

The form consists in the excluding of the links 
through each other. If A is posited as absolute 
totality, B is excluded from its sphere, and placed 
in the undetermined but determinable sphere B. 
Again, if B is considered as posited, A is now ex- 
cluded from the absolute totality ; that is, it belongs 
with B to a higher undetermined but determinable 
sphere. (Let this be well remarked.) 

The content consists in this, that the totality is 
determinable. In the form we had two totalities : 
first A alone, and then A + B. If these two can 
not be distinguished, we have no interchange, no 
reciprocity. Hence, there, must be a determined 
character of the totality as such, whereby it can be 
distinguished, whereby it can be determined, which 
is the true totality. 

Example. ' 

Posit iron as isolated, in rest, in space ; and you 
rightly ascribe motion, when it occurs, to an exter- 
nal cause. Still, you also and rightly now ascribe 
motion to iron. Your former conception of iron is, 
therefore, no longer sufficient, and you complete it 
by adding the characteristic of attractability by the 
magnet. Now, from the one view, rest is essen- 
tial to iron, and motion accidental ; from the other, 
both are accidental, because both are determined by 
the absence or presence of the magnet. Hence, 
you are in a quandary ; unless you can assign a 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 65 

pjround why you take the first or second view, that 
is, unless you can determine from what totality you 
must proceed, whether from the determined totality 
which has been absolutely posited, or from the deter- 
minable totality which has arisen from it and from 
the excluded sphere. 

The form of the reciprocity determines its con- 
tent signifies : the mutual exclusion determines 
which of both totalities is absolute. That which 
excludes another from the totality is, in so far as it 
excludes, the totality, and vice versa. If the abso- 
lutely posited A excludes B, then, in so far, A is 
totality ; and if B is reflected upon, and hence A 
not regarded as totality, in so far A + the unde- 
termined B is the determinable totality. Result : 
There is no other ground of the totality than a rela- 
tive one. You may optionally take either view. 
Take the absolutely posited conception of iron, and 
rQgt is essential ; take its merely determinable con- 
ception, and rest is accidental. Both conceptions 
are right, and you may take whichever you choose. 
The distinction is purely relative. 

The content of the reciprocity determines its 
form signifies : the determinability of the totality, 
as explained by us, and which is therefore posited, 
determines the mutual exclusion ; that is, one of 
the totalities is the absolute one, either the de- 
termined (B) or the merely determinable, (A + B.) 
If B is the absolute totality, then that which it 
excludes is also absolutely excluded. Result : 
There is an absolute ground of the totality, and it 



1 66 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

is not merely relative. It is not the same whether 
you take the determined or the determinable con- 
ception of iron, and whether you posit rest as 
essential or accidental to it. If from some un- 
known ground the determined conception of iron 
must be the first conception, only motion and not 
rest is its absolute accidence. 

The form and the content mutually determine 
each other signifies : absolute and relative ground 
of the determination of the totality are the same ; 
the relation is absolute, and the absolute nothing 
but a relation. 

Both the results heretofore attained were wrong. 
There is an absolute law, our synthesis now says, 
for the determination of the totality, but this law is 
not contained in either of the above modes of de- 
termination, but in positing both as mutually- deter- 
mining each other. Neither of the two totalities is 
the desired totality ; both together, determining each 
other, give the true totality. Not A is abolute tot^- 
ity, nor A + B, but A determined by A + B. The 
determinable is determined by the determined, and 
vice versa, and ihe thus resulting unity is the true 
totality. 

What does this mean : the determined and the 
determinable must mutually determine each other ? 
Evidently this : the determination of that which is 
to be determined is determinability. It is a deter- 
minable, and nothing else ; therein its whole essence 
is expressed. This determinability is the looked-for 
totality ; that is, determinability is a fixed quantum, 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 16/ 

has its limits, beyond which no further determina- 
tion occurs, and all possible determinability lies 
within these hmits. 

The Ego posits itself; this is the absolute total- 
ity of the reality of the Ego. The Ego posits an 
object. This objective positing must be excluded 
from the sphere of the self-positing of the Ego ; 
and yet must also be ascribed to the Ego. Thus 
we obtain the sphere A + B as (unlimited as yet) 
totality of all the acts of the Ego. Now, both these 
spheres, the A and the A B, are mutually to 
determine each other. A gives what it has, abso- 
lute hmit ; A + B gives what it has, content. 
Thus the Ego is now positing an object, and then 
it is not the subject ; or the subject, and then it is 
not an object ; in so far as it posits itself, as posit- 
ing under this rule. In this manner both spheres 
are united, and unitedly first form a single limited 
sphere ; and in so far the determination of the Ego 
consists in its determinability through subject and 
object. 

Determined determinability is the totality we 
sought, and such a totality is called Substance. No 
substance, unless you first proceed from the ab- 
solutely posited, (the Ego, here,) which posits 
only itself; or, unless something is first excluded 
from it, (the Non-Ego, here.) But the substance 
which as such is nothing but determinability, and 
yet is to be jixed determinability, is no substance, 
(not ^//-embracing,) unless again determined by 
the absolutely posited, (here, by the itself-positing.) 



1 68 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

The Ego posits itself as self-positing by excluding 
the Non-Ego, or it posits the Non-Ego as positing 
by excluding itself. Remark the two characters of 
the self-positing in this sentence ; the first an tm- 
conditional, the second a conditional positing, de- 
terminable by excluding the Non-Ego. 

Example. 
If the determination of iron in itself be rest, then 
a change of place is excluded from it, and, in so far, 
iron is not substance, for it is not determinable. 
Still, the change of place is to be ascribed to the 
iron. This you can not do so as utterly to cancel 
its rest ; for if you do, you cancel the iron itself as 
posited by you. Hence, you only cancel that rest 
in part, and the change of place is thus determined 
and limited by the rest of the iro.n ; that is, the 
change of place occurs only within the sphere of a 
certain condition, (for instance, within the attraction 
of a magnet.) Beyond this sphere the iron is again 
in rest. Who does not notice here the double sig- 
nificance of the word rest .-' In the first instance, 
it is unconditioned ; in the second, conditioned, 
namely, by the absence of a magnet. 

Again, as A -I- B is determined by A, so B is 
determined, for it now belongs to the sphere of the 
determined determinable ; and A itself is now a de- 
terminable. Hence, in so far as B itself is now de- 
termined, it also can determine A and B, and must- 
determine it in order to form an absolute relation. 
Hence, if A and B is posited, and A is in so far 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 69 

placed within the sphere of the determinable: A 
and B is again determined by B. 

Let us explain this : The Ego is to exclude some- 
thing from itself This something must be in the 
Ego previous to the exclusion, that is, independent 
of the excluding. It must be absolutely posited in 
the Ego. Hence, for this something it is acciden- 
tal that the Ego should exclude it, (should make 
a representation of it, as we shall see hereafter.) 
Even without this excluding it would exist, (not 
without the Ego, but in the Ego, of course.) The 
object (A + B) is the determined ; its being ex- 
cluded, the determinable. It may be excluded or 
not, and still remains object. The object is, there- 
fore, posited here in two different ways : first, it 
is posited unconditionally and absolute ; next, un- 
der condition of a being excluded through the Ego. 

Example. 

From the iron posited as in rest, motion is to be 
excluded. By the conception of iron, iron was not 
to involve motion ; but now motion is to be exclud- 
ed from the iron. Hence, motion must be posited 
independently of this excluding, and must be posit- 
ed — with reference to its not being posited in iron 
— absolutely. In other words, if you wish to op- 
pose motion to iron, you must first know motion ; 
but the knowledge of motion is not given you 
through iron. Hence, you know it from some other 
source ; and since here we have only iron and mo- 
tion to look to, you know it absolutely. 

15 



170 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

Now, if we start from this conception of motion, 
then it is accidental to this conception that it is 
applied to iron among other things. It is the es- 
sential, and iron is for it the accidental. 

Motion is posited absolutely. Iron is excluded 
from its sphere, because it is in rest. Now, you 
cancel rest in iron and ascribe motion to it. Aad, 
whereas, at first the conception of motion was abso- 
lute and unconditioned, it is now conditioned by 
the canceling of rest in iron. 

The result of our synthesis was this : 
The totality consists simply in the complete rela- 
tion, and there is . nothing in itself determined 
whereby it is determined. The totality consists in 
the completeness of a relation, not of a reality. 

The links of a relation, singly considered, are 
accidences ; their totality, substance. Substance is 
nothing fixed, but a mere change. If a substance 
is to be determined, or, in other words, if something 
determined is to be thought as substance, the 
change, it is true, must proceed from one of the 
links, which is in so far fixed as the change is to be 
determined. But it is not absolutely fixed, for I 
might as well proceed from its opposite link, and 
then the former link would be accidental, etc. In 
short, the accidences, synthetically united, give .the 
substance ; and the substance is nothing but the 
totality of accidences. A permanent substrate must 
not be entertained. Every accidence is its own 
substrate, and the substrate of its opposite acci- 
dences. The positing Ego, by the most marvelous 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 17I 

of its powers, (productive imagination,) holds the 
vanishing accidence firmly, until it has compared 
it with the accidence whereby it is pushed aside. 
This power is it which, from perennial opposites, 
forms a unity which enters between moments (con- 
tradictions) that would mutually cancel each other, 
and thus maintains both ; this power is it which 
alone makes life and consciousness (and particularly 
consciousness as a continuing series of time-mo- 
ments) possible ; and all this it achieves simply by 
this, that it diverts and guides along itself and in 
itself accidences which have no common bearer, 
and can have none, because they would mutually 
destroy each other. 

III. — The activity as synthetical unity, and the re- 
ciprocity as synthetical unity, mutually determine 
each other. 

The activity as synthetical unity can be best 
characterized as an absolute gathering together and 
holding firmly of opposites (subjective and objective) 
in the category of determinability, wherein they are 
also opposed to each other. 

To make this synthesis clearer, let us compare it 
with the former synthesis (§ 3) of the Ego and the 
Non-E^o through quantity. Just as the Ego was 
there in its quality, absolutely posited as absolute 
reality, so here we absolutely posit something, that 
is, a quantitatively determined, in the Ego, or, in 
other words, so here we absolutely posit the Ego as 
determined quantity ; a. so7nething suhjective is po- 



172 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

sited as an absolutely subjective ; and this proceed- 
ing here is a thesis, and a quantitative thesis in dis- 
tinction from the above qualitative thesis. From a 
thesis, however, all the modes of acting of the Ego 
must proceed. 

(At least it is a thesis in our theoretical part, 
because we can not in it break through the limit of 
its fundamental principle ; when we do so in the 
practical part, we shall see that it is also a synthesis, 
a synthesis which results from the highest thesis.) 

Again, as in § 3, a Non-Ego was opposed to the 
Ego as opposite quality, so here to the subjective 
is opposed an objective, by the mere exclusion 
thereof from the sphere of the subjective ; hence, 
merely through and by means of quantity, (of limi- 
tation, determination,) and this proceeding is a 
quantitative antithesis, as that in § 3 was a qualita- 
tive antithesis. But now the subjective is not to 
be canceled by the objective, and vice versa, precise- 
ly as the Ego was not to be canceled by the Non- 
Ego, and vice versa; both are to coexist. They 
must, therefore, be united, which is done through 
that wherein they are equal, determinability. Both, 
— that is, not the subject and object in themselves, 
but the subjective and objective posited through 
the thesis — are mutually determinable through each 
other, and only in so far as they are so determinable 
can they be taken up and held together by the ac- 
tive power of this synthesis, (productive imagina- 
tion.) 

Again, as above, this antithesis is not possible 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 73 

without thesis, because only to the posited can be 
opposited ; and here also the required thesis is, in 
its content, not possible without the content of the 
antithesis ; for, until something is absolutely deter- 
mined, that is, until the conception of quantity can 
be applied to it, it must exist in its quality. 

But in form, again, the antithesis is not possible 
without synthesis, for otherwise the antithesis would 
cancel the posited of the thesis, and would thus be 
no antithesis, but would be itself a thesis. All the 
three acts are only one and the same act, and are dis- 
tinguished only in reflection as moments of one act. 

The reciprocity as synthetic unity is sufficiently 
characterized as mere relation, as mere mutual ex- 
cluding, or as determinability. This, of course, must 
be abstractly conceived — indeed, in our whole theo- 
retical part, we must always abstract from some- 
thing — must be conceived as mere relation without 
any thing related. A and B, for instance, are op- 
posites ; if one is posited, the other is not ; never- 
theless they are both to be posited, and not merely 
in part, (quantitatively limited,) but wholly. But 
they can not be thought together, except in so far. 
as they mutually ca7icel each other. You can not 
think A, nor can you think B. But you can think 

their union. 

Example. 

Posit in the physical time-moment light = A, 

and in the immediately succeeding moment darkness 

=B. Then they are divided. But the moments join 

each other. Hence, they are not divided. For, let 

15* 



174 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

the dividing line be D, then D is not light, which is 
in A ; nor darkness, which is in B. Hence it is nei- 
ther. But you can also say it is both, for there is no 
such line. Of course, the line D is extended by ima- 
gination to a moment in the latter view, and so it 
is. But so are also A and B, and imaginatiott is 
their origin. Hence, I can and I must, moreover, 
extend D, if I want to think the immediate junction 
of A and B. Productive power of imagination is 
indeed our most marvelous " function, and upon it 
the whole mechanism of human spirit may be 
grounded. 

I. The activity as synthesis determines the reci- 
procity as synthesis means, the joining of the in- 
terchanging links as such is conditioned by an ab- 
solute activity of the Ego, by means whereof this 
Ego opposes an objective to a subjective, and unites 
both. Only in the Ego, and by virtue of this act 
of the Ego, are they reciprocal interchanging links, 
and do they join together. 

It is clear that this result is idealistic. If the 
activity established in it is taken as exhausting 
the essence of the Ego, representation consists in 
this, that the Ego posits a subjective and posits an 
objective in opposition to it, etc. We discovered 
above a law of the mediateness of positing, accord- 
ing to which no objective could be posited without 
canceling a subjective, and vice versa. To this law 
is here added the determination that both are syn- 
thetically united, and must be posited through one 
and the same act of the Ego ; and by this addi- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1/5 

tion the unity of that wherein the reciprocity occurs, 
while the reciprocal links remain opposites, is ex- 
plained, which the law of mere mediation could not 
explain. 

This result, therefore, establishes an intelligence 
as existing with all its possible determinations 
through its mere spontaneity. The Ego is consti- 
tuted as it posits itself, and because it posits itself 
as thus constituted. Still there is here also a de- 
fect left yet. For, go back in the series as far as 
you will, you must always arrive finally at something 
already existing in the Ego, wherein a subjective 
and objective are already posited as opposites. 
The existence of the subjective may thus be ex- 
plained, for it follows from the self-positing of the 
absolute Ego, but not that of the objective. 

2. The reciprocity determines the activity signi- 
fies, not through the real existence of opposites, but 
through their mere joining or touching each other 
in consciousness is oppositing and the gathering 
together of the opposites through the activity of 
the Ego made possible ; that joining is the condi- 
-tion of this activity. 

This sentence says, in complement of the pre- 
vious result, that the excluded objective need not 
have this existence ; it will suffice if a check has exis- 
tence for the Ego, that is to say, if there is a ground 
— unknown — but not contained in this activity of 
the Ego — why it must limit itself, and thus op- 
pose an objective to a subjective. In other words, 
the presupposition of such a system — realistic as it 



176 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

is, but more abstract than all previous realistic sys- 
tems — is, that the Ego is merely determinable, (or, 
has in itself the problem to determine itself.) This 
realism, therefore, does not posit a determination 
(like the quantitative realism) as its presupposition, 
but leaves it to the active Ego to posit this deter- 
mination. (The determinability which it posits in 
the Ego we shall hereafter learn to know 2iS feeling. 
For, though feeling is a determination of the Ego, 
it is not one of the Ego as intelligence, that is, of 
the Ego, which posits itself as determined by the 
Non-Ego, of which we speak here.) 

This system has the defect of every realism, that 
it views the Ego as a Non-Ego ; and hence does 
not explain the transition from the one to the other. 
The determinability, or the requirement that the 
Ego shall determine itself, is posited, that is true ; 
but it is posited without any activity of the Ego. 
Hence it is clear enough how the Ego could be 
determinable for something outside of the Ego, but 
^not how the Ego can be determinable through and 
for itself. For the Ego is only determinable in so 
far as it posits itself as determinable ; and how it 
can posit itself as determinable, or as being re- 
quired by its very nature to determine itself, this 
has not yet been explained. 

3. Both results are to be synthetically united ; the 
activity and the reciprocity are mutually to deter- 
mine each other. 

We found that we could not assume that the 
mere reciprocity, or a mere check, existing with- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 77 

out any action of the positing Ego, could propose 
to the Ego the task of limiting itself ; fof the 
ground of explanation did not contain what was to 
be explained. 

We shall, therefore, have to show that that 
check does not exist without the action of the 
Ego, but that it is, on the contrary, directed upon 
the activity of the Ego in positing itself ; that this 
activity, ever, as it were, proceeding outwardly, 
is thereby driven back (reflected) into itself ; and 
from this reflection we shall then show easily how 
self-limitation, and every thing else resulting there- 
from, follows naturally. This will give us a true 
synthesis of the reciprocity and the activity. The 
check — not posited by the positing Ego — occurs 
only in so far as the Ego is active, and is therefore 
dnly a check, in so far as the Ego is active ; the 
activity of the Ego is the condition of the check. 
No activity of the Ego, no check. On the other 
hand, the self-determining of the Ego will be con- 
ditioned by the check. No check, no self-determi- 
nation of the Ego. Again, no self-determination, 
no object and subject, etc. Let us make clearer 
this very important and final result. 

The activity of the Ego in gathering together 
opposites, and the in itself independent joining 
together of these opposites are to be one and the 
same. The chief distinction lies evidently in the 
gathering together and the joining together. How 
the latter is conditioned by the former is easily 
seen. For joining they are only in so far as a limit 



178 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

is posited between them, for they are complete op- 
posites, and this limit is not posited by either of 
them, but by an independent positing.. But the 
limit is only that which both have in common ; to 
posit their limits, therefore, is to gather them toge- 
ther, and to gather them together is only possible 
by positing their limits. They join only on condi- 
tion of a gathering together, for and through that 
which gathers them together. 

But, again, the gathering together, or the positing 
of a limit, is only to be possible on condition of a 
joining together ; or — since that which is active in 
this limit-positing is to be one of the joining links, 
and only as active — on condition of a check upon 
the activity of this active link. The activity must, 
therefore, extend into the unlimited, infinite, undeter- 
minable. If it did not, its limitation would not in- 
volve at all that its activity had been checked ; for 
the limitation might be involved in its own concep- 
tion, (as is the case in every system which holds that 
the Ego is finite.) In other words, the opposites 
here held together are essential opposites, without 
any point of union. All finite things, however, are 
not essential opposites ; they are equal in the con- 
ception of determinability. And all infinites, in so 
far as there can be a plurality, are thus equal in the 
conception of undetermin ability. Hence, the only 
two essential opposites are : the infinite and the 
finite, of which we have spoken here. 

Both are to be one and the same ; that is, no infi- 
nite, no limitation, and vice versa ; both are united in 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 79 

one and the same synthetic unity. If the activity of the 
Ego were not infinite, it could not hmit this acti- 
vity, itself The activity of the Ego consists in un- 
limitedly positing itself This activity is checked. 
If the activity of the Ego were thrown back by this 
check, that activity which lies beyond the line of 
the check would be completely annihilated and can- 
celed ; and the Ego in so far would not posit at all. 
But it is to posit even beyond this line. It is to 
limit itself, that is, it is in so far to posit itself as not 
positing ; it is to place in this sphere the undeter- 
mined, unlimited, infinite limit = B, and hence it 
must be infinite. 

Again, if the Ego did not limit itself, it would ' 
not be infinite. The Ego is only what it posits 
itself as being. It is infinite signifies : it posits 
itself as infinite ; determines itself by the predicate 
of the infinite ; or it limits itself as substrate of 
the infinite ; or it distinguishes itself from its infi- 
nite activity, which, nevertheless, is also to be its 
own activity, and must, therefore, be in one and 
the same act distinguished and taken back as its 
own. (A + B must be determined by A.) By 
thus taking it back into itself, it determines the ac- 
tivity, and hence makes it not infinite ; at the same 
time it is to be infinite, and hence it must be posit- 
ed outside of the Ego. 

This interchange of the Ego with itself, in posit- 
ing itself at the same time as finite and infinite — an 
interchange which is, as it were, a self-contradic- 
tion, and which reproduces itself constantly, since 



l80 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

the Ego seeks to unite what is not unitable, now 
trying to take the infinite into the form of the finite, 
and now again driven back to posit it outside of that 
form, but in the same moment attempting again to 
seize it in the form of the finite — this interchange 
is the power of Imagination. 

By this power the gathering together and the 
joining is completely united. The joining of oppo- 
sites, or the limit, is itself a production of the gath- 
ering power, for the sake of gathering it. (Abso- 
lute thesis of the imagination, which in so far is 
absolutely productive.) In so far as the Ego and 
this production of its activity are opposed, the join- 
ing members themselves are opposed, and in the 
limit neither of them are posited. (Antithesis of 
imagination.) But in so far as both are again 
united, as that productive activity is to be ascribed 
to the Ego, the limiting links themselves are gath- 
ered together in the limit. (Synthesis of imagina- 
tion, which in this its antithetical and synthetical 
activity, is reproductive, as we shall see hereafter.) 

The opposites are to be gathered together in the 
conception of mere determinability, not of determi- 
nation. If the limit between the opposites (the 
Ego and the object) were fixed and unchangeable, 
then the union would be through determination, 
and the totality would not be complete ; for A + B 
would be determined only through the determined 
A, and not through the undetermined B. Hence, 
that limit is not fixed. The power of imagination 
posits, therefore, an infinite limit, the product of its 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. l8l 

infinitely extending activity. This positing activity 
it tries to ascribe to itself, (to determine A + B by 
A.) If it succeeded, the activity would no longer 
be infinite, but determined, because posited in a 
determined subject. Hence, the imagination is 
driven back into the infinite, that is, is called upon 
to determine A + B by B. Hence, also, only de- 
terminability occurs here, but not determination it- 
self. 

Indeed, the imaginative power posits no fixed 
limit at all, for it has no fixed stand-point ; only 
reason posits something as fixed by first fixing the 
power of imagination. Imagination is a power 
which floats between determination and undetermi- 
nation, between the finite and the infinite ; and 
hence, A -t- B is in it always determined at the 
same time by the determined A and the undeter- 
mined B, which is indeed the above synthesis of 
imagination. This floating imagination character- 
izes through its product ; it produces it, as it were, 
while it floats, and through its floating. 

This floating of imagination between irreconcilable 
links, this its self-contradiction is, as we shall here- 
after show, that which extends the condition of the 
Ego to a jfm^-moment. (For pure reason every 
thing is at once ; only for imagination is there . a 
time.) Imagination can not stand this floating 
long, that is, not longer than a moment, (except in 
the feeling of the sublime, where astonishment, a 
halt of the interchange in time, arises.) Reason 

steps in, (and thus there arises a reflection,) and 

16 



1 82 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

determines imagination to take B up in the deter- 
mined A, the subject ; but as soon as this is accom- 
plished, the determined A must again be Umited by 
an infinite B, etc. etc., until it has arrived at a com- 
plete determination of the (here theoretical) reason, 
which needs no other limiting B outside of reason 
,' in imagination, that is, until it has arrived at the 
representation of the representing. In the practical 
sphere the power of imagination continues in an 
infinite direction to the 'absolutely undeterminable 
idea of the highest unity, to determine which would 
be possible only after a completed infinity, which is 
itself impossible in tinje. 

FINAL REMARKS. 

The fundamental principle of our theoretical 
part, the Ego posits itself as determined through the 
Non-Ego, has now been exhausted. The Ego can 
not posit itself, can not be subject, without positing 
itself as determined through the Non-Ego. (No 
object, no subject.) At the same time, the Non- 
Ego being its own product, it also posits itself as 
determining. (No subject, no object.) 

The problem how two opposites, the Ego and 
the Non-Ego, could be posited together as deter- 
mining each other, is not only shown up as possible, 
but it has been shown that without it the funda- 
mental requirement, the self-positing of the Ego, is 
not possible. Hence, what was at first problemati- 
cal has now apodictical certainty ; and this part of 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 83 

the science is exhausted, since we have returned to 
our first starting-point and proved it. 

Again, if our result has shown itself as the truth, 
it must appear as an origitml fact in our conscious- 
ness, that is, not — like the other thoughts which arose 
during our investigation, (for instance, like the real- 
istic conception of an absolute substance of the 
Non-Ego) — an artificially created fact, not a fact of 
our reflective consciousness. 

The science of knowledge shows up facts, and' 
thereby distinguishes itself from an empty formula- 
philosophy ; but it does not postulate facts ; it 
proves that something must be a fact, 

If this fact is to be a fact in the consciousness 
of an Ego, the Ego must posit it as in its conscious- 
ness ; or, in other words, must try to explain it to 
itself This it does, of course, according to the 
laws of its own being. Hereafter we shall there- 
fore observe how the Ego proceeds to modify, de- 
termine, and work out that fact which was the 
result of our investigation. 

It is clear that thus we shall obtain a second dis- 
tinct series of reflection. In the first, we had a 
series wherein, by pure spontaneity of thought, we 
produced the object as well as the form of our re- 
flection, and finally arrived at the only possible 
result, as moreover a fact to be found in conscious- 
ness. Now, we have to reflect upon this fact, as a 
fact already in this consciousness, which, therefore, 
is not produced, but merely raised to consciousness. 
Hence, while formerly we had to wade through a 



1 84 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

number of hypotheses in order to reach the final 
truth, now these hypotheses vanish, and we have 
only to deal with realities. 

Both modes of reflection take opposite directions. 
The first one started from the proposition : The Ego 
posits itself as determined through the Non-Ego, 
and proceeded to the fact ; the second one starts 
from the fact and goes back to the first sentence, 
which it then shows up to be a fact ; that is, it pro- 
ceeds until it has established as a fact that the Ego 
posits itself, as positing itself determined through 
the Non-Ego. 

Now, since the fact' is the point of union of both 
reflections, and since the fact is a synthesis of two 
opposites, it seems that the same opposites which 
the fact had for the first reflection must appear to 
the second reflection, and that the second reflection 
will only be a repetition of the first. Hence, if 
both are, nevertheless, to be distinct, the two series 
of reflections must receive a distinct characteristic 
in this very last synthesis of the fact. What is this 
character .' 

In the first reflection both opposites are merely 
opposites — a mere relation ; the one is what the 
other is not ; purely negative character — nothing 
positive. Pure thoughts, without reality. Each 
annihilates the other ; and as neither can appear 
without its opposite, which annihilates it, neither 
appears. Our consciousness is empty ; neither can 
fill it. 

It is true, our first series of reflection would, 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 85 

therefore, have been in itself impossible, but for 
a certain deception of imagination, which always 
made us put a substrate under these mere oppo- 
sites. This deception we did not and could not 
wish to remove ; all that was necessary was to de- 
duct it at the conclusion from the final result of our 
calculation as we now do. 

But in the second reflection, after the synthesis, 
they have changed to something tangible, which con- 
sciousness can seize. They become for the reflection. 
(Precisely as light and darkness did, which did not 
annihilate each other in our illustration, but became 
something tangible in the line D, through the power 
of imagination.) 

We have already seen how this change is effect- 
ed in the synthesis by productive imagination. 
Both opposites are to be thought as one. This they 
can not be, and in the endeavor so to think them 
they receive in their mutual relation to each other a 
certain extension and content which will appear 
hereafter as the manifold in time and space. The 
condition of this endeavor is called contemplation. 
The power active in it, productive imagination, as 
we have already said. 

Thus it appears how the absolute contradiction^ 
which threatened to destroy a theory of human 
knowledge, here becomes the only condition which 
makes it possible. We could not see how it would 
ever be possible for us to unite absolute opposites ; 
now we see that an explanation of the occurrences 
in our mind would not at all be possible without 

ibsolute opposites, since that power of imagination 

J6* 



1 86 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

upon which all these occurrences are based would 
not be possible at all, unless absolute opposites, not 
unitable and completely contradictory to the Ego, 
did occur. And this serves at once as the clearest 
illustration that our system is correct, and that the 
explanation has been exhaustive. The presupposed 
can only be explained by the discovered, and vice 
versa. From the absolute opposition results the 
whole mechanism of the human mind ; and this 
whole mechanism can only be explained through an 
absolute opposition. 

At the same time, we now see clearly how idea- 
lity and reality can be one and the same ; and lead 
the one to the other, and are only different when 
regarded as different. The absolute opposites (the 
finite subjective and the infinite objective) are in 
advance of the synthesis mere thoughts, and hence 
ideal, in the sense in which we have always used 
the word. As soon as they are to be united in 
thinking, but can not be so united, they receive 
— through the floating of thinking, which in this its 
function is called imagination — reality, because 
through this floating they become capable of being 
contemplated. In other words, they receive there- 
by reality generally, for there is and can be no other 

i reality than by means of contemplation. Now, by 
abstracting again from this contemplation — as can 

\ be done for mere thinking, though not for consci- 

i ousness generally — that reality changes again into 
ideality ; that is, its being is solely derived from the 

i laws of the power of representation. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 8/ 

We therefore teach here that all reality — of 1' 
course, for us — is solely produced through imagi- 1 
nation. One of the greatest thinkers of our age, 
Kant, who otherwise teaches the same system, so 
far as I have knowledge thereof, calls this a decep- 
tion through imagination. But every deception can 
be avoided. Now, if it is shown, as our system is \ 
to show, that that so-called deception of imagina- 
tion is the ground of the possibility of our consci- 
ousness, of our life, and of our being for us, that is, 
of our being as Ego, then it can not be removed, 
unless we desire to abstract from the Ego, which is 
a contradiction, since the abstracting can not ab- 
stract from itself Hence, the deception does not 
deceive, but gives us truth, and the only possible 
truth. To assume that it deceives is to establish a 
skepticism which teaches to doubt one's own being. 



III. 



SECOND PART 



THEORETICAL PART 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



Theoretical Part 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



INTRODUCTORY REMARKS. 

The result of the first part of the theoretical part 
of the science of knowledge, and which we have 
postulated as necessarily occurring in conscious- 
ness, was this : By means of an as yet incompre- 
hensible check upon the absolute activity of the 
Ego, the power of imagination produces out of the 
two directions thereby occasioned, namely, the ori- 
ginal and the reflected directions of the activity, a 
composite of both directions. 

We have said that this fact, since it is to be in 
the Ego, must be posited, that is, originally deter- 
mined and grounded in and by the Ego ; and that 
this positing of it would give us a second part of 
the theoretical part. For, whereas the first part 
only proceeds to show up the fact, the second part 
involves a system of all the facts which occur in 
consciousness in its original explanation of that 



192 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

one fact. Original explanation, for it is not, as the 
links of the first part were, created by us, but is 
originally within us, and we only make ourselves 
conscious of its shape in us by this explanation. 

Kant proceeded from the assumption of a mani- 
fold which was to be collected in the unity of con- 
sciousness ; he proceeded from the particular to 
the general. He thus attained a general, but only 
a collective general, not an infinite general. For 
finity opens no path to infinity, whereas there is a 
path from undetermined and undeterminable in- 
finity to finity, by means of the determining power. 
(Hence, all finite is product of that power.) We, 
therefore, take the opposite way, and prove that 
there is given a manifold for empirical conscious- 
ness, which proof runs in this wise : the given 
must be something. As such there must be an- 
other, which is also something. When this proof 
shall be possible, we enter upon the sphere of the 
particular. 

The method of the theoretical science of know- 
ledge has been described before, and is simple and 
easy. The thread of our argument is carried along 
in accordance with the principle : Nothing apper- 
tains to the Ego but what it posits in itself. We 
make the deduced fact our startiSg-point, and see 
how the Ego may proceed to posit it in itself. 
This positing of the fact is again a fact, and must 
also be posited by the Ego in itself, and in this 
manner we continue until we have arrived at the 
highest theoretical fact, namely, the fact by which 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 93 

the Ego posits itself consciously as determined 
through the Non-Ego. Thus, the theoretical sci- 
ence of knowledge closes with its fundamental prin- 
ciple, returns into itself, and is completed through 
itself 

DEDUCTION OF SENSATION. 

The conflict of opposite directions of the activity 
of the Ego, which have been described in the first 
part, is something distinguishable in the Ego. As 
sure as this conflict is in the Ego, it must be posit- 
ed by the Ego in the Ego, and hence must be dis- 
tinguished. The Ego posits this conflict signifies, 
firstly : The Ego opposits itself to this conflict. 

Hitherto, that is, on this stand-point of reflection, 
nothing has been posited in the Ego ; nothing is in 
it but what originally pertains to it, pure activity. 
The Ego opposits something to itself can, therefore, 
here signify nothing but : it posits something as not 
pure activity. 

And thus the condition of the Ego in the conflict 
of opposite directions is posited as the opposite of 
the pure activity of the Ego. Hence, it is posited 
as mixed, as itself resisting and self-annihilating 
activity. (This act of the Ego here shown up, 
whereby it posits that condition of a conflict as the 
opposite of its free activity, is purely antithetical.) 

We do not investigate at all here, how, in what ^ 
manner, and through what poWer the Ego can posit 
any thing ; since in this whole theory we only speak 
of the products of its activity. But we have sug- 
17 



194 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

gested already in the first part, that, if the conflict 
is ever to be posited in the Ego, and if ever any 
thing further is to result from it, then, through the 
mere positing of the conflict, the conflict as such, 
that is, the floating of imagination between the 
opposites, must stop, and only the trace of the con- 
flict must remain as a something, as a possible sub- 
stance. How this may be done we can see here 
already, although we do not yet see the power 
through which it is done. For : 

The Ego must posit that conflict of opposite di- 
rections, or opposite powers ; must, therefore, posit 
both powers, and both iti conflict, in opposite, but 
mutually each other balancing activity. But oppo- 
site activity, which balances itself, cancels itself, 
and nothing remains. Yet something is to remain 
and to be posited. Hence, there remains z. perma- 
nent substance, a something which has power, but 
can not actively utter it on account of the opposite 
activity — a substrate of the power. Any one may 
convince himself of this at any moment by an ex- 
periment. And this substrate, which is the impor- 
tant point here, remains not as z. preposited, but as 
mere product of the union of opposite activities. This 
is the ground of all substance, and of all possibly 
remaining substrate in the Ego, (and nothing is 
outside of the Ego,) as will be always more clearly 
seen. 

The Ego is to posit that conflict of directions in 
itself. Hence, there must be in the Ego not only 
a ground of distinction, but also a ground of rela^ 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 95 

tion with this condition ; and since the Ego is 
as yet nothing but pure activity, this ground of re- 
lation must lie in the pure activity. In other words, 
the conflict of opposite directions must also contain 
pure activity ; or, rather, pure activity must be 
posit- d — synthetically transferred into it. 

The conflicting activity of the Ego has just been 
posited as not pure. Now, it is to be posited a.spure, 
in order to be related to the Ego. It is to be pure, 
and to be not pure. Hence, it is to be opposed to 
itself. But this is a contradiction, and can only be 
if there is a third synthetical link of union, where- 
in this conti-adiction is made possible. This third 
link must therefore be posited. Such a third link is 
an activity (of the Non-Ego) opposed to all activity 
of the Ego generally. 

For the conflict of opposite directions can now, 
by means of this third link, be posited as pure ac- 
tivity, when the opposite activity of the Non-Ego 
is aljstracted from ; and is not pure activity, but 
objective activity, when the activity of the Non- 
Ego is placed, in relation to it. Hence, it is pure, 
and is not pure, under condition ; and this condi- 
tion makes the contradiction possible. 

The act shown up here is thetical, antithetical, 
and synthetical, all at once. Thetical, in so far as 
it absolutely posits an unperceivable opposite acti- 
vity of the Non-Ego. {How this can be done will 
be shown hereafter ; we only show now that it must 
be done.) Antithetical, in so far as, by the positing 
or not positing of a condition, it posits one and the 



196 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

same activity of the Ego in opposition to itself. 
Synthetical, in so far as it posits this activity as 
one and the same, by positing the activity of the 
Non-Ego as an accidental condition. 

We now see clearly how the Ego can posit 
the condition of a conflict of contradictory direc- 
tions in itself. It can do so, because that condition 
may also be considered as pure activity of the Ego, 
that is, when we abstract from the influence of the 
activity of the Non-Ego ; and becomes objective 
activity only through that utterly foreign influence 
of the Non-Ego. 

It is to be remembered that this condition of 
contradictory directions is posited in the Ego to- 
gether with all its synthetical content heretofore dis- 
covered ; although the ground of relation is only 
the pure activity of that condition. 

Now, in thus relating itself to (positing within 
itself) the condition of contradictory directions, by 
means of an activity altogether opposed to the Ego, 
the Ego invariably excludes that activity from itself, 
no matter whether it regards its own activity as 
pure or as objective. For in either case the Ego 
posits that opposite activity as the condition of the 
relation ; in the first case, as the condition from 
which it must abstract ; in the second case, as the 
condition it must reflect upon. Here we have the 
highest ground of all externalization of the Ego ; 
the ground why the Ego goes beyond itself and 
posits something as external to itself Here we see 
for the first time clearly how something, as it were, 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1^7 

loosens itself from the Ego, which will probably 
change gradually by further determination into an 
external universe. It is because the Ego in either 
case excludes, posits outside, externalizes that acti- 
vity of the Non-Ego. 

This relation of the condition of contradictory/" 
direction to the Ego is called sensation ; a discover- 
ing, a finding of a foreign other. It is the can- 
celed, repressed activity of the Ego which is felt in 
sensation. It is felt, found as something foreign, 
because it is canceled, limited ; whereas, the origi- 
nal activity of the Ego is pure and absolute. Hence, 
it is externalized. But it is also felt in sensation, 
in the Ego, because it is only canceled activity on 
condition of an opposite activity, without which it 
would not be canceled but pure activity. 



DEDUCTION OF CONTEMPLATION. 

We have deduced sensation as an act of the Ego, * 
whereby it relates a foreign something in itself to 
itself, and posits it as its own. The act, sensation, ' 
we now know, and also its object, that which enters 
sensation. But we do not yet know the sensating, 
that is, the Ego, active in that relation ; nor do we 
know yet the opposite activity of the Non-Ego 
which was excluded in the sensation. Let us now 
seek to know of them. 

Sensation occurs in the Ego ; hence, the Ego ^ 
must posit it originally in itself How does the 
Ego posit sensation in itself ; or how does it posit 
17* 



1 98 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

itself as the sensating ? To do this it must first be 
able to distinguish between its activity in the sen- 
sation and the object of the sensation. The object 
of sensation is activity of the Ego, in so far as it is 
considered as in opposition to another equal acti- 
vity ; as not-activity which would be activity, if the 
opposite activity were removed ; as latent activity, 
substance, or substrate of power. 

The activity of the Ego in sensation, to be dis- 
tinguished from this latent activity, must, therefore, 
be posited as not suppressed, not checked ; hence, 
as real activity. 

Both the activity of the object of sensation and 
of the sensating are to be posited in the Ego. 
Hence, there must be a ground of relation,.of equal- 
ity, of these two opposites. This ground of rela- 
tion must be both, real activity and suppressed ac- 
tivity. As real activity, it must be a positing of the 
Ego ; the Ego must be its real ground. As sup- 
pressed activity, it must be a determined, limited 
positing ; but the Ego can not limit itself The 
ground of limitation must, therefore, be in the Non- 
Ego. The Non-Ego is its ideal grotmd, is the 
ground that it has quantity at all. It is to be both 
together, to be regarded in both ways. Its limitation 
is also to have its ground in the Ego ; and its being 
its ground also in the Non-Ego. Ideal and real 
ground are to be both one and the same. The act 
is to be regarded absolutely as both ; as the abso- 
lute act of the Ego in regard to both its being and 
determinateness ; and as the absolute act of the 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 1 99 

Non-Ego in regard to both its being and determi- 
nateness. 

Such an act is called contemplation. 

The Ego contemplates a Non-Ego. In the con- 
templation the Ego posits itself as absolutely inde- 
pendent of the Non-Ego ; contemplates it because it 
does so, without outward force. It posits by its own 
activity, and with the consciousness of its activity, 
each of the characteristics (qualities) of the Non- 
Ego. But, at the same time, it posits them as 
merely reproductions of the characteristics of an 
external something. This external something is to 
have the same characteristics originally and inde- 
pendent of the Ego, and is to have them according to 
its own laws, not by virtue of the laws of the con- 
sciousness of the Ego. As the Non-Ego is not the 
cause that the Ego contemplates it, so the Ego is 
not the cause of the determinateness of the Non- 
Ego ; both are to be utterly independent, and yet 
in complete harmony. The truth is, if it were pos- 
sible to regard the Non-Ego as in itself, and not as 
in the contemplation, and the contemplating Ego 
as in itself, and not as in relation to the contem- 
plated Non-Ego, they would both be found deter- 
mined in the same manner, and hence their har- 
mony. 

We have now. deduced the ground of all cogni- 
tion as such ; we have shown why the Ego is and 
must be intelligence, namely, because the Ego must 
origijially (that is, without consciousness and for 
the very sake of making consciousness possible) 



200 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

unite a contiadiction existing ivithin itself, between 
its activity and its passivity. It is clear that we 
could not have made this deduction had we not 
gone beyond all consciousness. 

We add the following for the purpose of throwing 
a clearer light on the foregoing, and of promoting 
an insight into our method. In our deductions we 
always regard only the product of an act of the hu- 
man mind, not the act itself But in every subse- 
quent deduction the act which gave rise to the first 
product becomes itself product by a new act which 
gives rise to it. Thus, whatever is established in 
every preceding deduction without any further de- 
termination simply as an act of the mind, is posited 
and thus further determined in every subsequent 
deduction. So, also, in the present case. If we 
look close, we shall find that the contemplation, just 
now synthetically deduced, is to be found already 
in the previous deduction as an act. That act con- 
sisted in this : The Ego, we found, must posit its 
conflicting activity, as pure or as not pure under 
condition, in the Ego. Such an act of positing is 
evidently the contemplation now deduced. In it- 
self, as act, it is solely grounded in the Ego, in the 
postulate that the Ego must posit in itself whatso- 
ever is to occur in the Ego. But it also posits 
something in the Ego which is absolutely not to 
have its ground in the Ego, but in the Non-Ego, 
namely, the impression of the act. As act this con- 
templation is completely independent of the impres- 
sion and the impression of it ; both proceed in pa- 
rallel. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE, 201 



UNION OF SENSATION AND CONTEMPLATION. 

How can the Ego posit it-self as the sensating ? 
or, popularly expressed, how does the Ego manage 
in. order to have sensation ? This was the question 
we had to solve. The deduced contemplation would 
seem to preclude the possibility of such a positing. 
For contemplation, though as act having its ground 
in the Ego, posits something in the Ego which has 
its absolute ground in the Non-Ego. 

The Ego is to posit something foreign to it in 
itself; this foreign something is not-activity, or 
passivity, and the Ego is to posit this passivity in 
itself through activity ; the Ego is, therefore, to be 
active and passive together, and only on the suppo- 
sition of such a union of activity and passivity is 
sensation possible. We must, therefore, show up a 
third link, wherein activity -and passivity are so 
thoroughly united that this determined activity is 
not possible without this determined passivity, and 
vice versa ; that one can only be explained through 
the other, and that each considered in itself is in- 
complete. 

No activity in the Ego can be so related to pas- 
sivity as to produce it ; for, in that case, the Ego 
would both posit and annihilate something in itself 
at the same time, which is a contradiction. But 
the activity may be so related to the passivity as to 
determine it, to draw its limit. And this is indeed 
an activity which is not possible without a passi- 
vity. For the Ego can not cancel itself a part of 



202 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

its activity ; the canceling must occur through 
something outside of the Ego. The Ego can, there- 
fore, draw no limit, unless a something to be limited 
has been given it externally. Determining is, there- 
fore, an activity which necessarily relates itself to a 
passivity. Likewise passivity is necessarily related 
to an activity when it is considered as simply a 
limitation of activity. Our third link is, therefore, 
limitation. 

Sensation is only possible, therefore, in so far as 
the Ego and the Non-Ego mutually limit each 
other, and extends no further than this common 
limit. Beyond the limit the Ego is no longer sen- 
sating, but intelligence. 

By means of limitation, therefore, can the Ego 
be posited as the sensating. If it were not limited 
by an opposite, the Ego could not be posited as the 
sensating. , 

But the Ego is to be limited for itself, is to posit 
itself as the limited, the sensating. In so far as the 
Ego is limited, it only extends to the limit ; but, in 
so far as it posits itself as limited, it necessarily 
goes beyond the limit. The Ego is posited as limit- 
ed means, therefore : in so far as it extends merely 
to the limit, the Ego is opposed to an unlimited 
Ego which goes beyond the limit. Such an un- 
limited Ego must, therefore, be posited for the pur- 
pose of relating the limited Ego to it ; and this Ego 
is unlimited and unlimitable in so far as its activity 
is altogether grounded in itself ; or in so far as it is 
ideal activity, while as limited Ego it is real activity. 



THE SCIENdE OF KNOWLEDGE. 203 

The real activity of the Ego only goes to the 
limit ; its ideal activity extends beyond that limit. 
Neither activity is without the other. Ideality and "^ 
reality are synthetically united in the Ego. 

The real activity can be related to the Ego, be- 
cause it is also ideal ; and by reason of this, its very 
ideality, (freedom, spontaneity,) it is ascribed to 
the Ego as real and limited activity, or as sensa- 
tion. 

Now, it will be observed that the ideal activity 
has no relation at all to a Non-Ego, is purely ideal. 
The Non-Ego being thus invisible to that ideal 
activity, so the Ego also is invisible to it. We, */ 
looking down upon the Ego, see the Ego act, it is 
true, but the Ego itself does not posit itself on this 
stand-point as acting. It forgets, if we may say so, v 
itself in the object of its activity ; and thus we have 
an activity which has all the appearance of a passi- 
vity. The act is an unconscious contemplation. The ' 
Ego is the contemplated, in so far as it has sensa- 
tion ; but it is- also the contemplating, only not con- 
scious thereof, not positing itself as contemplating. 

Here we first meet with a substrate for the Ego, 
namely, the pure activity of the Ego which is po- 
sited as being, although there be no foreign in- 
fluence upon it. The being of this activity is inde- 
pendent of all foreign influence upon the Ego ; but, 
since it can be posited only through its opposite, 
the positedness of this activity is dependent upon a 
foreign influence. 

Sensation is to be posited. This is our task 



204 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

^ But sensation is only possible in so far as the sen- 

, sating is directed upon an object of sensation, and 

/ posits the same in the Ego. Hence, the object of 

sensation must also be related to the Ego by the 

mediating conception of limitation. 

True, it has already been thus related in our first 
deduction of sensation. But at present sensation 
itself is to be posited. We have just thus posited 
it by means of a contemplation ; but this contem- 
plation excluded the object of sensation. Therein 
it was. insufficient, for the object of sensation must 
also be posited as included in and appropriated by 
the contemplation. 

This appropriation is to be achieved by means of 
the conception of limitation, and is only possible if 
the limitation is posited. The solution, therefore, 
required is, how is the object of sensation limited .■' 

Evidently, the very fact of its being excluded in 
sensation, and posited as limiting this sensation, 
proves that it is posited as limited by the Ego, 
or as a Non-Ego. But again, because it is thus 
limited by, excluded from, the Ego, it is also posit- 
ed, in a higher sense, in the Ego. The Ego limits 
it ; hence, it must be in the Ego. 

And now we see clearly how the object of sensa- 
tion is placed in relation to the Ego by the concep- 
tion of limitation. The limitation is the act of the 
Ego, whereby the object of sensation is necessarily 
placed within its sphere of action, and appropriated 
by the Ego as its own. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 20S 



EXPLANATORY. 

In our deduction of sensation we already touched 
this point. There the object of sensation was re- 
lated to the Ego, by the positing of an activity op- 
posed to the Ego as the condition of such relation ; 
that is, as an activity which might or might not be 
posited. The Ego was, therefore, endowed with 
the faculty of positing or not-positing something. 
Mark well : not the faculty to posit, nor the faculty 
not to posit, but the faculty to posit or not to posit ; 
that is, the power to posit a something, and not 
posit this same something in one and the same 
synthetically united act. 

Namely : Sensation, we had shown, is only possi- 
ble if the Non-Ego is posited as accidental condi- 
tion of the object of sensation ; how this positing 
was done we did not stop to inquire. But this 
positing can only be achieved if the Ego posits 
and not-posits at the same time ; hence, such an 
act of positing and not-positing must necessarily 
occur in sensation as a connecting link. Now let 
us see how such an act is accomplished. 

The activity in this positing and not-positing is V ' 
evidently ideal activity. It goes beyond the point 
of limitation. It has, moreover, its ground only in 
the Ego, since we deduced it solely from the re- 
quirement that the Ego must posit in itself what- 
ever is to be in the Ego. But, if the activity is thus 
solely grounded in the Ego, it is a mere not-posit- 

18 



206 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE, 

ing, and no positing whatever ; it is simply pure 
activity. 

But this activity is also to be a positing ; and it 
is a positing, because it does not cancel or diminish 
the activity of the Non-Ego, but only places it 
beyond its own sphere ; and since a Non-Ego is 
never beyond the sphere of the Ego, but only op- 
posed to it, the Ego by this its activity posits the 
Non-Ego — only it posits it throughout an arbitrary 
infinity. 

The Ego is, therefore, limited, because a Non- 
Ego is posited through it ; and is, at the same time, 
unlimited, because it posits the Non-Ego by its 
ideal activity throughout an infinity. 

The activity of the Ego, therefore, in this posit- 
ing and not-positing is a limiting through ideal- 
(that is, free and unlimited) activity. 

Now let us determine this activity of positing 
and not-positing by its opposite; that is, by ^. posit- 
ed and not-posited. 

The activity of the Non-Ego is such a posited and 
not-posited. That activity is posited and not-posit- 
ed at the same time It is posited, for, if it were 
not posited by the Ego, there woiild be no limit ; 
and it is at th& same time not-posited, because the 
Ego constantly extends the limit, and thus cancels 
it. The limit is always posited by the Ego and the 
Non-Ego together, only by each in a different man- 
ner ; and therein they are opposites. In so far as 
the limit is posited by the Ego it is ideal ; and in 
so far as it is posited by the Non-Ego it is real; 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 207 

but is both in a synthetical unity. It is real only 
in so far as it is ideal ; or in so far as it is posited by 
the Ego ; it is ideal (that is, it can be extended by 
the Ego) only in so far as it is real ; or in so far as 
it is posited by the Non-Ego. 

Thus the activity of the Ego, which penetrates 
beyond the limit, becomes both real and ideal. It 
is real because it tends upon something posited 
by the real ; it is ideal, because it tends upon it by 
its own election. 

Thus the perceived becomes relatable to the 
Ego. The activity of the Non-Ego remains ex- 
cluded, for it is pushed together with the limit into 
the infinite ; but the product of this activity, the 
limitation in the Ego, as the condition of its ideal 
activity, becomes relatable to the Ego. 

But since that, to which the product of the Non- 
Ego becomes related, is the ideal activity of the 
Ego — the same activity which is to posit the relation 
— there is no distinction between the relating and 
that to which something is to be related. Hence, 
there is no relation at all with the Ego ; and the 
whole deduced occurrence is a contemplation, in 
which the Ego loses itself in the object of its ac- 
tivity. The contemplated is an idealistically viewed 
product of the Non-Ego, which contemplation ex- 
tends into the infinite. And thus we obtain a sub- 
'strate for the Non-Ego, as we before obtained one 
for the Ego. The contemplating is, of course, the 
Ego, which, however, does not reflect upon itself 

Sensation was to be posited. We have seen both 



208 , THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

how the sensating and the object of sensation are 
posited through contemplation ; but, in order to 
have sensation posited, the sensating and the ob- 
ject of sensation must not be posited separately, 
but in synthetic unity. This is now our concluding 
task. 

In order to posit the Ego as limited, as sensating, 
we required an ideal activity, opposed to the limited 
activity. Again, in order to posit the object of 
sensation, which was beyond the limit, nevertheless 
•within the sphere of the Ego, we required an acti- 
vity of the Ego, always removing the limit into an 
infinity. The synthetical union of both would sig- 
nify : The Ego, in order to be able to limit itself, 
must remove (extend) the hmit ; and in order to 
remove the limit it must limit itself Thus sen- 
sation and conteinplation would be synthetically 
united ; and in sensation, inner contemplation (the 
contemplation of the sensation) and outer con- 
templation (that of the object of sensation) would 
also be synthetically united ; and our task would 
be accomplished. 

1st. The limited activity of the Ego is to be de- 
termined by its opposite, the ideal activity of the 
Ego. In so far, therefore, the ideal activity is the 
presupposition, the condition of a relation between 
the two activities — by no means the sequence of 
such a relation. If both are to be related, then the 
ideal activity is presupposed. 

The limited activity is limited, let us say, in C. 
Its opposite, therefore, the ideal activity, is charac- 



T?IE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 209 

terized by this, that it is not hmited in C, (whether it 
be limited in another point is left, and must be left, 
undetermined.) Hence, the determined point C is 
in this relation related to the ideal activity ; and, 
since the latter is its presupposition, must be con- 
tained in it. The ideal activity is not originally 
directed upon C, but touches it in the relation by 
chance, as it were. As soon as the relation occurs, 
however, the point C is posited wherever it occurs ; 
and there is no freedom in positing its place of oc- 
currence. This place is determined ; and only the 
express positing of the point as point is activity of 
the relation. Moreover, in the relation, this ideal 
activity is posited as going beyond this point C. 
■ This, again, is not possible, unless the point is po- 
sited in the ideal activity as a point, beyond which 
it goes. Hence, throughout all the extension of the 
activity, this point is carried over in it, as an ideal- 
istic point of limitation, wherewith to measure the 
distance, as it were, from the first fixed and im- 
movable point. But since the activity is to go be- 
yond, and never to be limited, this second ideal 
point is also not fixed, but always a moving one, 
and in such a manner that throughout the whole 
extension no point can (idealistically) be posited, 
which this point has not touched. As certain, 
therefore, as that ideal activity goes beyond the 
point of limitation, that point is carried out into the 
infinite, (until, perhaps, we shall touch a new hmit.) 
Now, what activity carries the point thus beyond 

the ideal activity, or that of the relation ? Evi- 

18* 



2IO THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

dently, since for the ideal activity no such point ex- 
ists previous to the relation ; and since, on the other 
hand, the relation itself presupposes that carrying 
beyond, it must be thus : that in the very relation 
and through it the point of limitation as well as its 
carrying beyond are posited synthetically in it ; 
and since all relation is grounded in the Ego, this 
must also be done through ideal activity, but 
/ through another ideal activity than that which we 
know. We have thus the following three acts of 
the Ego : one, which has the ideal activity as its 
object ; another, which has the real and limited 
activity as its object ; and these two must be one 
and the same, though as yet we do not see ho^ this 
can be ; and thirdly, an activity which carries the 
limit from the real into the ideal activity. By 
means of this latter, the ideal activity itself is dis- 
tinguished : firstly, as going merely to C, and thus 
far remaining altogether pure ; and, secondly, as 
going beyond C, and carrying forward the limit. 

2d. But this solving the difficulty of positing the 
Ego as limited and unlimited together, by calling 
its limited activity real and the other ideal, will not 
suffice. For if you ask, again, what is its real ac- 
tivity, all you can say is, its limited activity, etc., 
and the explanation is a circle. We must have a 
different ground of distinction than that of limita- 
tion, or we have no explanation at all. 

Before finding this ground, let us premise what 
we shall discover as the final result ; that is, the 
Ego cannot posit itself /^r itself at all, unless it 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 211 

limits itself, and hence unless it goes beyond it- 
self. 

Originally the Ego is posited through itself ; or, 
it is what it is, for any outside intelligence ; it is 
its own ground ; that is, thus it must be thought, 
if the Ego is thought. Moreover, it has a tendency 
(see the " Practical Part") to Jill uf and encircle the 
infinity ; or, to reflect upon itself as an infinite. 
But this mere tendency produces no act of the 
Ego. 

Now, posit it thus, tending toward C, and at that 
point checked — of course, for any possible outside 
intelligence, which observes the Ego, and which 
has posited that tendency in its own consciousness. 
What will thereby arise in the Ego .■' Evidently a 
tendency to reflect upon itself, which it could not 
'do before, since all reflected must be limited, and 
the Ego before was not limited. 

In C E^i^^o is limited ; hence, in C there arises 
in the Ego, together with the limitation, the reflec- 
tion upon itself; it returns into itself, finds itself, 
feels itself, but clearly nothing outside of itself 

This reflection of the Ego upon itself is, as we 
clearly see from our stand-point of an outside intel- 
ligence, an act of the Ego, grounded in the neces- 
sary tendency and the added condition. But what 
is this reflection for the Ego itself .■" Clearly : In 
this reflection it first finds itself; arises first/^r it- 
self. It can not accept itself as the ground of 
something before it ever was ! Hence, that, self- 
feeling, self-finding is for the Ego a mere passivity : 



212 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

it reflects not for itself, but is reflected by an outside 
something. We, the outside intelligence, saw it 
act, it is true ; but the Ego itself does not see itself 
act ; is purely passive. 

The Ego is now for itself, because, and in so far 
as it is limited, and being an Ego, it must posit itself 
as limited ; that is, must oppose to itself a limiting 
something. This is done by an activity, which goes 
beyond the limit C, and views the limit as an oppo- 
site to the Ego. This activity is altogether ground- 
ed in the Ego. The Ego posits a limiting something, 
because it is limited, and because it must posit what- 
ever it is. It posits it as a limiting something, and 
hence as an opposite and Non-Ego, because it is to 
explain its own limitation. Let no one, therefore, 
believe that we open here a way to penetrate into 
the thing perse ; that is, the thing without refe- 
rence to an Ego. Our presupposition was : the 
Ego is limited. You ask : Has this limitation in 
itself, that is, without reference to a possible intel- 
ligence, a ground, and how is this ground consti- 
tuted .'' But how can you ask so } And how can 
I answer you rationally when you require me to 
abstract from all reason .' For the Ego, (for rea- 
son,) that limitation has a ground, since all limi- 
tation presupposes a limiting ; and for the Ego 
this ground is also not in the Ego, for then the Ego 
would be contradictory, but in an opposite ; and 
such an opposite is, therefore, posited as such by 
the Ego, according to those laws of reason, and is 
its product. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 213- 

Let US repeat this : We say the Ego must be 
Umited if it is to be an Ego ; and must, by the laws 
of its being, posit tliis limitation and its ground in 
a limiting something ; the latter is, therefore, its 
product. 

Now, if any body should be so thoroughly pene- 
trated with transcendent dogmatism that he can 
not yet tear himself from it, he might probably 
argue thus against us : "I admit all this ; but this 
merely explains the representation of the thing in 
the Ego, which certainly is its product, but not the 
thing itself which I want to know about. You say 
the Ego is limited. Very well. But this limita- 
tion, considered in itself, and abstracting altogether 
from its reflection through the Ego, must have a 
ground, and this ground is the thing in itself" To 
this argument we reply : You explain just like the 
Ego which we are considering ; and you are that 
Ego just as surely as you follow the laws of reason 
in your argument. If you will but reflect maturely 
upon this fact, you will see that you with your ar- 
gument remain, though unconsciously, in the same 
circle which we have just pointed out. You will 
never escape that circle, unless you can get beyond 
those laws of thinking. But when you do get be- 
yond them, you will cease to urge such objections 

The Ego is, therefore, in this whole act utterly 
passive and unconscious of its activity ; wherefore, 
the- product thereof, if it should appear to the Ego. 
will necessarily appear to it as existing indepen- 
dently of it. 



214 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

3d. The Ego has gone, for an outside observer, 
beyond C with the tendency to reflect upon itself. 
But as it can not reflect without being limited, it is 
clear that it must be again limited beyond C, say in 
the point D. The Ego also produced, for an out- 
side observer, a Non-Ego, but unconscious of its 
activity. Now, it reflects upon its product, and 
posits it as a Non-Ego, of course without further 
determination and without consciousness, contra- 
dictory as it may sound, since the Ego has not yet 
been reflected upon. 

This second product, a posited Non-Ego, must 
again be reflected upon. The Ego in sensating is 
posited as passive ; the opposite Non-Ego must be 
posited as active. 

This Non-Ego, posited as active, must again be 
reflected upon; and now we enter the field of our 
investigation. 

Through the Ego and in the Ego, though with- 
out consciousness, as we have repeatedly said, an 
active Non-Ego is posited. This is reflected upon, 
or a new activity of the Ego is directed upon it. 
Reflection only tends upon a limited ; hence, the 
activity of the Non-Ego is necessarily limited, limit- 
ed as activity, not in its extent, as might be sup- 
posed, for as yet we have no space. The Non-Ego, 
therefore, is checked in its activity, becomes pas- 
sive ; the manifestation of its power is checked, and 
only a substrate of the power remains. In so far as 
the Ego reflects, it does not reflect upon this reflec- 
tion itself; hence, it does not become conscious of 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 215 

its activity therein, and we thus again obtain the 
above external (though not yet posited as external) 
first original contemplation, which has neither con- 
sciousness, self-consciousness, nor even conscious- 
ness of the object. 

We are now at the same point from which we 
started in our second part of the theoretical part 
of the science of knowledge, that is, at the con- 
tradictory opposite activities of the Ego and the 
Non-Ego. We have seen that no activity of the 
Ego can be annihilated by the Non-Ego, unless the 
Ego proceeds from what we may describe as its 
original sphere, that is, the sphere between A and 
C, into the sphere of the Non-Ego, which extends 
from C into infinity. We have also seen that no 
activity of the Non-E^o is possible unless the Ego 
first posits the Non-Ego and its activity ; both are 
products of the Ego. But we have only seen this 
from the stand-point of an outside observer ; it re- 
main#that the Ego should see this for itself. 
How.-" 

The observer discovered an Ego as a something, 
and a Non-Ego also as a something, and a point of 
union between these two. The limitation of the 
Ego, however, did not appear until the observer 
began to reflect upon the latter two ; by reflection 
he discovered this limitation and all the acts result- 
ing therefrom in the Ego. By virtue of these acts 
the Ego has now attained the same stand-point of 
reflection which the observer occupied. For it has 
been shown now that within the Ego itself, within 



2l6 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

its own sphere of action, as heretofore posited for 
the observer — and as the product of the Ego itself 
there is another Ego, so to speak — an Ego percepti- 
ble because Hmited, and besides this Ego a Non- 
Ego, and a point of union between both. Hence, 
the Ego need only undertake the same reflection 
which the observer undertook, to discover the same. 

It is true the Ego has already reflected at the 
very commencement of its action. But that reflec- 
tion was necessary. The Ego had a tendency to 
reflect ; the limitation of the Ego came as the con- 
dition of the possibility of such reflecting, and hence 
the Ego reflected necessarily. From this necessary 
reflection arose sensation feeling, and all we have 
deduced. The tendency to reflect, however, still 
continuing in the Ego — because it extends into the 
infinite — the Ego can now reflect upon its first re- 
flecting, and all the consequences of that reflecting, 
since the condition of all reflection, limitation 
through something which may be regarded* as a 
Non-Ego, exists. 

If the original reflection of the Ego, therefore, 
was necessary, its present reflecting is not so. For 
the condition of this present reflecting is not un- 
conditionally a Non-Ego, but may also be regarded 
as contained in the Ego. It is not limited by an 
absolute Non-Ego in this reflection, but by a Non- 
Ego which is its own production, and which hence 
may be regarded as such ; and thus the limitation, 
the condition of the reflection, may be taken away. 

But if what we have posited in the Ego really is 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 21/ 

in the Ego, then the Ego must reflect. Hence, we 
postulate the reflection. For example, many im- 
pressions may be made upon the Ego ; unless it 
reflects upon them, no impressions have been made 
upon the Ego. It may, and it may not, so reflect. 
At present we postulate it. 

Hence, the demanded reflection occurs now with 
absolute spontaneity ; the Ego reflects because it 
reflects. Thus, not only the tendency to reflect 
has its ground in the Ego, but even the act of re- 
flection ; to be sure, it is conditioned \iy a Non-Ego, 
by a received impression, but it is not necessitated 
thereby. 

In this self-reflection of the Ego there are two 
links, the reflected Ego and the reflecting Ego. 
Both will probably be united in a third, according 
to our synthetical method. 

1st. The Ego we have hitherto been able only to 
characterize as feeling, as a feeling Ego and nothing 
else. The reflected Ego is limited means, there- 
fore, it feels itself limited, feels an outside compul- 
sion. Again, in so far as the Ego posits itself as 
limited, it goes beyond the limit, that is, it posits, 
at the same time, a Non-Ego, but without conscious- 
ness of its action. 

The feeling of compulsion is, therefore, united 
with a contemplation, but an unconscious contem- 
plation, of the Non-Ego. 

Both the itself-feeling Ego and the contemplated 
Non-Ego must be^ synthetically united ; this is 
done by the limit. The Ego, because it feels it- 

19 



2l8 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

self limited, posits the contemplated Non-Ego as 
the cause of its limitation, as the explanation of the 
feeling of compulsion. 

But the difficulty is, where does the original feel- 
ing of compulsion arise from ? To be sure, I ex- 
plain it by the Non-Ego, but the feeling precedes 
the contemplation of the Non-Ego. Hence, it 
must be explained independently of the Non-Ego. 
This question leads to our second, the antithesis. 

2d. The act of the reflecting Ego we have cha- 
racterized as absolutely spontaneous, ideal activity 
of the Ego. As such it must be posited, that is, as 
going beyond the limit into the infinite. But to be 
reflected upon, it can not go into the infinite ; hence, 
in its going beyond the limit, it must nevertheless 
be limited. There must be a limitation conjointly 
with the unlimitedness. How 1 

The activity can not be reflected as activity, (the 
Ego can never become immediately conscious of 
its activity,) but as substrate, that is, as product of 
an absolute activity of the Ego, a product contem- 
plated by the Ego without consciousness of the 
contemplation. Hence, in so far as the Ego re- 
flects upon the absolute spontaneity of its reflection 
in the first act, an unlimited product of the activity 
of the Ego, as such, is posited. This product, po- 
sited as product of the Ego, must be placed in rela- 
tion to the Ega It can not be related to the contem- 
plating Ego, for this Ego has not yet been posited ; 
it must be related to the Ego which feels itself 
limited. But this latter Ego is opposed to that 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 219 

Ego which produces through freedom an unlimited ; 
the Ego which feels itself limited is not free, but is 
under compulsion ; and the producing Ego is not 
compelled, but produces spontaneously. 

Thus, indeed, it must be, if relation and syn- 
thetical union is to be possible and necessary ; and 
we have only to find the ground of the relation. 

This ground must be activity with freedom, or 
absolute activity. But such an activity can not be 
predicated of the limited Ego ; hence, a union of 
both seems impossible. 

One step more, and we shall find the surprising! 
result, putting an end to all old errors, and reinstat- \ 
ing reason for evermore in her eternal rights. 

The Ego is to be the relating. Hence, the Ego 
necessarily, absolutely of itself, and against the out- 
ward ground of limitation, proceeds beyond itself, 
and thus appropriates the product which, through 
freedom, it makes its own product ; ground of re- 
lation and the relating link are the same. 

Of this act the Ego never becomes conscious, 
and never can become conscious ; its essence con- 
sists in absolute spontaneity, and, as soon as you 
reflect upon it, it ceases, to be spontaneity. The 
Ego is only free in acting ; as soon as it reflects 
upon this act, it ceases to be free, and the act be- 
comes product. 

From, the impossibility of the consciousness of a 
free act arises the whole distinction between ideality 
and reality, between representation and the thing in 
itself. 



220 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

Freedom, or, which is the same, the immediate 
acting of the Ego, is the uniting link of ideality and 
reality. The Ego is free in positing itself as free, 
in liberating itself ; and it posits itself as free, or 
liberates itself in being free. Determinateness and 
being are one ; acting and product are one ; in de- 
termining itself to act, the Ego acts ; and in acting 
it determines itself 

The Ego can not posit itself in reflection as free, 
for this would be a contradiction which could never 
lead to freedom. But it appropriates something as 
product of its own free activity, and thus mediately 
posits itself free. 

3d. The Ego is limited in feeling itself, and posits 
itself in so far as limited. This was our first state- 
ment. The Ego is free, and posits itself at least 
mediately as free, because it posits the limitation 
as product of its free activity. This was our second 
statement. Both statements, limitation in feeling 
and freedom in producing, are utterly opposites. 
They might be united by showing that the Ego 
could posit itself in different respects as free and 
limited. But our statements have distinctly assert- 
ed that the Ego is to. posit itself as limited, 
because and in so far as it posits itself free, and 
vice versa. The Ego is to be free and limited in 
one and the same respect, and this is the contradic- 
tion which is to be solved in a third statement. 
Let us look at the two statements a little closer. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 221 



THESIS. 

I St. The Ego is to posit itself as limited because 
and in so far as it posits itself as free ; or, the Ego 
is free only in so far as it acts. Now, What is act- 
ing } What its distinction from not-acting } All 
acting presupposes power. Absolute acting means, 
a power determining itself solely through and in 
itself, that is, giving itself a direction. Before, the 
power had no direction, was latent power, a mere 
tendency to apply power. The Ego, to posit itself 
as absolutely acting, must, therefore, in reflection, 
also be able to posit itself as hot-acting. To deter- 
mine itself as acting presupposes rest. 

Again, the power gives itself a direction, that is, 
an object. Gives itself an object ; hence, it must 
have had the object before ; must have received the 
object passively. Hence, a self-determining to act 
on the part of the Ego presupposes passivity. 

New difficulties everywhere ! But from them 
the clearest light will be thrown upon a subject. 

ANTITHESIS. 

2d. The Ego is to posit itself as free because and 
in so far as it posits itself as limited. The Ego 
posits itself as limited means, it posits a limit to its 
activity, (it does not produce this limit, but posits 
it as posited by an opposite power, a Non-Ego.) 
Hence, in order to be limited passively, the Ego 
must previously have acted ; its power must have 

19* 



222 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

had a direction, and a self-determined direction. 
All limitation presupposes free activity. 



SYNTHESIS. 

3d. The Ego is as yet for itself limited, necessi- 
tated, in so far as it goes beyond the limitation and 
posits a Non-Ego which it contemplates without 
self-consciousness. Now, this Non-Ego is, as we 
have seen from our higher stand-point, a product 
of the Ego, and the Ego must reflect upon it as its 
product. This reflection necessarily occurs through 
absolute self-activity. 

But the Ego, this very same activity, can not, at 
the same time, produce a Non-Ego and reflect upon 
it as its production. 

Hence, it must interrupt its first activity ; and 
must so interrupt it through absolute spontaneity. 
Only thus, indeed, is absolute spontaneity possible. 
For the Ego is to determine itself But the Ego 
is in essence nothing but activity. Hence, it must 
limit one of its acts ; and, because it is nothing but 
activity, it must limit the act by another opposite 
act. 

Again, the Ego is to posit its product, the oppo- 
site Non-Ego as its product. Through the same 
act which interrupts the first one it thus posits the 
Non-Ego, and elevates it to a higher degree of re- 
flection. The lower, first region of reflection is 
thus broken off" ; and all we have to do now is to 
seek the point of union of both forms of reflection. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 223 

But since the Ego is never immediately conscious 
of its acting, it can posit the product as its product 
only through a new reflection by mediation. 

Through this new reflection the product must be 
posited as product of absolute freedom, the distinc- 
tive characteristic whereof is, that it might be other- 
wise, or might be posited otherwise. Contemplation 
floats between several determinations, and posits 
amongst all possible determinations only one, where- 
by the product receives the peculiar character of an 
image* 

In so far as the Ego posits this image as product 
of its activity, it necessarily opposes to it something 
which is not its product, which is no longer deter- 
minable, but perfectly determined, and thus deter- 
mined through itself, not through the Ego. This 
is the real thing by which the Ego is guided in 

* Let us exemplify this by an object with various characteristics. 
In the first contemplation, the productive contemplation, I am lost 
in an object. I reflect upon myself at first, tind myself, and dis- 
tinguish myself from the object. But as yet all is mixed and con- 
fused in the object, and it is nothing further than an object. I then 
begin to reflect upon its several characteristics, for instance, its 
figure, color, etc., and posit them in my consciousness. At each 
separate characteristic of this kind, I am at first in doubt and hesi- 
tating. I then make some arbitrary scheme of a figure, color, etc., 
the basis of my observation, and now observe closer. And now I 
first begin to determine my scheme of the figure, perhaps as a cube, 
and my scheme of a color, perhaps as dark green. By this process 
of going from an undetermined product of free imagination to its 
complete determinateness in one and the same act, that which occurs 
in my consciousness becomes an image, and is posited as an image. 
It becomes my product, because I must posit it as determined 
through absolute self-activity. 



224 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

sketching its image, and which must, therefore, ne- 
cessarily appear to it in its imaging, (in its repre- 
sentation.) This real thing is the product of the 
interrupted act, but which can not now be possibly 
posited as such product. 

The Ego images after this thing. Hence, the 
thing must be entertained in the Ego and accessi- 
•ble to its activity ; or, in other words, we must be 
able to show a ground of relation between the thing 
and the image of the thing. Such a ground of re- 
lation is the perfectly determined but unconscious 
contemplation of the thing. For and in this con- 
templation all the characteristics of the thing are 
perfectly determined, and in so far it is related to 
the thing, and the Ego is passive in the contempla- 
tion. Still, it is also an act of the Ego, and, hence, 
relatable to the Ego, active in the imaging of this 
thing. The Ego has access to this contemplation^ 
and determines the image in accordance with the 
characteristics furnished in the contemplation. In- 
other words, the Ego reviews spontaneously the 
several characteristics of the thing, enumerates 
them, and gives its attention to them. Or, this un- 
conscious contemplation is the ground of all har- 
mony we assume between our representations and 
the things, and explains the whole difficulty. 

In imaging, the Ego is perfectly free. The 
image is determined thus, because the Ego freely 
so determines it ; and this freedom makes the image 
relatable to the Ego, and capable of being posited 
in the Ego as its product. But the image is to be 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 22$ 

not empty, but corresponding to a thing outside of 
the Ego ; hence, it must be relatable to this thing. 
The thing has become relatable to the Ego, as we 
have seen, by means of a presupposed immediate 
unconscious contemplation thereof. The image, to 
be related to the Ego, must be determined by the 
thing so as to be an exact counterpart of it, and 
this complete and same determination of image and 
thing is their ground of relation. There is no dis- 
tinction now at all between the image and the un- 
conscious contemplation of the thing. 

But this result is a contradiction of our former 
statement, that nothing which is necessarily de- 
termined as such or such can be a product of the 
Ego. 

What in our former statement was a representa- 
tion, now becomes a thing per se, and the question 
still remains, whether there are only things and no 
representations, as the last result would imply, or 
representations and no real things, as our former 
statement asserted. 

A synthetic solution of these conflicting state- 
ments would assert : an image is not~ at all possible 
without a thing ; and a thing — at least for the Ego 
— is not possible without an image. 

The Ego is to relate the image to the thing. 
This relation, we must show, is not possible with- 
out presupposing the image as such, that is, as free 
product of the Ego. In other words, the thing is 
not possible without the image. 

Again, the Ego is to construct the image with 



226 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

freedom. It must be shown that this is not possi- 
ble without presupposing the thing ; or, that the 
image is not possible without the thing, of course, 
for the Ego. 

1st. The Ego is to relate the image to the thing. 
As this act of the Ego does not occur in immediate 
consciousness, it is difficult to see how a distinction 
can be posited between the image and the thing, 
unless the Ego occurs mediately in consciousness, 
that is, unless the object (or unconscious produc- 
tion) of the activity of the Ego (the thing) is posited 
as product of freedom, that is, as accidental, as a 
thus which could be otherwise. 

The thing is thus posited as accidental, in so far 
as the perfectly determined image is related to it. 
The perfectly determined image, for instance, or 
quality, is the red color. This is to be related 
to a thing by an absolute act of the Ego. The 
thing is to be determined by the image. Hence, 
the thing must be posited before this relation, and 
independently of it, as such, which may be, or may 
not be, thus determined ; and is only thus posited 
as accidentally determined in consequence of the 
act of relation. Hence, the thing discovers itself, 
since its quality is altogether accidental, as presup- 
posed product of the Ego, which has no predicate 
but that of being. The free act, and the necessity 
that such a free act should occur, is the only ground 
for proceeding from the undetermined to the de- 
termined, and vice versa. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 22/ 

ANOTHER ILLUSTRATION OF THIS POINT. 

You say A is red. A, the first posited, is posited 
as, firstly, completely determined by itself. A is 
A, and nothing else. Now, you add and say, A is 
red. Red is also completely determined, it is what 
it is, and nothing else. Now, you join both togeth- 
er. What was A, as far as redness is concerned, 
before this joining 1 Evidently altogether undeter- 
mined. You might have predicated any color of 
it. It is the joining, expressed by the copula is, 
which makes the undetermined determined, which 
negates all other determinations but the one stated. 
If A had been previously determined, you could 
not have made an assertion of it. 

Result : If the reality of the thing (as substance) 
is presupposed, the quality thereof is posited as acci- 
dental, and hence the thing is mediately posited as 
product of the Ego. 

It is the quality of the thing to which we relate 
the Ego. 

2d. The Ego is to construct -the image with per- 
fect freedom. In so far as it does this, floating be- 
tween many possible determinations of the thing 
and choosing one, the Ego mediately posits itself 
as Ego, and limits itself. The image is not yet de- 
termined, but it is being determined ; the Ego is in 
the act of determining. We will call this its condi- 
tion, A. (It is the inner contemplation of the Ego 
in constructing.) 

In so far as the Ego acts, it posits over arid 



228 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE, 

against this free floating image, and mediately 
against itself, the imaging, the perfectly determined 
quality, of which we have said above that it is taken 
up and seized by the Ego, by means of the im- 
mediate but unconscious contemplation of the thing. 
This determined quality is posited as opposite, 
hence as excluded from the Ego. We will call 
it B. 

If A is totality, B is excluded from it ; but, if B 
is posited, A is excluded from the totality. For 
the Ego posits the quality as determined, and must 
do so if it is .to posit itself as free in the imaging. 
The Ego must, therefore, reflect on this determina- 
tion of the quality ; and by this the Ego is excluded 
from the totality ; that is, it is no longer self-suffi- 
cient, no longer through itself, but through another 
and an opposite ; that is, its condition, its reflection, 
the image within it, can no longer be explained 
altogether out of itself, but only by an external 
other. Hence, we have A -F B, or A determined 
by B as totality. (External, determined, pure con- 
templation.) 

The reflection must turn upon A -I- B in this 
their connection, that is, it must turn upon the 
quality, as a determined, particular quality, if the 
quality is to be in the Ego, or in consciousness. 
This reflection occurs, of course, like every reflec- 
tion, through absolute spontaneity ; the Ego reflects 
because it is Ego. It does not become conscious 
of this spontaneity ; but the object of its reflection, 
as such, becomes product of this spontaneity, and 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 22g 

must, therefore, bear the character of a product of 
a free act, that is, accidentalness. But it can not be 
accidental in the same manner in which it is posit- 
ed as detertnined, hence it must be so in another 
respect. We shall soon see how. 

This accidental character makes it a product of 
the Ego ; the Ego, therefore, determines itself again, 
and this it can not do without opposing to itself 
something, that is, a Non-Ego.' 

REMARK. 

(The Ego reflects with freedom, an act of deter- 
mining which, by its very nature, becomes itself 
determined ; but it can not reflect or posit a limit 
without, at the same time, absolutely producing 
something as that which forms the limit. Deter- 
mining and producing, therefore, always go toge- 
ther ; and it is this which keeps up the identity 
of consciousness.) 

This something, opposed to the Ego, is necessary 
in relation to the determined quality ; and this quali- 
ty is accidental in relation to the something. Again, 
this something, like the quality, is opposed to the 
Ego, and hence, like it, is a Non-Ego, but a neces- 
sary Non-Ego. 

But the quality, as determined, as something 

against which the Ego is merely passive, we have 

seen, must be excluded from the Ego ; and the 

Ego, when reflecting upon it as so determined, 

must thus exclude it. 

20 



230 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

Now, we have just found another Non-Ego, which 
the Ego, in reflecting, excludes as determined and 
necessary. Both, tlierefore, must be placed in rela- 
tion to each other and be synthetically united. 
Their ground of union is that both are Non-Ego, 
and hence, in relation to the Ego, both are one and 
the same ; their ground of distinction is, that the 
quality is accidental, might be otherwise ; but the 
substrate, as such, is necessary in relation to the 
quality. The quality must have a substrate, but the 
substrate must not necessarily have this particular 
quality. Such a relation of the accidental to the 
necessary in their synthetical union is called the 
relation of substantiality. 

The reflection must turn upon the excluded B, 
the necessary Non-Ego. From this reflection it 
follows that A -t- B, which was heretofore posited 
as totality, can no longer be totality, that is, can no 
longer be the only contents of the Ego, and hence 
accidental. It must be determined by the necessary 
B. The formula now is, A 4- B determined by B. 

First of all, the quality, the image, or whatever 
you choose to call it, must be thus determined by 
the necessary Non-Ego. This quality was posited 
as accidental, the thing as necessary ; both, there- 
fore, as opposites. Now, in the reflection of the 
Ego, they must be united in the same Ego. This 
is done by absolute spontaneity. The union is al- 
together product of the Ego. The union is posited 
means, a product is posited through the Ego. The 
Ego, however, is never immediately conscious of it? 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 23 1 

acting, but only in and by means of the product. 
The union of both must, therefore, be posited as acci- 
dental ; and since all accidental is posited as arising 
through acting, it follows that the union itself must 
be posited as having arisen through acting. But 
that which, in its existence, is itself accidental and 
dependent, can not be posited as acting ; hence, 
only the necessary can be thus posited. Hence, in 
the reflection, and by means of it, the conception 
of acting is transferred to the necessary, though in 
reality this conception lies only in the reflecting, 
and the accidental is posited as product thereof, as 
expression of the free activity of the necessary. 
Such a synthetical relation is called the relation of 
causality, and the thing, viewed in this synthetic 
union of the necessary and the accidental in it, is 
the real thing* 

* We append at this important point 4he following remarks : 

1. The just discovered act of the Ego is evidently an act through 
the power of imagination in contemplation ; for, firstly, the Ego 
unites opposites in it, which is the business of imagination ; and, 
secondly, it loses itself in this act, and transfers what is in it upon 
the object of its activity, which is the characteristic of contempla- 
tion. 

2. The so-called category of causality shows itself here, therefore, 
as having its origin only in the power of imagination, and thus it is 
indeed ; nothing can get into the understanding except through the 
power of imagination. What alteration the understanding may 
make of this product of the imagination can here already be fore- 
seen. We have posited the thing as acting free without any rule, 
(and until the understanding comprehends its own manner of acting 
it is thus posited in consciousness as fate^ because the power of 
imaigination transfers to it its own free acting. The sequence of a 
law is wanting. Whenever understanding shall be directed upon 



J 



ffl 



232 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

That which we have called expression of the ac- 
tivity of the thing, and which we found perfectly 
determined, is posited in the Ego, and is determined 

the thing so as to comprehend it according to law, then the thing 
will also appear as working in obedience to those laws. 

3. Kant, who causes the categories to be originally generated as 
forms of thinking, and who, from his point of view, is very correct 
in this, stands in need of the schemes sketched by the understand- 
ing in order to make possible their application to the objects ; hence, 
he does as we do, and makes them accessible to the working of the 
imagination. In the science of knowledge these categories arise in 
imagination itself, at the same time and together with the objects, 
and in order to make these first possible. 

4. Maimon views the category of causality in the same manner 
as the science of knowledge ; only he calls this procedure of the 
human mind a deception. But we have seen that that can not be 
called deception which is proper and necessary by virtue of the 
laws of a rational being, and which can not be avoided unless we wish 
to cease being rational beings. But the real point of dispute lies here. 
Maimon would say : " Supposing, as I admit, that your laws of 
thinking are h priori, then you can certainly apply them to objects 
only by the power of imagination ; and hence, in applying them, 
object and law must be, at the same time, in imagination. But how 
do you get the object ?" The answer is, Imagination itself must pro- 
duce the object. If you assert the object to be produced in any 
other manner, you become a transcendent dogmatist, and utterly 
removed from critical philosophy. 

5. Maimon has only doubted the applicability of the law of 
causality, but he might as well have doubted all ^ priori laws. 
This Hume does. He says : " It is your self who transfer the con- 
ception of causality which you have in you to the external things, 
and hence your knowledge has no objective validity." Kant admits 
the first part of the sentence not only with respect to the law of 
causality, but for all h priori laws ; but he rejects the conclusion by 
proving that an object is only possible for a subject. Maimon 
says, it is only by imagination that you apply the law of causality to 
objects ; hence your knowledge has no objective validity, and it is a 
mere deception if you apply your laws of thinking to objects. The 
science of knowledge admits the premise not only for the law of 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 233 

for the Ego, as we have also seen. Hence, the Ego 
mediately is determined by the thing, and thus, 
ceasing to be Ego, becomes itself product of the 
Non-Ego, because that which fills it is product of 
the Non-Ego or of the thing. The thing, by means 
of this its expression, works even upon the Ego, 
and the Ego is no longer posited through itself, but 
posited in this its determination through the thing, 
(This is the famous influence of the thing upon the 
Ego, or the physical influence of the Locke school 
and of the new eclecticians, who, from the utterly 
heterogeneous components of the Leibnitz and the 
Locke systems, have composed an unconnected 
whole, the true statement of which we have just 
now attempted, but which has truth also only in 
this transitory connection.) 

But the Ego can not be Ego and product of the 
Non-Ego. Such, however, was the result of our 
formula: A -|- B determined by B. Hence, this 
formula must be again posited in the Ego, or must 
be again determined by A. 

A, that is, the effect which was said to have been 
produced in the Ego by the thing, is posited with 
respect to the Ego as accidental. Hence, there is 
necessarily opposed to this effect and to the Ego, 
in so far as it is determined thereby, an indepen- 
dent in itself and through itself existing Ego. Just 
as we opposed to the accidental in the Non-Ego 

causality, but for all i. priori laws, but shows by a closer determina- 
tion of the object that our knowledge has objective validity for that 
very reason, and can only have it on that condition. 

'20* 



234 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

the necessary thing, so we now oppose to the acci- 
dental in the Ego the necessary or the Ego per se; 
and this latter, like the necessary Non-Ego, is pro- 
duct of the Ego itself. The necessary is substance ; 
the accidental an accidence of it. Both must be 
synthetically united as one and the same Ego. 
But since they are absolute opposites, they can 
only be united by absolute activity of the Ego, 
whereof the Ego never becomes immediately con- 
scious, but rather applies it to the objects of the 
reflection, thus positing the relation of causality 
between the two. In the reflection the accidental 
becomes effect of the activity of the absolute Ego 
and hence something real for the Ego, its utter- 
ance. That it is effect of the Non-Ego is altogether 
lost sight of in this reflection, since it can not be 
posited at the same time as effect of the Ego and 
of the Non-Ego. ' Thus, the thing and its utter- 
ance are completely excluded from the Ego and 
opposed to it. 

Both the Ego and the Non-Ego exist in them- 
selves necessary, and both completely independent 
of each other ; both utter themselves in this inde- 
pendence, each by its own activity and power, 
which power, however, is as yet perfectly free. 

We have now shown how we came to oppose an 
acting Ego and an acting Non-Ego, and to consider 
both as completely independent of each other. In our 
present view the Non-Ego exists because it exists, 
and is altogether determined through itself; but 
that it is imaged, represented by the Ego, is acci- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 235 

dental for the NonrEgo. Again, the Ego acts ab- 
solutely through itself ; but that it images the Non- 
Ego is accidental for it. The utterance of the thing 
in its appearance is product of the thing ; but the 
appearance, in so far as it exists for the Ego, is 
again product of the Ego. 

The Ego can not act without having an object ; 
Jience, the acting of the Ego posits that of the Non- 
Ego. Again, the Non-Ego can not act, that is, for 
the Ego, unless the acting of the Ego is preposited. 
The utterance of both powers is, therefore, neces- 
sarily synthetically united, and we must now show 
the ground of their union, their harmony. 

This union occurs through absolute spontaneity. 
But what is posited through freedom has the cha- 
racter of the accidental ; hence, the present syn- 
thetical union must have this character. It is, 
therefore, the accidental unity of the acting we 
have to examine, or the accidental junction of the 
acting of the Ego, and of the acting of the Non- 
Ego in a third, which is and can be nothing but their 
junction, and which we shall call for the present a 
point. 

TIME AND SPACE. 

Contemplation is determined in time, and the con- 
templated in space. 

We have determined contemplation, in our last 
paragraph, as the synthetical union of t"he acting of 
the Ego and of the acting of the Non-Ego through 



236 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

their accidental junction in a point. This contem- 
plation occurs in the Ego means, it is posited as acci- 
dental. The contemplation X is posited as coiitem- 
plation accidental means, another contemplation — 
not another object, determination, or any such thing, 
but — another contemplation, which we shall call Y, is 
opposed to it. Y is necessary when opposed to 
X, and X is accidental in opposition to Y. Y is, 
therefore, completely excluded from the Ego, which 
rests in the contemplation of X. 

X, as contemplation, necessarily rests in a point 
So does Y, but in an opposite, distinct point. One 
point is not the other. 

The question is now, What necessity is it which 
Y has in relation to X, and what accidentalness 
which X has in relation to Y 1 Clearly, the con- 
templation Y and its point are necessarily syntheti- 
cally united if X is to be united with its point, or 
the union of X and its point presupposes that of Y 
and its point, but not vice versa. In that point 
wherein X is posited ano tker contemTpla.tion might 
be posited ; at least, so the Ego judges ; but in the 
point of Y none but Y can be posited, if X is to be 
posited as contemplation of the Ego. Only in so 
far as the accidentalness of this synthesis is posited, 
is X to be posited as contemplation of the Ego ; 
and only in so far as to this accidentalness is op- 
posed the necessity of the same synthesis is the 
accidentalness itself to be posited. 

The much more difficult question remains, how 
the points X and Y are to be otherwise determined 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 237 

than through the respective contemplations X and 
Y. As yet they are only points wherein a causal- 
ity of the Ego and the Non-Ego meet. It is, how- 
ever, clear that, if X is to be posited as the point 
wherein another contemplation may be posited, and 
Y as its opposite in which no other can be posited, 
both points dirempt from their contemplations, and 
must be distinguishable from each other. We can 
not yet see how this is possible, but we can see that 
it must be possible if ever a contemplation is to be 
ascribed to the Ego. 

1st. We have shown before that, if A is posited as 
totality, B is excluded. If A signifies the image to 
be determined spontaneously, B signifies the inde- 
pendent and necessary quality of the image. We 
now apply this here. — From the contemplation X, 
as such, the determined object X is excluded ; and 
the same in the contemplation Y. Both objects, as 
such, are determined ; that is, the Ego in contem- 
plation must posit them exactly as it posits them. 
This, their determinateness, is to remain, of course. 

But the same relation which exists between the 
contemplations must exist between the objects. 
Hence, the object X is accidental in reference to Y, 
but Y necessary in reference to X. The deter- 
mination of X necessarily presupposes that of the 
Y, but not vice versa. 

But since both objects, as objects of contemplation, 
are perfectly determined, their postulated relation 
can have no reference to this determinateness, but 
must refer to another as yet unknown determinate- 



238 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

ness, one through which something does not be- 
come an object generally, but an object of a con- 
templation distinguishable from another contempla- 
tion. The required determination does not belong 
to the inner determinations of the object, (in so far 
as it is A == A,) but is an external one. Unless 
we have the required distinction, a contemplation 
can not be posited in the Ego. The distinction, 
however, is not possible without this external de- 
terminateness of the object, and the object can not 
be an object of contemplation without this determi- 
nateness. It is, therefore, the exclusive condition 
of all contemplation. We call this unknown some- 
what through which the object is to be determined 
O ; the way in which Y is determined through it, 
we call Z ; and the way in which X is determined 
through it, V. 

The mutual relation is, therefore, as follows : X 
must be posited as to be or not to be synthetically 
united with V, and hence V also as to be united 
thus with X or with any other object ; but Y must 
be posited as necessarily in synthetical union with 
Z, if X is to be united with V. 

7/" V is posited as to be united with X, or as not 
to be united with X, Y is posited necessarily as 
united with Z. From this it results that every pos- 
sible object may be united with V except Y, for Y 
is already inseparably united. Thus, also, may X 
be united with every possible O, except with Z, for 
this is inseparably united with Y. 

X and Y are both completely excluded from the 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 239 

Ego ; the Ego loses and forgets itself completely 
in their contemplation. The relation we have here 
shown up is, therefore, to be ascribed to the things 
themselves ; the relation appears to the Ego as not 
dependent upon its freedom, but as determined 
through the things. 

The relation was: because Z is united with Y, X 
is excluded from it. It must, therefore, applied to 
the things, be expressed thus : Y excludes X from 
Z ; Y determines X negatively. If Y extends to 
the point d, X goes to this point ; if it only extends 
to c, Xgoes to c. But since the only ground why 
X can not be united to Z is this, that Y excludes 
it, X certainly begins where Y ceases to exclude it ; 
hence, continuity belongs to both. 

This exclusion, this continuity is not possible 
unless X and Y are both in a common sphere, (which 
we do not know as yet,) and meet in one point in 
this sphere. The positing of this sphere constitutes 
the synthetic union of both as required. Hence, 
such a common sphere is produced by the absolute 
spontaneity of the power of imagination. 

2d. We have shown before that, if the excluded B 
is reflected upon, A is thereby excluded from the to- 
tality, from the Ego. But since B has been posited 
in the Ego by reflection, and is, therefore, itself 
posited in union with A as totality, (as accidental,) 
it follows that another B, in reference to which it is 
accidental, must be excluded or posited as a neces- 
sary opposite. We now apply this here. 

Y is now, with reference to its synthetical union 



240 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

with an unknown O, determined ; and X in respect 
to, and by means of, Y, is also at least negavtiely 
determined. 

But if they are to be united with A, or to be po- 
sited in the Ego, they must be posited as accidental 
also in this respect, that is, a necessary X and Y 
must be opposed to them, in regard to which they 
are accidental : substances whereof they are acci- 
dences. 

This necessary X and Y, whereof the accidental 
X and Y in the Ego are the utterances, are their 
presupposed powers, free powers. The same rela- 
tion which exists between X and Y as utterances 
exists, therefore, between these powers. The ut- 
terance of power Y is utterly independent of that 
of power X ; but the latter in its utterance is de- 
pendent upon and conditioned by Y. Conditioned, 
that is, the utterance of Y does not determine the 
utterance X positively, but negatively ; not the qua- 
litativeness of X, but in this that X can not utter 
itself in a certain manner. 

But it has been expressly stated that X as well 
as Y are to utter themselves through free, unlimited 
causality. How, then, can X be conditioned by Y .' 
Evidently X has causality as well as Y, and the 
causality of the latfer is not the condition of that 
of the former ; Y does not compel or urge X to 
utter itself Nor does it determine the character 
of this, the utterance or causality of X. But how, 
then, does it condition it .■' 

X and Y are to be in a synthetical relation to an 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 24I 

•unknown O. For in and only through their rela- 
tion to O are they mutually related. Each must, 
therefore, have an independent relation to O. 

O must be a something which leaves to both per- 
fect freedom of causality, for in this, their free cau- 
sality, are they to be united with O. And since 
the resistance of every power to a causality limits 
that causality, O can have no power, no activity, 
no intension. It can, therefore, have no reality at 
all, and is nothing. 

We have seen how Y and Z being synthetically 
united, X is excluded from Z. We have also seen, 
now, that this synthetical union of Y and Z is ef- 
fected through the own free causality of the inner 
power Y. Not that Z is product of the power Y, 
but, being necessarily united with Y, it must also 
have a distinctive feature. Now, this union of Y 
and Z excludes the causality of X and its product 
from Z ; hence, Z is the sphere of causality of Y, 
and is nothing but this sphere ; it is nothing in it- 
self, has no reality, and can have no predicate but 
the one just shown up. 

Again, Z is sphere of causality only of Y ; for, by 
being posited as such a sphere of Y, X and all other 
possible object is excluded from it. The " sphere 
of the causality of Y " means the same as " Z ;" 
both -are in all respects the same. The causality 
of Y Jills up Z, that is, excludes all other but the 
causality of Y. 

If Z goes to c, d, or e, the causality of X is thus 
far excluded. But, since the latter is only excluded 

21 



242 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

because Y excludes it, there is necessarily conti- 
nuity between the spheres of causality of both, and 
both meet or join in a point. The power of imagi- 
nation unites both and posits Z and — Z, or, as we 
determined it above, V = O. 

But the causality of X is to remain free although 
excluded from Z. This exclusion would not leave 
X free, if the causality of Y in Z negated or can- 
celed something in X, or made any in itself possible 
utterance of X impossible. Hence, it must be that 
no possible utterance of X does ever come in conflict 
with the causality of Y and Z ; there must not be 
any such tendency of filling up Z in X. There 
must be in X itself a ground by virtue of which Z 
is not its sphere of causality ; there must not be in 
X any ground of a possibility that Y could be its 
sphere of causality. 

Y and X, therefore, unite accidentally in a point, 
in the absolute synthetical union of absolute oppo- 
sites, without any mutual influence or action upon 
each other. 

3d. We have shown before that A + B must be 
determined through B. Hitherto only B has been 
thus determined ; but mediately A also is determined 
through it. This formula we interpreted : that which 
is in the Ego — that is, contemplation — is determined 
through the Non-Ego, and is mediately a product 
thereof We now apply this here. 

X is product of the Non-Ego, and is, in regard 
to its sphere of action, determined in the Ego ; Y 
is the same, both through themselves in their abso- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 243 

lute freedom. Both through their accidental junc- 
tion determine also the point of this junction ; and 
the Ego is only passive in regard to it. 

But this can not be. The Ego, as sure as it is 
an Ego, must produce this determination with free- 
dom. 

We have solved this same problem before in this 
way : The whole reflection of substantiality is de- 
pendent upon the absolute freedom of the Ego. 
We now solve the problem in the same way. The 
Ego is absolutely free to reflect or not reflect upon 

Y and X as an abiding, as a simple. If it does so 
reflect, it must, by the law of that reflection, un- 
doubtedly place Y in the sphere of action Z, and 
posit C as a limit between the spheres of action of 

Y and X ; but it also may not so reflect, and may 
posit, instead of X and Y, every possible object as 
substance through its absolute freedom. 

Suppose the spheres Z and V as connecting in 
the point C. In th^ sphere Z, the Ego can posit 
an a or a b instead of Y ; it can make Z the sphere 
of action of both, and their limit, the dividing line, 
G. Let us now call the sphere of action of a, H. 
Then the Ego can now again proceed to take this 
H, and, instead of positing a in it as indivisible sub- 
stance, it can posit E and D in it, and so on ad in- 
finitum. But, if an a and a b have once been posit- 
ed, the Ego must assign to them a sphere of action 
connecting in one point. 

This accidentalness of Y and its sphere of action 
for the Ego the Ego must now posit as real throtigh 



244 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

its power of imagination. O is thus posited as an 
extended, continuous, infinitely indivisible, and is 

SPACE. 

REMARKS. 

1st. The power of imagination, by positing the 
possibility of other substances with other spheres 
of action in the space X, first dirempts space from the 
thing which actually fills it, and sketches an empty- 
space ; of course, only as an attempt, and transitively 
in order to fill it immediately again with any 
desired substances and their spheres of action. 
Hence, there is no empty space but in this transi- 
tion from the filling up of space by A to its being 
filled up by B, C, D, etc. 

2d. The infinitely smallest part of space is always 
a space, a continuity, but not a mere point, or 
the limit between places in space. It is thus a 
continuity, because in it can be posited, and is po- 
sited in so far as itself is pcJsited, a power which 
necessarily utters itself, and which can not be posit- 
ed except as uttering itself But it can not utter 
itself unless it has a sphere of its utterance, which 
is nothing but such a sphere. 

3d. Hence, intensity and extensity are necessarily 
synthetically united, and one can not be deduced 
without the other. Every power fills up (not through 
'\\.s€ii, for the power is not in space, and is, in fact, 
nothing at all without utterance, but through its 
necessary product, which is this same synthetical 
ground of union of intensity and extensity) a place 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 24S 

in space ; and space is nothing but this sphere, 
filled or to be filled by these products. 

4th. Apart from the inner determinations of the 
things, (their qualitativeness,) which only refer to 
feeling, (more or less pleasure or disgust,) and which 
are not at all accessible to the theoretical faculty of 
the Ego, as, for instance, that the things are red 
or smooth, bitter or sweet, heavy or light, etc., these 
things are only distinguishable from each other by 
the space they occupy. Hence, that which pertains 
to these things in such a manner that it is only as- 
cribed to them and not to the Ego, though it does 
not belong to their inner essence, is the space which 
they occupy. 

Sth. But all space is equal, and through it, there- 
for^ no distinction and determination is possible, 
except in so far as one thing = Y has been posited 
in a certain space, and thus determined and charac- 
terized space. In that case you can say of X, it is 
in another space than Y. All determination of 
space presupposes a space filled up, and determined 
by that filling up. Posit A in the infinite empty 
space, it remains as undetermined as it was before, 
and you can not answer my question. Where is it } 
for you have no fixed point from which you can 
measure it. The place which it occupies is only 
determined through A, and A is only determined 
through that place. Hence, there is in reality no 
determination except in so far as you posit one ; it 
is a synthesis through absolute spontaneity. To 
express this sensuously, A might move continuously 

21* 



246 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

from one point to another in space, and you would 
not observe the movement, because for you there 
would be no points, but only the limitless, endless 
spaces. For you it would always remain where it 
is, because it would always remain in space. But 
if you put B aside of it, then B is determined; 
and if I ask you where it is, you reply, By the side 
of A. This satisfies me, unless I ask again. But 
where is A 1 If you posit C, D, E, etc., aside of B, 
then you have for all of them relative determina- 
tions of place ; but you may fill up space as far as 
you like, and you will always have in the filled up 
space only a finite space which can have no relation 
to the infinite space. This finite space is only de- 
termined in so far as you have determined it by 
virtue of an absolute synthesis. An evident 1»uth, 
it seems to me, which ought long since to have 
proven the ideality of space. 

6th. The object of the present contemplation is 
characterized as such by this, that we posit it through 
the power of imagination in a space as empty space. 
But this, as we have shown, is not possible, unless 
a filled up space is presupposed. A dependent 
succession of the filling up of space, but in which, 
from reasons we shall show up hereafter, one can 
always go further back infinitely. 

To restore the freedom of the Ego, and to posit 
the Non-Ego as accidental, we posited the Ego as 
free to connect Z with Y, or a, b, c, etc. ; and 
through positing this freedom we first discovered 
O as space. This sort of accidentalness remains ; 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 247 

but the question is, whether it has solved the prob- 
lem. 

True, the Ego is generally free to posit in space 
Y, X, or a, b, c, etc. ; but, if it is to reflect upon 
X as substance, from which presupposition we 
started, it must necessarily, as we have shown, posit 
Y as determined substance, and as determined by 
the space Z ; hence, in that condition it is not free. 
Nor is it then free in determining the place of X is 
space, for it must place X aside of Y. Hence, the 
Ego, under this condition, remains always deter- 
mined by another. But it shall be free ; and the 
contradiction must be solved. This is done as fol' 
lows : 

Y and X must both be determined and opposed 
to each other in another manner than through their 
determinedness and determinability in space ; for 
both have been posited above independent of their 
space, and as distinct from each other. They must 
have other characteristics, in virtue of which the 
sentence A = A is applied to them ; for instance, 
that X is red, Y yellow, etc. Their place in 
space has no reference to these determinations, 
does not make Y, as yellow, the determined in 
space, or X as red, the determinable in space. It 
only posits one of both as determined, and the oth- 
er as determinable, without any reference to any 
inherent characteristics they may possess. Thus 
freedom attains its sphere again. Freedom must 
oppose a determined and a determinable ; but it 
can make either opposite the determined or the de- 



248 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

terminable. Whether X be determined through 
Y, or vice versa, depends only upon the spontaneity 
of the Ego. In other words, it is the same what 
series you describe in space, whether from A to B, 
or vice versa ; whether you place B on the side of 
A, or A on the side of B, for the things mutually 
exclude each other in space. 

This, its freedom of making either determined or 
determinable, the Ego posits through the power of 
imagination. It floats between determinedness and 
determinability, ascribes to both both, or, which is 
the same, to neither neither. But if a contempla- 
tion and object of a contemplation is to be, then the 
Ego must make oneoi the in themselves determined 
two a determinable in space. 

Why it posits X or Y, or a, b, c, d, etc., as de- 
terminable admits of no ground, and can not admit 
of a ground, for it is an act of absolute spontaneity. 
This shows itself as accidentalness. But it must 
be well observed wherein this accidentalness con- 
sists, namely, in the being posited, or in the existence 
of the determinable. The positing of this determi- 
nable becomes an accidence of the Ego, to which 
the Ego itself, as shown before, must be opposited 
as its substance. 

Ego and Non-Ego are now again complete oppo- 
sites, and independent of each other. Inner powers 
of the Non-Ego work with absolute freedom, fill up 
their spheres of action, accidentally meet in a point, 
and thus mutually exclude each other, without limit- 
ing their respective freedom, from their spheres of 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 249 

action, or from their places in space. The Ego, 
again, posits as substance whatsoever it chooses, 
divides space, as it were, amongst substances, spon- 
taneously decides which shall be the determined 
and which the determinable in space, or in what 
direction it will course through space. 

Thus, all connection between the Ego and the 
Non-Ego is broken off; both are only connected 
by empty space, which, being empty, and only the 
sphere wherein the Non-Ego, realiter with freedom, 
posits its products, and the Ego, idealiter, posits 
also with freedom its products, as imaginary pro- 
ducts of a Non-Ego, does limit neither nor connect 
one with the other. The opposition of both and 
the independent existence of the Ego and the Non- 
Ego is explained ; but not the required harmony 
between both. Space is justly called the form, thafv 
is, the subjective condition of the possibility of the 
external contemplation. Unless there is another 
form of contemplation, the required harmony be- 
tween representation of a thing and a thing itself 
and their mutual relation ; hence, also, their oppo- 
sition through the Ego, is impossible. Let us find 
this form. 

TIME. 

I. Y and X, in all their possible and mutual 
relations, are products of the free causality of the 
independent Non-Ego. But this they are not for 
the Ego, nor are they indeed at all/(7r the Ego with- 
out a free causality of the Ego itself 



250 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

2. This causality of Ego and Non-Ego, there- 
fore, must be reciprocal causality, that is, the utter- 
ances of both must meet in a point, in the absolute 
synthesis of both through imagination. This point 
of union the Ego posits by its absolute power, and 
it posits this point as accidental, that is, the connect- 
ing of the causality of both opposites is accidental. 
, 3. If Y or X is to be posited, such a point of 
union must be posited ; or, in other words, the 
positing of an object involves such a union with the 
causality of the Ego. 

4.. The Ego is perfectly free in regard to the 
determinateness. or undeterminateness of the X or 
Y means, therefore, the Ego is perfectly free to 
connect Y or X with the point {and thus with the 
Ego) or not. 

5. This thus determined freedom of the Ego 
must be posited through the power of imagination, 
that is, the mere possibility of a synthesis of the 
point with a causality of the Non-Ego must be 
posited. This is only possible if the point can be 
posited apart from the causality of the Non-Ego. 

6. But such a point is nothing but a synthesis of 
the causality of the Ego and of the Non-Ego. 
Hence, by altogether removing it from the causality 
of the Non-Ego, you destroy the point. Hence, we 
only remove the determined X from the point, and 
unite the point instead with an undetermined pro- 
duct (a, b, c, or d, etc., a Non-Ego) so as to have 
it retain its determined character as synthetical 
point. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 25 I 

7. The Ego is really synthetically to unite the 
point with X. This is our whole presupposition, 
for we require a contemplation of X, which, even 
as contemplation, is not possible without such a 
synthesis. This synthesis, as we have also shown, 
occurs through absolute spontaneity. But, by unit- 
ing X with the point, all other possible powers are 
excluded from the point. 

8. This synthetical connection of X with the 
point is to be a real cojtnecting, and to be posited 
as such, that is, it is to bear the characteristic of 
absolute spontaneity, namely, accidentalness, and 
this not merely in the respect heretofore mentioned, 
but in its very characteristic as a connecting of a 
synthesis. But such accidentalness of its character 
as synthesis is only possible through opposition with 
another necessary synthesis of a determined Y with 
a point ; of course, not with the point of X, for from 
that point all other is excluded, but with another 
opposite point. Let us call this point c, and the 
point with which X is connected d. 

9. This point c, like d, is synthetical point of 
union of the causality of the Ego and of the Non-Ego 
But it is opposed to d in this, that with d the syn- 
thetical union is considered as dependent upon 
freedom, as that which might be otherwise, while 
with c the union is considered as necessary. 

10. This accidentalness of the synthetical union 
with d must be posited ; hence, also, must the ne- 
cessity of the union with c be posited. Both must, 
therefore, be posited in this respect as necessary 



252 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

and accidental in regard to each other. If the syn- 
thetical union with d is to be posited, that with c 
must have been posited before, but not vice versa. 

11. Now, this synthesis with d is really to be 
posited ; hence, it is posited as dependent, as condi- 
tioned by the synthesis with c. But c is not, vice 
versa, conditioned by d. 

12. Again, the synthesis with c is to be exactly 
as the synthesis with d, that is, an arbitrary, acci- 
dental synthesis. If it is posited as such, another 
synthesis with b must again be opposed to it as ne- 
cessary, as the synthesis of which it is dependent 
and by which it is conditioned. The synthesis with 
c, if posited accidental, must thus be posited as pre- 
ceded by a synthesis with b, and dependent upon 
that, but not vice versa. The synthesis with b, 
again, must be posited as accidental, and hence, as 
preceded by another synthesis, and so on ad infini- 
tum. Thus, we attain a series of points as points 
of synthetical union between a causality of the Ego 
and of the Non-Ego in contemplation, wherein each 
point depends upon a determined other which does 
not depend upon it, and wherein each has a deter- 
mined other which is dependent upon it while it- 
self does not depend upon this other ; in short, we 
obtain a time series. 

13. The Ego posited itself as perfectly free to 
unite with the point whatever it might choose, 
hence the whole infinite Non-Ego. The thus de- 
termined point is only accidental and not necessary ; 
is only dependent without having another which is 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 253 

dependent upon it, and is called the present point, 
the present moment. 

14. Hence, if we abstract from the synthetical 
union of a determined point with the object — and 
thus from the whole causality of the Ego, which is 
only connected with the Non-Ego through this 
point — all things, considered in themselves, and in- 
dependent from the Ego, are at the same time in 
space, that is, are synthetically unitable with one 
and the same point. But they can be posited in 
perception only after each other in a successive se- 
ries, wherein each link depends upon another which 
does not depend upon it. 

CONCLUDING REMARKS. 

a. There is for us no past except in so far as it is j 
thought in the present. Whatsoever was yesterday 
is not ; it is only, in so far as I think in the present 
moment that it was. The question. Has not really 
a time passed away .'' is just of the same nature as 
the question, Is there a thing in itself .'' Of ^ 
course, a time has past- if you posit one as past, 
and, if you ask that question, you do posit a past 
time ; if you do not posit it, you will not ask that 
question, and then no time has past for you. A ' 
very evident observation, which ought long ago to 
have led to the correct conception of the ideality of 
time. 

b. But a past is necessary for us ; for only on 

condition of a past is a present, and only on condi- 

22 



254 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

tion of a present is consciousness possible. This 
proof we recapitulate as follows : Consciousness is 
only possible on condition that the Ego posit a 
Non-Ego as its opposite, and this oppositing de- 
mands that the ideal activity of the Ego should be 
directed upon the Non-Ego. This activity belongs 
to the Ego only in so far as it is free ; hence, in so 
far as it may be directed upon any of all possible 
objects. In this, its freedom, it must be posited 
and is posited, and it is the character of the present 
moment that any other possible perception might 
fill it. This,, again, is only possible if another mo- 
ment is posited wherein no other perception can be 
posited than that which is posited therein ; and 
this is the character of the past moment. Con- 
sciousness, therefore, is necessarily consciousness 
of freedom and of identity ; of freedom, as we have 
shown ; of identi.ty, because every moment, to be a 
moment, must be connected with another. 

The perception, B, is no perception, unless an- 
other perception. A, is presupposed. You may 
posit C now, and then A may vanish, but you will 
now have to posit B as the condition of C, and so 
on ad infinitum. This is the law of the identity of 
consciousness, for which we only need, strictly 
speaking, two moments. There is rxo first moment 
of consciousness, only a second., 

c. True, the past moment can again be posited 
in consciousness, can be represented or reproduced 
in the present, can be posited as having occurred 
in the same subject, if you reflect that another per- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 255 

ception might have filled him. In that case, you 
again oppose to it a preceding moment, in which, 
if you posit in the latter a determined perception, 
no other perception could occur but that which did 
occur in it. Hence, we can always go back in this 
series of moments so far as we please into the infi- 
nite. 

d. A determined quantity of space is always at 
the same time ; a quantity of time always in a suc- 
cession, one moment after another. Hence, we> 
can only measure the one through the other : space 
through the time we need to pass over it ; time 
through the space we, or any other regular moving 
body, (the sun, the pendulum, etc.,) can pass through 
in it. 



IV. 



PRACTICAL PART 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



22* 



Practical Part 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



FUNDAMENTAL PRINCIPLE. 

The Ego posits itself as determining the Non-Ego. 

We might proceed to evolve this principle in the 
same manner as we did the fundamental principle 
of the theoretical part ; but a shorter way is possi- 
ble. For there is one chief antithesis in this prin- 
ciple which embraces the whole conflict between 
the Ego as intelligence, and in so far limited, and 
the Ego as absolutely posited, and hence unlimited 
being, and which compels us to assume as connect- 
ing link a practical power of the Ego. We shall 
first look up this antithesis. 

The Ego is Ego ; it is absolutely one and the 
same Ego by virtue of its being posited through it- 
self, (§ I.) 

Now, in so far as the Ego is particularly repre- 
sentittg, or an intelligence, it is as such also one, 
true enough ; is one power of representation under 



260 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE, 

necessary laws, but it is not in so far one and the 
same with the absolute through itself posited Ego. 

For, although the Ego, in so far as it is already 
intelligence, is in its particular determinations within 
this sphere of the intelligence determined through 
itself, and although also in so far nothing ever oc- 
curs in the Ego which it has not posited within 
itself, yet this sphere itself, considered generally 
and in itself, is not posited by the Ego for itself, 
but is posited for it through an external something. 
True, the mode and manner of representing objects 
is determined through the Ego itself ; but that the 
Ego is at all representing, is an inteUigence, is not 
determined through the Ego, as we have seen. 
For we could only think representation on the pre- 
supposition that the undetermined and infinite acti- 
' vity of the Ego receives a check. Hence, the Ego, 
as intelligence generally, is dependent upon an un- 
determined and as yet altogether undeterminable 
Non-Ego ; and only by means of such a Non-Ego 
is the Ego intelligence.* 

But the Ego is to be in all its determinations ab- 
solutely posited through itself, and, hence, perfectly 
independent of any possible Non-Ego. 

Hence, the absolute Ego and the intelligent Ego 
(if it is permissible to express myself thus) are not 

* Whosoever may conjecture a profound significance and vast 
consequences in this expression is a welcome reader to me. A 
finite being is finite only as intelligence ; the practical (moral) legis- 
lation which he is to have in common with the infinite can not de- 
pend upon any thing external. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 261 

one and the same, but opposed to each other, which 
contradicts the absolute identity of the Ego. 

This contradiction must be solved, and that can 
only be done as follows : Since it is the dependence 
of the Ego, as intelligence, which is to be removed, 
the Ego must determine through itself that same un- 
htoian Non-Ego, to which the check has been as- 
cribed, which makes the Ego intelligence. Thus, 
the absolute Ego would determine the Non-Ego of 
the representation immediately, and the represent- 
ing Ego mediately, by means of that determination 
of the Non-Ego, and the Ego would become com- 
pletely independent, that is, self-determined. 

The Ego, as intelligence, stood in the relation *' 
of causality to the Non-Ego to which it ascribed 
the check. The Non-Ego was the cause ; it the ^ 
effect. For the causality relation consists in this, 
that, by restricting activity in the one, the same 
quantity of activity which is restricted is posited in 
the opposite of the one, according to the law of 
mutual determination. Now, if the Ego is to be 
intelligence, part of its infinitely extending activity 
must be canceled, and thus posited in its opposite, 
the Non-Ego. But since the absolute Ego can not 
be restricted at all, being absolute activity and 
nothing but absolute activity, it must be assumed, 
as we have shown, that the postulated Non-Ego is 
also determined, that is, passive, and hence the 
quantity of activity which is opposed to this passi- 
vity of the Non-Ego must be posited in the oppo- 
site of the Non-Ego, that is, in the Ego ; not in the 



262 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

Ego as intelligence, however, since as such it is de- 
termined by the Non-Ego, but in the absolute Ego. 
And such a relation being a relation of causality, 
it follows that the absolute Ego is to be cause of 
the Non-Ego, in so far as the Non-Ego is last 
ground of all representation. 

The absolute Ego is only active and thus deter- 
mines the Non-Ego, which is now passive, in so far 
as this Non-Ego is to determine the Ego as intelli- 
gence. The activity opposed to this passivity of 
the Non-Ego is now posited in the absolute Ego 
as a determined activity ; and thus the Ego, as in- 
telligence, and as absolute, is placed in a state of 
self -relation. The grounds of this circuitous way 
of the Ego to influence itself are as yet unknown, 
but may, perhaps, appear in the future. 

The absolute Ego is, therefore, cause of that in 
the Non-Ego which remains, when we abstract 
from all forms of representation ; for those forms re- 
sult, as we have shown, from the laws of represen- 
tation in the Ego as intelligence. That is, the abso- 
lute Ego is to be the cause of the mysterious thing 
in itself, the hidden substance, the check ; all the 
rest follow necessarily in the manner shown. 

But, whereas it was easy enough to show how — 
after once assuming the check — the Ego as intelli- 
gence is cause of all the necessary laws of repre- 
sentation, it is a far different question. How can the 
Ego be cause of the Non-Ego "i Surely not through 
absolute positing. 

For the Ego can certainly posit itself without 



THE SCIENCE OF KN^fVLEDGE. 263 

any further ground, and must posit itself if it is to 
posit any thing else ; for that which is not can not 
posit, and the Ego is (for itself) only by virtue of 
its positing itself 

The Ego can not posit the Non-Ego without 
limiting itself For the Non-Ego is the complete 
opposite to the Ego, and whatsoever the Non-Ego 
is, that the Ego is not ; hence, in so far as the Non- 
Ego is posited, the Ego is not posited. If the 
Non-Ego were posited without quantity, that is, 
unlimited and infinite, then the Ego would not be 
posited at all, which is a contradiction. Hence, the 
Non-Ego must be posited in a determined quantity, 
and the Ego must be restricted by the posited 
quantity of reality of the Non-Ego. 

The Ego is, therefore, in our presupposition to 
posit a Non-Ego absolutely and without any ground, 
or to limit itself without any ground. The ground 
thus to limit itself must, therefore, be in the Ego 
itself ; it must have the principle in itself to posit 
itself, and also the principle not to posit itself 
Hence, the Ego iii its essence must be contradic- 
tory and self-annihilating, and cancels itsel£ 

We stand here at a point from which the true 
significance of our second fundamental principle, a 
Non-Ego is opposed to the Ego, and thus the true sig- 
nificance of our whole science of knowledge, can be 
more clearly explained than was heretofore possible. 

Of that second fundamental principle of the 
whole science of knowledge only part is absolute ; 
but part of it presupposes a fact, which A priori can 



264 THE SCI^CE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

not be shown up at all, but only in the experience 
of each individual. 

Namely, besides the self-positing of the Ego there 
is- to be another positing. This is i priori a mere 
hypothesis ; that there is such another positing 
(or, that there is any thing at all) can not be pro- 
ven, but can only be shown up by a. fact of con- 
sciousness ; and every one must prove it to himself 
by this fact, but no one can prove it to another by 
demonstrations. 

(True, he might reduce any admitted fact, through 
thinking, to that highest fact ; but such a fact would 
only show to the other, that by admitting any fact 
he has also confessed that highest fact.) But it is 
absolutely certain and grounded in the essence of 
the Ego that, if there is such another positing, then 
it must be an oppositing, and that which is thus 
posited must be a Non-Ego. In other words, how 
the Ego can distinguish something from itself can 
not be proven by any higher ground of possibility ; 
on the contrary, the fact that the Ego thus does dis- 
tinguish (separate or dirempt) is itself the ground 
of all deduction and all grounding. But it is abso- 
lutely certain that all positing, which is not a posit- 
ing of the Ego, must be an oppositing. Hence, the 
argumentation of the science of knowledge is d, 
priori valid, that is, it establishes only propositions 
which are d. priori certain ; but reality it obtains 
only in experience. If any one could not become 
conscious of the postulated fact — it can be certainly 
known that this can not be the case with any finite 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 265 

rational being — then the whole science of know- 
ledge has no content for him ; and yet its formal 
correctness he also must acknowledge. Let me 
illustrate this : 

For a Godhead, that is, for a consciousness (to 
us unthinkable) for which the self-positing of the 
Ego is the positing of all, our science of knowledge 
would have no content ; for its consciousness would 
embrace no other positing than the self-positing of 
the Ego ; but th.&form of our system would be valid '^ 
even for God, since it is the form of pure reason 
itself 

The contradiction existing between the indepen- 
dence of the Ego as absolute being, and the depen- 
dence thereof as intelligence, we sought to remove 
by postulating the absolute Ego as cause of the 
Non-Ego. But this postulate we also discoverefl 1 
to be a contradiction ; for if the Ego has causality 
upon the Non-Ego, then the Non-Ego ceases to be 
Non-Ego, ceases to be the opposite of the Ego, and 
becomes itself Ego. But the Ego has itself posited 
the Non-Ego as its opposite, and, if that positing is 
canceled, then the Ego itself ceases to be Ego. 
The contradiction lies, therefore, in this, that al- 
though the Ego is to be the cause of the Non-Ego, 
the Non-Ego is to remain opposed to the Ego. 
We must solve this contradiction. 

In so far as the Ego is absolute, it is infinite and 

unlimited. Every thing that is the Ego posits, and 

what it does not posit is not ; and whatever it 

posits it posits as Ego, and it posits the Ego as 

23 



266 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

every thing it posits. Hence, as absolute Ego the 
Ego contains in itself all reality, that is, an infinite, 
unlimited jreality. 

But in so far as the Ego opposits a Non-Ego, it 
necessarily posits limits, and posits itself in these 
limits. It divides the totality of posited reality be- 
tween the Ego and Non-Ego, and hence posits it- 
self necessarily in so far as finite. 

Here we have, therefore, a still higher contradic- 
tion : The Ego posits itself one time as infinite, and 
then again as finite. How can this contradiction 
be reunited .>' 

The Ego posits itself as infinite in so far as its 
activity is directed upon itself, or returns in itself ; for 
then the product of this activity, being the Ego 
again, is infinite. (Infinite product — infinite acti- 
vity, and vice versa.) 

The Ego posits itself as finite in so far as its acti- 
vity is directed upon a Non-Ego which it opposes to 
itself This is no longer pure (infinite) but object- 
ive, limited activity. 

Both activities are to be one and the same. Let 
us find their synthetical connection, and then we 
shall doubtless see how the required causality is 
possible ; for such a connection would be this very 
relation of causality, since it would make the in it- 
self returning activity the cause of the objective 
activity ; and through the former the Ego would 
determine itself to the latter ; the pure activity 
would return into the Ego, but in so returning de- 
termine the Ego as determining the Non-Ego, and, 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. Sf/ 

hence, mediately it would be directed upon the 
Non-Ego, while immediately it would be directed 
upon the Ego. 

The self-positing of the Ego is, therefore, now to 
be the cause of its positing the Non-Ego. But if 
this were so, then the Ego would posit the Non- 
Ego by positing itself, and thus would cancel itself 
Moreover : the second fundamental principle from 
which we started (—A not = A) resulted in this, 
that the Ego opposits a Non-Ego to itself absolute- 
ly, and without any ground. The present result, 
therefore, unqualified, would overthrow § 2, and 
hence our whole system. That second fundamental 
principle, however, showed itself — though absolute 
in form — to be conditioned in content ; the opposite 
was to be an opposite of the Ego. Let us examine 
this. 

THESIS. 

The Ego opposes absolutely \o itself an object, an 
opposite Non-Ego. In the positing thereof the 
Ego is utterly independent. That is, the Ego may 
posit the object where it chooses, but is conditioned 
in this, that by positing the object it limits itself. 
The Ego is finite, because by positing the Non- ' 
Ego it limits itself; it is also infinite, because it 
may posit the Non-Ego infinitely. It is finite in. ' 
its infinity ; infinite in its finity. It is utterly inde- 
pendent, absolute in positing an object ; it limits 
itself simply because it does. But this absolute 
self-limitation is opposed to § i, to the absolute 
self-positing the Ego, and hence impossible. 



2o3 THE SCIENCE OF KNO-WLEDGE. 



ANTITHESIS. 

The Ego posits an object, and thus posits an acti- 
vity independent, of its own, opposed to its own. 
This activity of the object must be, in one sense, in 
the Ego, (since the Ego posits it,) but in another 
sense in the Non-Ego, in the object. In the latter 
sense it must be opposed to that activity of the 
Ego which posits it, (since to this it is related,) and 
hence, if there is to be an object, the possibility of 
fositing it presupposes an activity in the Ego differ- 
ent from the activity which posits the object. Let us 
call this unknown activity X. 

SYNTHESIS. 

X will not be canceled by the object, since both 
are opposites. Both are to be posited ; each must 
be independent of the other. X must be absolutely 
grounded in the Ego, since it depends not upon the 
positing of the object, but rather the object depends 
upon it. X is, therefore, posited by the absolute 
self-positing of the Ego. Again, X must be infi- 
nite, since it is opposed to the object which can be 
extended into the infinite. X is, therefore, the infi- 
nite activity, posited by the Ego in itself, and which 
is related to the objective activity of the Ego as the 
ground of possibility to the grounded ; that is, the 
object is posited only in so far as an activity of the 
Ego meets resistance ; no such activity of the Ego, 
no object. Again, it is related as the determining to 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 269 

the determined ; that is, only in so far as that acti- 
vity is resisted can an object be posited ; no resist- 
ance, no object. 

Now, consider this infinite activity in relation to 
the activity of the object. Both are utterly inde- 
pendent of each other ; there is no relation between 
them. And yet, when an object is posited, they 
must be so related by means of the objective acti- 
vity of the Ego, of which X is the ground. That 
is, they are related in so far as an object is posited ; 
not, not. Again, as the object is absolutely posited, 
so the relation must be absolute, without ground. 
They are absolutely related means, they are posited 
as equals. At the same time, as sure as an object is 
posited, they are not equal. They shall be equal, 
but are not. (Kant's Categorical Imperative.) 

The question remains, In which of both is the 
ground of relation to be posited } Which is to 
rule 1 The Ego is the totality of all reality ; it is 
to be absolutely independent ; all else dependent 
upon it. The object is, therefore, to be equal to 
the Ego ; and it is the absolute Ego which demands 
this for the very sake of its absolute being. 

For instance : let the activity Y be given, (in what 
will hereafter appear as object,) and place an activ- 
ity of the Ego in relation to it. Thereby you think 
an activity outside of the Ego, {= — Y,) which is 
equal to that activity of the Ego. Wherein now 
lies the equality ground of this relation .■" Of course, 
in the thesis that all activity is to be equal to that 

of the Ego. ^Y lies, therefore, in a world wherein 
23* 



270 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

all activity would really be equal to that of the Ego, 
and is an ideal. Now, since Y is not equal to — Y, 
but is opposed to it, we ascribe Y to an object. 
Without this relation and the absolute thesis which 
is the ground of it, there would be no object for the 
Ego ; and the Ego would be every thing, and for 
that very reason nothing. 

The absolute Ego, therefore, relates itself abso- 
lutely to a Non-Ego ( — Y) which it appears is to be 
a Non-Ego in its form, (that is, in so far as it is to 
be any thing outside of the Ego, a thing in itself,) 
but not in its content, since it is to be perfectly 
equal to the Ego. But it can not be thus perfectly 
equal so long as it is, though but in form, a Non-Ego ; 
and, hence, the activity of the Ego related to it can 
not be a determining, but merely a tendency toward 
determination. 

RESULT. 

The pure, self-returning activity of the Ego is, 
in its relation to a possible object, a tendency ; and, 
according to the above, an infinite tendency. This 
tendency is the .condition of the possibility of all 
object ; no tendency, no object. 

The pure activity of the Ego is, therefore, now, 
as was required, the cause of the objective activity 
of the Ego, since no object can be posited without 
it. But in so far as this pure activity originally is 
directed upon no object — both, therefore, being 
mutually independent of the other — it is not its 
cause, but related to it by an absolute act of the 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 27 1 

Ego. This absolute act of the Ego, as act, is in its 
form (in its realization) absolute, (and this, its abso- 
luteness, is the ground of the absolute spontaneity 
of reflection in the theoretical part, and of the will 
in the practical part of the science of knowledge, as 
we shall see ;) but in its content (in this, that it is a 
relation) it is conditioned by the absolute self-posit- 
ing of the Ego as totality of all reality . In other 
words, that the pure activity is placed in relation 
to an object, has not its ground in the pure activity 
as such ; but that, if it is so posited, it must be 
posited as a tendency ; of this itself is the ground. 

A system which would assert that the pure acti- 
vity, as such, is directed upon an object, would be a 
system of intelligible fatalism. As applied to finite 
beings, the argument would be : Since no pure ac- 
tivity is posited unless it manifests itself, and since 
in finite beings it can not manifest itself it must 
be posited by something outside. This system 
would be valid for a Godhead, that is, a being, with 
whose pure activity its objective activity were also 
posited. But such a being is not conceivable. 

The thesis, that all reality must be absolutely^ 
posited through the Ego, is the thesis of what has 
been called practical reason. We have now shown > 
that practical and theoretical reason are inseparable. 
Theoretical intelligence is impossible without the v 
practical power, since an object is impossible with- 
out a tendency. 



272 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



FURTHER DIFFICULTY. 

But how can the tendency of the pure activity 
be placed in relation to the activity of the object, 
unless the latter is first given to the Ego ? To ex- 
plain the latter activity from the former would in- 
volve a circle and explain nothing. There must be 
an absolute first ground of the relation. 

The Ego is only = Ego, it has no other deter- 
mination ; it is all, and it is nothing, because it is 
nothing for itself An inequality, an Other appears 
in it. That this Other appears is a fact, and can 
not be proven d. priori ; every one must find it so. 
This Other can not be deduced from the conception 
of the absolute Ego as simply a positing of itself 

If we imagine an intelligence outside of the Ego, 
to that intelligence the Other would appear as limit- 
ing the Ego ; but the Ego itself is to be that intel- 
ligence and to posit that limit. 

If the Ego is equal to itself, it must strive to 
cancel this limit, to restore the activity, not inter- 
rupted by itself, and then it can compare and relate 
its condition of limitation to its condition of re- 
stored activity, and thus establish a mere self-rela- 
tion. 

Let us suppose the activity of the Ego to tend 
from A to C without check. Between A and C 
there is nothing to distinguish, nothing of which 
the Ego can become conscious. In C this activity 
— the ground of all consciousness, but never itself 
made conscious — is checked. But by its nature it 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 273 

can not be checked. Hence, it continues beyond 
C, but as an activity which has been checked, and 
now maintains itself only through its own power. 
But as such it continues only to that point where 
the check ceases = D. Beyond D it is again not 
an object of consciousness. 

Limited and restored activity are, therefore, syn- 
thetically united in the Ego, and mutually condition 
each other. Neither can be posited without the 
other. This synthesis of limited and restored acti- 
vity in the mere subject is, therefore, the condition 
of all positing of the Ego. As such purely sub- 
jective relation it is called feeling. 

Now, since the ground of this feeling is posited 
in an activity of the object, and since this activity 
of the object is thus given, as was required, to the 
relating subject through feeling, we have shown 
how' the activity of the object can be related to the 
-pure activity of the Ego. 

Let us now return to our stand-point. Its result ' 
was, no infinite tendency of the Ego, no finite ob- 
ject in the Ego. By this result we thought to 
have solved the contradiction. We said, the infinite 
activity is not objective, but only returning into it- 
self, whereas the finite activity is objective. But, 
since we have now placed this infinite activity, as 
tendency, in relation to the object, we have made it 
also in so far objective activity ; and thus we have 
now one infinite objective, and one finite objective 
activity of the Ego, which is a contradiction, to be 
solved only by showing that the infinite activity is 



274 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

objective in another manner than the objective ac- 
tivity. 

The infinite activity (tendency) of the Ego, in so 
far as it is objective, must be finite, (determined.) 
Now, since the objective activity is posited as its 
opposite, it must be posited in a different manner. 
If both were finite in the same manner, they could 
not be distinguished. This finite objective activity, 
presupposing, as we have shown, the activity of an 
object, and thus having its ground not in itself, but 
outside of itself, goes upon an object not grounded 
in itself, that is, a real object. 

Now, the infinite activity can, therefore, not be 
finite in this manner. It can not depend upon and 
determine the real world, which presupposes an ac- 
tivity of the Non-Ego reciprocally related to the 
objective activity of the Ego. The infinite activity 
determines, on the contrary, a world wherein through ■ 
the Ego is posited all reality, wherein no activity 
of the Non-Ego is presupposed, an ideal world, ab- 
solutely posited through the Ego. 

How, then, is it also finite .■• In so far as it tends 
upon an object at all, and as it hence must deter- 
mine that object. When the real object was placed 
in relation to the objective activity of the Ego, not 
the act of determining it, as such, depended upon 
the Non-Ego, but the limit of the determination. 
But in regard to the ideal object, both the act of 
determining it, and the limit of the determination, 
is to be dependent upon the Ego ; and the Ego is 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 2/5 

conditioned only in that it must posit limits at all, 
which, however, it can infinitely extend. 

The ideal is absolute product of the Ego ; it may \ 
be extended infinitely, but in every determined mo- 
ment it has its limit. The undetermined tendency v 
generally — which, however, can not properly be 
called tendency, since it has no object, and can, in- 
deed, have no name — is infinite, but, as such, it can 
not enter consciousness, since consciousness is 
only possible through reflection, and, hence, through 
determination. 

But as soon as you reflect upon it, you neces- 
sarily posit it as finite. And as soon as you be- 
come conscious that it is finite, you extend it 
again and make it infinite. Then, when you 
ask once more, Is it now infinite .-' you make it 
again, by that very question, finite ; and so on ad 
infinitum. 

Infinite and objective is, therefore, contradictory. 
This contradiction could only be solved by alto- 
gether removing the object. But it is removed 
only in a finished infinity, that is, never. The Ego '^ 
can infinitely extend the object of its tendency ; 
but, if it had extended it in any one moment to an 
infinity, the object, as such, would have vanished, 
and the idea of infinity would have been reaHzed. 
But this is a contradiction. 

In this contradiction lies the certitude of immor- *' 
tality. The very conception" of the Ego involves 
this, that it ever infinitely extends its object, but 
never completes it. It always posits the absolute 



276 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

Ego as totality of reality, but because this, its posit- 
ing, is directed upon objects, (a world,) it never com- 
' pletes the positing. The moral world (the only 
real world) is always complete, and is always real- 
ized in every act ; but is, at the same time, never 
realized in the actual objective world, for the very 
reason that, being objective, it extends into the in- 
finite. 

Were the Ego more than a tendency, that is, if 
it had infinite causality, it would not be an Ego, 
would not posit itself, and hence be nothing. If, 
again, it had not this infinite tendency, it could also 
not posit itself, for it could not posit its opposite ; 
hence, it would again be no Ego, be nothing. 



OTHER STATEMENT OF THE SAME RESULT. 

' Our RESULT was, that the pure, self-returning 
activity, in its relation to a possible object, is cin 
infinite tendency.- A tendency, that is, an activity 
which meets resistance, has, therefore, no causality 
as such, and is in so far partly conditioned by a 
Non-Ego, which has as such no causality. Such a 
causality is, therefore, required. That the require- 
ment of such an absolute causality must be origi- 
nally contained in the Ego, we have proven by 
showing that the contradiction between the Ego as 
intelligence and as absolute Ego could not be other- 
wise solved ; and hence our proof was only apogo- 
gical ; \)Vi\. how this requirement originated in the 
Ego we have not yet shown. This direct and gene- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 2/7 

tic proof or deduction must, however, be possible. 
It must be possible to show up in the Ego not onlyN 
a tendency to have a determined causality, (deter- 
mined through a Non-Ego,) but a tendency to have 
causality in general — the latter to be the ground of 
the former. 

An activity which goes beyond the object be- 
comes a tendency only because it goes beyond the 
object, and hence only on condition of an object. 
But, we must now show up a ground in the Ego for 
its going out of itself at all, and show how this go- 
ing beyond itself of the Ego is solely grounded in 
the Ego itself, and how it precedes all resisted ac- 
tivity, and first makes it at all possible. 

In other words, we must show up in the absolute \ 
Ego the ground of the possibility of the influence of 
an Other (of a foreign Non-Ego) upon itself. We 
must show how, although it only posits itself, it re- 
mains susceptible to the positing of another. 

The Ego is, therefore, to find originally in itself 
an heterogeneous, foreign, distinguishable Other. 

Jn itself, not outside of itself If the latter were^ 
true, the Other would not be /or the Ego. Hence, v 
in some respect, the Other must be equal, relatable, 
to the Ego, must belong to it. 

The Ego is = absolute activity, (self-positing ;) ^ 

if the heterogeneous Other is, therefore, any ways 

to be ascribed to the Ego, it must be an activity of 

the Ego, which as such can not be foreign, but 

the direction of which may perhaps be foreign, that 

is, may not be grounded in the Ego. If the activity 

24 



278 , THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

of the Ego extends into the infinite and is thrown 
back into itself, the activity, as such, always re- 
mains activity of the Ego ; only its direction, its 
return, "is foreign to the Ego. Now, here arise 
these important questions : 

How does the Ego get to distinguish between 
the direction of its activity outward into the infi- 
nite, and inward back into itself, and why does it 
ascribe the latter to a foreign Other ? 

The absolute essence of the Ego is self-positing, 
as we know. As such it has, doubtless, a self-re- 
turning direction, (if we can speak of directions as 
yet, though we touch here upon the source of all 
directions, centripetal and centrifugal,) that is to 
■ say, a centripetal direction. But since &11 determi - 
nation involves negation, or the positing of an other, 
centripetal direction involves the silent presupposi- 
tion of the centrifugal. Rightly taken, the true 
scheme of the above absolute Ego would be the 
mathematical point, which is content and form to- 
gether, that is, which is all that it is, where it is. 
But the absolute Ego is not simply a self-positing, 
(which would make it an objective thing,) but it is 
a positing of itself _/br itself. Through \!a\%for the 
above centripetal direction at once receives its 
complement in the centrifugal. The direction, of 
the activity of the Ego is centripetal in so far as it 
is reflecting, and centrifugal in so far as it is that 
which is reflected upon, and this centrifugality is 
infinite. Both the centripetal and the centrifugal 
directions are equally grounded in the Ego, are 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 279 

both one and the same, and are only different when 
reflected upon as different. 

REMARK. 

All centripetal power in the world of nature is 
purely product of the power of imagination of the 
Ego, in virtue of a law of reason to gather the 
manifold into unity. 

But both directions can n,ot be distinguished, 
unless a third link is found whereby they can be 
related to each other. As yet this third link has 
not been found ; both directions are as yet undis- 
tinguishable, and consciousness, therefore, impos- 
sible. 

SECOND REMARK. 

God's self-consciousness could only be explained 
by the presupposition that God thinks his own 
being. But since in God the reflected would be all 
in one and one in all, and the reflecting would be 
also one in all and all in one, God could not distin- 
guish between reflecting and reflected, between 
consciousness and the object thereof ; and hence 
his self-consciousness could not be explained. In-v 
deed, the self-consciousness of God can be explained 
or comprehended by no thinking which is subject 
to the law, that all determination is a negation. 

The infinitely extending activity of the Ego is to ' 
be somewhere checked and repelled ; and the Ego 
is not to fill up infinity. That this is so can not be ^ 



280 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

shown, but can only be known as fad ; but it can 
be shown that this must be so if consciousness is 
to be realized. But still the requirement that the 
Ego should fill up the infinity remains, and when 
taken up in reflection it is found that the require- 
ment has not been satisfied, that the activity has 
been checked, repelled ; and only through this third 
link of the requirement is a distinction possible and 
a centripetal direction established, which is as such 
distinguishable from the first centrifugal direction 
of the Ego whereby it sought to fill up infinity. 
The centrifugal direction is the original directiorl 
of the absolute Ego, the centripetal direction th6 
reflected direction of the checked Ego. 

RESULTS. 

1st. Because the Ego is a for-itself positing, a 
reflecting, of itself, does it go beyond itself ; and be- 
cause in thus positing itself it must posit itself as 
the totality of all reality has it a tendency to causa- 
lity. 

2d. In so far as the Ego simply posits itself it is 
complete in itself, and posits no other. But since 
it must posit itself as self-posited, (that is, for it- 
self,) it thus, by this second (as it were) positing, 
posits the possibility that something could be in it- 
self not posited through itself, and thus externalizes 
itself 

The first positing gives the activity of the Ego 
which is to be checked ; the second positing makes 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 28 1 

it possible that the first activity can be checlced for 
the Ego, or that tlie Ego can posit itself as deter- 
mined. And thus we have discovered an original 
self-relation of the Ego, through which alone an 
external influence upon the Ego is made possible. 

3d. The absolute Ego posits itself as the totality ^ 
of all reality. In applying this positing to the infi- v 
nite objective world, the Ego becomes a practical 
or moral Ego. In this, its morality, it is not abso- ' 
lute, since it goes beyond itself by the tendency of 
its reflection ; nor is it theoretical, since its reflec- 
tion tends upon the absolute Ego alone, and does , 
not take the check into account at all. It is simply 
moral — and gives the moral, the ideal world, the 
world to be posited. 

But if the reflection takes the check into account "^ 
and thus considers its externalization limited, we 
obtain the real world determined by the Non-Ego. 
In doing this the Ego is theoretical, or intelligence. ^ 

Without the practical, moral faculty of the Ego "^ 
the intelligence is not possible ; fpr, unless the Ego 
goes beyond the check, there is no check, no Non- 
Ego for and in the Ego. Again, unless the Ego 
is intelligence, it can not be practical or self-con- 
scious, since only the foreign check makes possible 
a distinction of the directions of the Ego's activity. 

ADDENDA. 

We have thus obtained as the last ground of all 
reality for the Ego an original reciprocal causality 
24* 



282 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

between the Ego and an external Other, of which 
only this can be predicted, that it must be the op- 
posite of the Ego. By this reciprocity nothing new 

/or foreign is posited in the Ego ; it is only the 
ground of all motion and activity of the Ego ; and, 
since the Ego is nothing but activity, the ground 

'' of the existence of the Ego. The Ego is, there- 
fore, dependent, so far as its existence is concerned. 
But in regard to the determinations of this exist- 
ence, it is utterly independent. In other words : 

' That the Ego must be determined, in order to be, 
is an absolute first fact ; but that its determina- 

, tions are all its own has been clearly developed. 
Or : The point wherein we first attain conscious- 
ness does not depend upon us ; but all the infinite 
determinations of our course from this point de- 
pend wholly upon ua, Our theory is, therefore, 
realistic, in so far as it absolutely posits an Other, 
a foreign check or power ; but all possible determi- 
nations of this Other it undertakes to deduce from 
the determining faculty of the Ego. 

Our science is also idealistic. For by explaining 
consciousness, from an independent Other, it re- 
members that this very explanation necessarily takes 
already the stand-point of consciousness, and follows 
its laws ; whereas, the moment you seize the Other 
in thought, it ceases to be an independent Other, and 
becomes the production of thinking. But the pos- 
sibility of this thinking again presupposes real con- 

i sciousness, and hence that independent Other which 

)makes consciousness only possible. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 283 

In short : Every thing in its ideality is dependent 
upon the Ego ; but in its reality even the Ego is 
dependent. But in the Ego ideal and real ground 
are one and the same, and hence the reciprocity 
between the Ego and the Non-Ego is at the same 
time a reciprocity of the Ego with itself, a self- 
relation. The Ego can posit itself as limited by 
the Non-Ego, if it does not reflect that itself posits 
this Non-Ego ; it can posit itself as limiting the | 
Non-Ego by so reflecting. 

This, that the finite spirit must posit for itself an ^ 
absolute somewhat outside of itself,, (the thing pet 
se) and at the same time knows that it exists only 
for z^,(is a necessary noumen,) is the circle, which 
we may infinitely extend, but can never break 
through. A system which does not take account * 
of this circle is a dogmatic idealism ; a system 
which believes to have gone beyond it is a tran- 
scendent realistic dogmatism. 

We have said the consciousness of finite beings 
can only be explained by presupposing an indepen- 
dent power. Can only be explained for whom } 
Who are they that want explanation 1 The finite 
beings themselves. As soon as we speak of " ex- 
plaining," we are already in the field of finiteness ; 
for all explanation, that is, not a gathering of all 
determinations at once, but a gradual rise from one 
determination to another, is finite ; and this very 
determining or limiting is the bridge which carries 
the explanation, and which the Ego has in itself. 
The opposite power is independent of the Ego in 



284 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

regard to its being and determination, which seeks 
to modify the practical activity of the Ego, or the 
tendency of the Ego, to posit itself as the totality 
of all reality ; but it is dependent upon the ideal 
activity, the theoretical power of the Ego. It is 
for the Ego only, in so far as it is posited through 
the Ego, and otherwise it is not for the Ego. In- 
dependent reality the other has only in so far as it 
is related to the practical (moral) activity of the 
Ego ; in so far as it is related to the theoretical 
activity of the Ego, (the intelligence,) it is utterly 
dependent, and subject to its laws. But, again, how 
can it be in relation to the theoretical except 
through the practical Ego, and vice versa ? Here 
we have, again, no ideality, no reality, and vice 
versa. Hence, we can also say : The final ground 
of all consciousness is a reciprocal causality, self- 
relation, in the Ego, by means of a Non-Ego, an 
Other, which may be viewed in various ways. 

All seeming objections to the science of know- 
j ledge can be traced to an inability to hold this final 
I result. This may be manifested in two ways. You 
may either reflect that, since this result is an idea, 
it must also be in the Ego, and then you become 
a dogmatic idealist, and must deny dogmatically all 
external reality ; or you cling to the sayings of 
your feeling, and of your common sense, (v/ith 
which our science, rightly understood, perfectly 
agrees,) and then you deny what is clearly put be- 
fore you, or accuse our science of dogmatic ideal- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 285 

ism, because you do not gather its meaning. Nei- 
ther should be done ; but you should float between 
the two opposite determinations of this idea. This 
is the business of creative power of imagination, 
with which surely all human beings are gifted, but 
which not all have under their complete control. 



SECOND PART 



PRACTICAL PART 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



SECOND PART 



PRACTICAL PART 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



INTRODUCTORY. 

The result we have attained now as our final one 
is this : In positing the tendency of the Ego, a 
counter tendency of the Non-Ego is posited at the 
same time which holds it in balance. 

With, this result we shall have to do as we did 
with the result of the theoretical part of our science, 
that is to say, the Ego must posit it now in itself. 
It must become /i?r the Ego ; the Ego must realize ^ '< 
it. The realization of the theoretical result has 
shown itself up as the quantitative side of the con- 
struction of the universe, contemplation, sensation, 
time, and space, etc. ; the realization for the Ego 
of the practical result will, therefore, undoubtedly 
give its qualitative side, impulse, feeling, qualities 
of things, etc. 

25 



290 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

1. To clear the way, let us first state more pre- 
cisely the contents of our result : 

The conception of a tendency is the conception 
of a cause which is not cause. But every cause 
presupposes activity. Eveiy tendency has power ; 
if it had no power, it could not be cause. 

2. The tendency, as such, has necessarily its de- 
termined quantity as activity. It wants to be cause. 
But it does not become cause, does not attain its 
end, and hence is checked. If it were not checked, 
it would be cause, and not tendency. 

3. The tendency is not checked, limited by itself, 
for the conception of tendency involves that it 
should seek to be causality. If it limited itself, it 
would not be tendency. Hence, every tendency 
must be limited by another power opposed to it. 

4. This opposing power must also be a tendency» 
that is, strive to be causality ; for, if it did not so 
strive, it would have no relation to the first tendency. 
Moreover, it must not have any causality ; for, if it 
had causality, it would annihilate the tendency of 
its opposite by annihilating its power. 

5. Neither of the two opposite tendencies can 
have causality. If one of them had it, the power 
of the opposite would thereby be annihilated, and 
they would cease to be opposite tendencies. Hence, 
they must hold each other in balance. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 29 1 



IHE TENDENCY OF THE EGO IS POSITED AS IMPULSE, 
THE COUNTER TENDENCY OF THE NON-EGO AS 
CHECK, AND THE BALANCE OF BOTH AS FEELING. 

The tendency of the Ego, the opposing tendency 
of the Non-Ego, and their mutual balance is now 
to be posited, that is, to become for the Ego. 

A. The tendency of the Ego is posited as such. 

1. It is posited generally as something after the 
general law of reflection ; hence, not as activity, as 
something in motion, but as a fixed, permanent 
something. 

2. It is posited as a tendency. Tendency is a 
desire to have causality ; it must, therefore, in this, 
its character, be posited as causality. Now, this 
causality can not be posited as directed upon the 
Non-Ego, for then it would be posited as real effec- 
tive causality, and not as tendency. Hence, it can 
only return into itself, only produce itself But an 
itself-producing tendency, which is also something 
fixed, permanent, decided, is called an impulse. 

(The conception of an impulse involves, ist. That 
it should be grounded in the inner essence of that 
whereunto it is ascribed, hence, that it should be 
produced by the causality of that essence upon it- 
self by its self-positing ; 2d. That it should be for 
that very reason something fixed and enduring ; 3d. 
That it should seek to have causality outside of it- 
self, but should have none in so far as it is merely 
impulse. Hence, the impulse is purely in the sub- 



292 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

ject, and never goes beyond the sphere of the sub- 
ject.) 

B. The tendency of the Ego can not be posited 
without the positing of a counter tendency of the 
Non-Ego ; for the tendency of the former desires to 
have causality and has none ; and that it has not 
causality can not be grounded in itself, for the very 
conception of a tendency is the desire to have cau- 
sality. Hence, the ground of its not having causa- 
lity must be posited outside of the Ego, and again 
only as a tendency, otherwise the tendency of the 
Ego, or the impulse, as we now call it, would be 
suppressed. 

C. The balance between both must be posited. 
The question here is not that this balance must 

be posited, for this has been shown before, but • 
What is posited in and through the Ego by posit- 
ing this balance .' The Ego tends to fill up the in- 
finite ; it also tends to reflect upon itself, which it 
can not do without being limited ; and in regard to 
the impulse, without being limited through a rela- 
tion to the impulse. 

Let us suppose the impulse to be limited in the 
point C ; then in C the tendency to reflection is satis- 
fied, but the impulse to have real causality is limited. 
The Ego, then, limits itself in C, and is placed in 
self-relation ; the impulse urges it further on, the 
reflection holds it still, and through the reflection 
it holds itself still. 

Both united is the expression of a compulsion ; 
of an / can not. An / can not involves, first, a fur- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 293 

ther onward tendency, for else that which I can not 
would not be for me ; second, limitation of real 
activity ; and, thirdly, that the limiting should not 
be in me, but outside of me, or else there would be 
no tendency, and instead of an / can not we should 
have an I will not. 

This utterance or expression of the / can not in 
the Ego is ziS!^^^ feeling. In feeling is intimately 
united, first, activity — / feel, I am the feeling, (and 
this activity is that of the reflection ;) and, secondly, 
limitation — I feel, am passive, not active, there is a 
compulsion. This limitation necessarily presup- 
poses a tendency to go beyond. For else it would 
not be limited, for itself, of course. Feeling is 
altogether subjective. To explain it we require, it 
is true, an objective, a limiting, which is the busi- 
ness of the theoretical part of the science of know- 
ledge, but not to deduce it as occurring in the Ego, 
as being posited in the Ego. 

EXPLANATORY REMARK. 

Here we see sun clear what so many philoso- ^ ^ 
pjiers, who can not get rid of transcendent dogma- 
tism, can not comprehend, that is, that and kow the 
Ego develops out of itself whatsoever occurs in it, 
without ever going beyond itself or breaking 
through its own circles. And how else could an V'^ 
Ego indeed be an Ego "i There is a feeling in the 
Ego ; this is a limitation of the impulse ; and if it 
is a determined feeling, (distinguished frt)m other 
25* 



294 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

feelings,) the possibility whereof is as yet not visi- 
ble, then it is the limitation of a determined im- 
pulse, distinguished from other impulses. The 
Ego must posit a ground of this limitation, and 
must posit it outside of itself It can posit the 
impulse as limited only by an opposite, and hence 
the impulse evidently determines what is to be 
posited as object. If the impulse is posited as Y, 
the object must, therefore, necessarily be not-Y. 

V But as all this occurs in consciousness necessarily, 
a consciousness of this act never occurs, and each 
one assumes that he has received externally what 
nevertheless he has only produced by his own power 

^ in accordance with his own laws. Still, such a pro- 
ceeding has also objective validity, for it is the uni- 
versal procedure of all finite reason, and there is 
and can be no other objective validity than the one 
shown up. 

It is true, we in our investigation appear to have 
broken through this circle, for we have assumed as 
explanation of a tendency in the Ego an indepen- 
dent and opposite Non-Ego. But the ground of 
the possibility and correctness of such a proceed- 
ing on our part is this : Every one who enters into 
this investigation with us is himself an Ego — an 
Ego, however, which long ago has passed through 
all the acts we have here deduced, that is, which 
long ago has posited a Non-Ego ; and our present 
investigation intends merely to show to him that 
this Non-Ego is his own product. He has long 
since necessarily completed the whole business of 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 2g5 

Reason ; and now merely determines himself to 
take a second look at this transaction, to go over 
the whole account anew, as it were ; and hence he 
posits arbitrarily with us an Ego, which he places 
on the stand-point from which he originally started, 
and makes his experiment upon this Ego. When- 
ever this Ego, now investigated, shall arrive at the 
same point which the investigator now occupies, 
both Egos will be united, and the circle will be 
closed. 

FEELING ITSELF IS POSITED AND DETER- 
MINED. 

PRELIMINARY. 

The Ego is originally a tendency to fill up the 
infinite. This tendency is opposed to all object. 
The Ego also has a law in itself to reflect upon it- 
self, as thus filling up the infinite. But it can not 
thus reflect, unless it is limited. Hence, the satis- 
faction of this tendency to reflect itself is conditioned 
by an object. The reflection-tendency may also be -^ 
described as a tendency toward the object. 

This limitation occurs through feeling, and by it 
the tendency is satisfied, so far as its form is con- 
cerned — the Ego does now reflect with absolute 
spontaneity ; not satisfied, so far as its content is 
concerned ; for the Ego is posited as hmited, 
whereas it should be posited as unlimited. But 
this dissatisfaction is again not for the Ego, unless 
the Ego goes beyond the limit posited by itself 



296 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

How can this be ? How can this dissatisfaction or 
feeling be posited for the Ego ? 

As sure as the Ego reflects upon itself, it is lim- 
ited. Limited, that is, for a possible outside ob- 
server, not yet for itseli! Let us at present be 
these outside observers, or, which is the same, let 
us posit in place of .the Ego something which is 
only observed, a lifeless body, to which, however, 
we shall ascribe what we have presupposed as per- 
taining to the Ego. Let us, therefore, suppose an 
elastic ball, = A, and assume that it is pressed in 
by another body. In this case : 

A. You posit in A a power, which, as soon as 
the opposite power gives way, will manifest itself 
without any further external influence, which, 
therefore, has in itself the ground of its causality. 
The power is in A, and tends in and upon itself to 
find expression ; it is a power which is directed in 
and upon itself, hence an internal power. It is an 
immediate tendency to have causality upon itself, 
but which has no causality by reason of the ex- 
ternal resistance. It is a balance of the immediate 
tendency, and of the mediated counter-impression 
in the body itself ; hence, what above we calle 1 
impulse. In the elastic body A an impulse is 
therefore posited. 

B. In the other body, which presses A in, and 
which we shall call B,- the same internal power 
which resists the reaction and the resistance of A, 
and which, therefore, is also itself restricted by A, 
but which has its ground solely in itself, is also 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 297 

posited ; that is, power and impulse is posited in 
B precisely as in A. 

C. If one of both powers is increased, then the 
opposite is weakened, and vice versa; and, if the 
stronger power manifested itself fully, then the 
weaker one would be driven completely out from 
its sphere of action. As it is, both completely 
balance each other, and the point of their junction 
is the point of this balance. If that point is 
moved in the least, the whole relation is destroyed. 
This is the case with an object having a ten- 
dency, but not reflection ; (we call such an object 
elastic) Let us now see how this will apply to our 
object of investigation, which is an Ego, and which 
therefore has reflection and tendency. 

The impulse is an inner power, determining it- 
self to manifest causality. But the lifeless body 
has no causality at all, except outside of itself ; and 
hence, since the inner power is held back by the 
external other body, its self-determination, its desire 
to manifest causality, results in nothing. 

This is the case precisely with the Ego, in so far 
as it desires to have external causality ; and, if it 
only had a desire for external causality, the case of 
the elastic body would be altogether applicable. 

But the Ego, precisely because it is an Ego, has 
also a causality upon itself, that is, a causality to 
posit itself, or to reflect upon itself Now, the im- 
pulse is to determine the power of that which has 
the tendency, and hence, in so far as this power is to 
manifest itself in that which has the tendency, as is 



298 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

the case with reflection, it follows that from the de- 
termining of the impulse a manifestation of such a 
determining must necessarily result. Or, in other 
words, the impulse necessarily results in the self- 
rejlectiott of the Ego. (An important point.) 
' Hence, all reflection is grounded upon the ten- 
'- dency ; and, again, there is no tendency, that is, 
for the Ego, and hence no tendency of the Ego, and 
indeed no Ego at all unless there is reflection. 
Both tendency and reflection are synthetically 
united. Hence, also, the limitation of the Ego. 
For no limitation no tendency, no tendency no re- 
flection, etc. 
'' Hence, also, the distinction and union of ideal 
If and real activity. The original tendency of the 
Ego as such is both ideal and real, both external 
and internal, because neither is distinguishable. 
By the limitation the external direction of the ten- 
dency is cut off, but not the internal, the self-re- 
turning, which is therefore the ideal. This ideal 
activity will soon appear to be the activity of re- 
presentation, and hence the relation of the impulse 
to it may be called the impulse of representation ; 
which is, therefore, the first and highest manifesta- 
tion of the impulse, whereby the Ego first becomes 
intelligence. 

Hence, finally, the subordination of the theoreti- 
cal to the practical part ; and why all theoretical 
laws are grounded upon practical laws, or rather 
upon one practical law. From this result, more- 
over, the absolute freedom of reflection and abstrac- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 299 

tion, and the possibility to direct your attention 
upon a subject and to avert it from another subject 
for moral reasons, without which indeed no morahty 
were possible. Fatalism is rooted out thoroughly,*/ 
and its doctrine that an acting and willing is de- 
pendent upon the system of our representations is 
destroyed by the proof that this system is again 
dependent upon our impulse and our will. 

Now, in this self-reflection, the Ego as such, 
which is never immediately conscious of its acting, 
can not be self-conscious. And yet it is now an 
Ego, a. for — of course, for an outside observer ; and 
here is the limit, where the Ego as a living essence 
is distinguished from a lifeless body, in which there 
also may be an impulse, as we have shown, but no 
reflection. The Ego is posited now as something 
for which something might be, though it is not yet 
for itself. But it is posited as something, for which 
there is an inner impelling power, which, however, 
is only felt, since there is as yet no -consciousness 
of it. 

(A state of the Ego which every one can expe- 
rience for himself. The philosopher may thus re- 
fer every one to experience for the what, not for the 
that. To postulate that a certain feeling must be 
is to proceed improperly. But its content, the 
what, each one must discover in himself) 

We now have a living distinct from the lifeless. / 
Feeling of power is the principle of all life, is the v ^ 
transition from death to life. 



300 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

This power is felt as impelling ; the Ego feels 
impelled to go out of itself. 

This impulse can and does not determine the 
real activity, does not produce a causality upon the 
Non-Ego. But it can and must determine the 
ideal activity, which depends altogether upon the 
Ego. The ideal activity, therefore, goes beyond 
and posits something as object of the impulse, as 
what the impulse would produce if it had causality. 
But neither this production nor the producing oc- 
curs as yet in consciousness, and we only show here 
how the Ego c^axi feel impelled toward an unknown 
something. 

The impulse is to be felt as impulse, that is, as 
something which has not causality. But in so far 
as it impels, at least to a production of its object 
through ideal activity, it has most assuredly causal- 
ity, and in so far is not felt as impulse. 

Again : in so far as the impulse tends toward 
real activity, it is also not to be felt, for as such it 
has not causality. 

Uniting both we say : an impulse can not be felt 
unless the ideal activity tends upon the object of 
the impulse ; and this can not be unless the real 
activity is limited. 

And thus there results the reflection of the Ego 
upon itself as a limited. But since the Ego in this 
reflection is never conscious, this reflection is a 
xi\t.x^ feeling. 

And thus feeling is completely deduced. It in- 
volves a feeling of power, which does not manifest 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 30I 

itself ; an object of this power, which also does not 
manifest itself : and a feeling of compulsion of the 
I can not, which is the manifestation of feeling. 

FURTHER DETERMINATION AND LIMITATION OF 
FEELING. 

The Ego now feels itself limited, that is, is no 
longer limited like a lifeless, elastic body, for an 
outside observer, but is limited for itself. Its ac- 
tivity is canceled /or it ; for, though we have seen 
that the Ego has produced the object of its im- 
pulse by absolute activity, the Ego itself has not 
yet seen that it has so produced it. 

But the Ego can not tolerate the total canceling 
of its activity, and hence, to be an Ego, must restore . 
it, and must thus restore it for itself ; that is, it 
must, at least, posit itself in a manner so as to be 
able to posit itself as free and unlimited, though 
only in a future reflection. This is done, of course, 
through absolute spontaneity. The Ego turns 
from one reflection to another simply because it 
does so. . 

Here is the boundary between life and Intel-"' 

ligence, as above we had the boundary between / 

death and life. This self-consciousness of the/ 

Ego occurs through absolute spontaneity. Not by|/ 

virtue of a law of nature, but through absolute 

freedom do we attain reason ; not through a transi- / 

tion, but by a leap. Hence, all philosophy must v ' 

necessarily start from an Ego, because the Ego 

26 



302 The science of knowledge. 

can not be deduced ; and hence the undertaking 
of the materialists to explain the manifestations of 
reason from laws of nature must always remain an ■ 
impossibility. 

The act whereby the canceled activity is to be 
restored must, of course, be one of ideal activity ; 
and since it is to be altogether grounded in the 
Ego, its object must be a something in the Ego. 
And since in the Ego there is nothing but feelingj 
this activity must have feeling for its object. 

The act occurs with absolute spontaneity, and is 
in so far act of the Ego. It has feeling for its 
object, that is, firstly, the reflecting of the previous 
reflection, which constituted feeling. Activity thus 
has activity for an object; that which reflects ^or 
feels is, therefore, posited as Ego. Or, in other 
words, the Ego, which restores its canceled acti- 
vity, in this act transfers its own Ego-ness to the 
reflecting, since itself does not become conscious 
in this act as Ego. Not being conscious that itself 
is the Ego, it makes the reflecting the Ego. 

But the Ego is the self-determined. Hence, the 
reflecting, or that which feels, can only be posited 
as Ego, in so far as it is only determined by the 
impulse, (that is, by the Ego or by itself,) to reflect, 
to feel ; or, in other words, in so far as it feels it- 
self and its own power in itself. (Only that which 
feels is the Ego, and only the impulse, as produc- 
ing feeling or reflection, belongs to the Ego. What- 
soever is beyond this limit, that is, the impulse, 
which impels the Ego to go beyond, to externalize 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 303 

itself, is excluded from the Ego ; which should be 
carefully noted, for we shall return to this ex- 
cluded.) 

Hence, the feli becomes also Ego, in and for the 
present reilection, because that which feels is only 
in so far Ego as it is self-determined, that is, as it 
feels itself 

The Ego can, therefore, be posited as Ego only 
in so far as it is both the fe/i and the feeling; that is, 
as it is self-related. It is to be so posited, and we 
must, therefore, posit it thus. But how .' That 
which feels is posited as active in feeling, in so far 
as it is that which reflects, and in so far the felt in 
the same reflection is passive, for it is the object of 
the reflection. 

Again : that which feels is posited as passive in 
feeling, in so far as it feels itself impelled, and in so 
far the felt or the impulse is active. 

This contradiction must be united : 

That which feels is active, and only active in its 
relation to the felt. (Its passiveness, that is, that 
it is impelled to reflect, does not arise here in con- 
sciousness, where the relation is only posited to the 
felt, and where the reflection and impulse is, there- 
fore, altogether lost sight of) 

That which feels is passive in relation to an im- 
pulse ; to the impulse to go out of itself, whereby 
the Ego is driven to produce a Non-Ego through 
ideal activity. (And here the activity of that which 
feels is lost sight of in consciousness. Hence, /or 



304 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

itself, in the self-reflection of the Ego, the Ego ap- 
pears to act under compulsion.) 

Again : the felt is active through the impulse, 
which impels the reflecting to reflect ; but it is also 
passive in the same relation, since it is object of 
the reflection. But this latter does not occur in 
consciousness, since the Ego is posited ^s feeling 
itself, and not, therefore, as reflecting again upon 
the reflection. Hence, this latter passiveness, 
which relates to the reflecting, is not posited, and 
the Ego is posited passive in another relation, that 
is, in so far as it is limited by a Non-Ego. In other 
words : every object of reflection is necessarily lim- 
ited — has a fixed quantity. But in reflecting this 
limitation is never deduced from the reflection it- 
self, because the reflecting goes only upon the ob- 
ject, not upon the reflection itself 

Both the feeling and the felt are to be one and 
the same Ego, and are to be posited as such. And 
yet the one is viewed as active in relation to the 
Non-Ego, and the other as passive in the same re- 
lation ; the one as producing through ideal activity 
a Non-Ego, the other as limited by this Non-Ego. 

SOLUTION. 

Both the producing Ego and the felt Ego in the 
reflection were posited as passive. Hence, the Ego 
is always for itself passive in relation to the Non- 
Ego, never becomes conscious of its activity in 
producing it, and never reflects upon this activity. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 305 

This explains why the reality of the thing appears 
to be felt, when only the Ego is felt. 



REMARK. 

And here we have the ground of all reality. 
Only by the relation of feeling to the Ego does 
reality become possible for the Ego — reality of the 
Ego as well as of the Non-Ego. 

Something which is possible only through the ' 
relation of a feeling, without the Ego becoming con- 
scious of its contemplation thereof and which ap- 
pears, therefore, to be felt, is believed. Reality — -real- 
ity of the Ego as well as of the Non-Ego — is only a 
matter o f belief. 

THE IMPULSE ITSELF IS POSITED AND DETER- 
MINED. 

As we have posited and determined feeling, so 
now the impulse. But to posit means : the Ego 
reflects upon it. The Ego, however, can only re- 
flect upon itself or upon its content. Hence, the 
impulse must be already manifested in the Ego, if 
the Ego is to reflect upon it. 

That which feels is posited as Ego. This was 
determined by the felt original impulse to go be- 
yond itself, and to produce something at least 
through ideal activity. But the original impulse 
does not tend upon mere ideal activity, but upon 
reality. Hence, the Ego is determined by it to 

produce a reality otttside of itself. But since the 

26* ' 



306 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

tendency of the Ego is always to be counterba- 
lanced by the tendency of the Non-Ego, it can not 
have this external causality, and is, therefore, in so 
far as it is impelled by the impulse, limited by the 
Non-Ego. 

The Ego has the tendency always to reflect upon 
itself, whenever the condition of all reflection, limi- 
tation, occurs. It occurs here. The Ego, there- 
fore, reflects, and, as in all reflection, the Ego for- 
gets itself, that is, the reflecting Ego does not be- 
come visible. Again : this reflection occurs in 
consequence of a mere impulse ; hence, there is no 
freedom manifested in it, and it becomes, as above, 
a mtre feeling. But what sort of feeling .■• 

The object of this reflection is the impelled, 
hence the idealiter, in itself, active Ego ; impelled 
by an inner impulse, hence without spontaneity. 
This activity has an object, which it can not realize 
as thing, nor represent through ideal activity. 
Hence, it is an activity which has no object at all, 
but which is irresistibly impelled to produce an object, 
and which is xaGvely felt. Such an activity is call- 
ed a yeami7ig — an impulse toward a completely 
unknown which manifests itself solely as a require- 
ment, as dissatisfaction ; as an emptiness which 
seeks to be filled, but does not signify whence. 
The Ego feels a yearning — a want. 

Both feelings, that of yearning and the above 
feeling of limitation and compulsion, must be dis- 
tinguished and related to each other. (For the im- 
pulse is to be detei'mined. Now, the impulse ma- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 30/ 

nifests itself through a certain feeling. Hence, 
this feeling is to be determined. But it can thus 
be determined only through another feeling.) 

Unless the first feeling of the Egw were a limita- 
tion, the second would not be a yearning, but would 
be causality ; for the Ego might then produce ex- 
ternally, and its impulse would not be restricted 
to determine the Ego only internally. 

Again : if the Ego did not feel itself as yearning, 
it could not feel itself limited, for only through 
yearning does the Ego go beyond itself, only through 
yearning is something posited in and for the Ego, 
which shall be external. 



REMARK. 

This yearning is an important determination. \/ 
Only through it is the Ego impelled in itself to go / 
out of itself ; only through it does an external world 
reveal itself ijt the Ego. 

Both feelings, yearning and limitation, are there- 
fore synthetically united. Neither is possible with- 
out the other. Both are also complete opposites. 
In limitation the Ego is felt as passive, in yearning 
as active. 

Both feelings are grounded in the same impulse 
of the Ego. The impulse of the limited Ego, 
which only through this limitation obtains an im- 
pulse, determines the reflection of the Ego, and 
hence arises the feeling of a compulsion. The 
same impulse determines the Ego to go beyond it 



308 THE SCIEISTCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

self to produce an external ; and since i^ this re- 
spect the Ego is limited, there arises in the Ego a 
yearning, which being reflected upon results in a 
feeling of yearning. How does the same impulse 
result in different feelings ? By appealing to diifer- 
ent powers. In the first instance, it appeals to the 
power of reflection ; in the second, to the absolute, 
free tendency of the Ego to produce. (The producr 
tion, of course, we do not yet know, nor can know.) 

Hence, yearning is the original and absolute in-, 
dependent expression of the tendency in the Ego. 
Independent because it pays no regard to limitar 
tion, and transcends all limitation. (This remark 
is important, because it will appear hereafter that 
this yearning is the vehicle of all practical, that is, 
moral laws, (or conscience,) which laws are to be 
recognized by the test, whether they can be de- 
duced from this yearning or not.) 

Through the limitation there arises in the yearn- 
ing also a feeling of compulsion, which must have 
its ground in the Non-Ego. The object of the 
yearning (we will call this object the ideal ; it is 
the object which the Ego as determined by the im- 
pulse would realize, if it had causality) is perfectly 
congruent to the tendency of the Ego ; but that 
object, which may be (or is) posited by the feeling 
of limitation, is opposed to this tendency. Both 
objects are, therefore, opposites. 

Nevertheless, since in the Ego there can be no 
yearning without compulsion, and vice versa, the 
Ego is synthetically united in both. And yet it is 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 309. 

also opposed to itself in both these determinations. 
The Ego is both : limited and unlimited, finite and 
infinite. Let us now solve this contradiction satis- 
factorily. • /' 

The yearning wants to realize something outside'' 
of the Ego. But this it can not. Yet it must ef- 
fect what it can. It can determine the ideal acti- 
vity of the Ego to go beyond itself, and produce an 
external. How and what can this activity so pro- 
duce .' There is in the Ego a determined feeling 
of limitation, = X. Again, there is in the Ego a 
yearning desirous of positing reality. But reality 
manifests itself for the Ego only through feeling, 
hence the yearning yearns for a feeling. Now, the 
feeling X can not be the yearned for feeling, for 
then the Ego would neither feel itself limited nor 
yearning, and would indeed not feel itself at all. 
The yearned for feeling must, therefore, be its oppo- 
site — X. The object which would produce this 
feeling in the Ego must, therefore, be produced. 
We will call this object also — X. — X would be 
the ideal. 

Now, if the first object, X, could be felt, this op- 
posite object, — X, might be easily enough posited.- 
But X can not be felt because t he Ego never feels ^"^ 
an object, only feels itself, and produces an object 
only through ideal activity. 

Again, if the Ego could produce in itself the 
feeling — X, both feelings could also easily enough 
be placed in relation ; but this the Ego can not do 
because it has no causality. (The Ego can not 



3IO THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

limit itself. Vide " Theoretical Part.") The prob^ 
lem is, therefore, no less than this : To make ap- 
pear from the feeling of limitation, not determined 
in any further way, the object of the opposite feel- 
ing of yearning, or to have the Ego produce the 
latter by ideal activity after the mere suggestion of 
the former feeling of lin itation. 

REMARK. 

(The object of the feeling of limitation is some- 
thing real ; that of yearning Aas no reality, but ts 
to {shall) have reality. Both are opposed to each 
other, because through the one the Ego feels limit- 
ed, and through the other it strives to get beyond 
the limitation. What lie one is the other is not.) 
We now proceed : 

In its free reflection of feeling above, the Ego 
has posited itself as Ego by virtue of the principle, 
that the self-positing, or that which is both deter- 
mining and determined, is Ego. Hence, in that re- 
flection which was manifested as self-feeling, the 
Ego determined itself, completely described and 
limited itself. In that reflection the Ego was abso' 
lutely determining. 

It is this activity upon which the external imr 
pulse is directed, and thus becomes an impulse to 
determine, to modify, a something outside of the 
Ego, that is, the reality given by feeling. This re- 
ality is the determinable matter, which the impelled 
Ego is to determine, to modify. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 3II 

The balance between the Ego and this external 
reality must be kept up ; hence, the reality always 
remains the same, that is, reality. As such, as mat- 
ter, it can undergo no modification, for a modifica- 
tion would be in its case annihilation. Hence, the 
impulse of the Ego does not affect the reality as 
such, but effects a certain determination, modifica- 
tion of the reality of the matter. (It is wrong to 
say : different matter. Matter as such, materiality, 
is absolutely simple. One can only say : matter 
with different determinations.) 

Now, it is this determination of the external re- 
ality through the impulse which is felt as a yearn- 
ing. Hence, yearning does not at all tend to pro- 
duce matter as such, but merely to modify it. 

Th.Q feeling' of yearning was not possible without 
reflection upon the determination of the Ego 
through the impulse. This reflection, again, was 
not possible without limitation of the impulse to 
determine, which alone is manifested in yearning. 
Limitation of the Ego, however, is only felt. What 
feeling is it, then, whereby the impulse to determine 
Is felt as limited .' 

All determining occurs through ideal activity, -v"'^'^' 
Hence, if the presupposed feeling is to be possible, 
ideal activity must have determined already an 
object, and this act of determining must now be 
related to feeling. Here occur these questions : 
How is the ideal activity to arrive at the possibility 
and reality of this determining .' How can this 
determining be related to feeling ? 



312 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

We have shown heretofore already how the ideal 
activity of the Ego is determined in a certain way 
by the impulse. This determination forced the 
Ego to posit the ground of the limitation, as an in it- 
self determined object which, because it is thus pos- 
ited, never enters consciousness. We have just now 
shown up another impulse in the Ego, an impulse 
to merely determine, to merely modify ; and by 
virtue of this impulse the ideal activity must at 
least strive for the present to determine, modify, 
the posited object. We can not say how the Ego 
is to determine the object, but we know, at least, that 
it is to be the determining, the purely and abso- 
lutely active in the determining. Now, can this 
impulse to determine the object have causality or 
not } I reply, as sure as the Ego is to be Ego, it 
can have no causality ; for, unless this impulse is 
limited, yearning is not possible ; without yearning 
no feeling ; without feeling no life, consciousness, 
etc. Hence, that impulse can not have causality. 
But of this the ground can not be in the impulse 
itself, for then it would be no impulse ; and, hence, 
it is in an opposite impulse of the Non-Ego, to de- 
termine itself, in a causality of the Non-Ego, which 
proceeds its own way and follows its own laws, as 
the impulse follows its own. 

Hence, if there is an object, and independent de- 
terminations of this object, (that is, determinations 
produced by the own inner causality of nature,) 
and if, moreover, the ideal (contemplating) activity 
of the Ego is driven out, is externalized, then the 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 313 

Ego must and will determine the object. In this 
determining the Ego is guided by the impulse, and 
is impelled to determine the object according to the 
impulse ; but, at the same time, it stands under the 
influence of the Non-Ego, and is limited by it, that 
is, by the real qualitativeness of the thing, limited 
in the higher or lower degree, in which it can de- 
termine the object by the impulse. Through this 
limitation of the impulse the Ego becomes limited, 
and hence there arises a feeling, which is here a 
feeling of limitation of the Ego, not through matter, 
but through the qualitativeness of the matter. And 
thus we have answered also the second question, 
how the limitation of determining might be related 
to feeling. 

Let us further illustrate this important result : 
The Ego, as we found above, in its free reflec- 
tion of feeling determined itself through absolute 
spontaneity. Its activity in this determining was 
altogether of a reflective character, that is, the de- 
termining was not a modification of the Ego, but 
rnerely a reproduction in reflection, an imaging of 
itself. 

With this activity the impulse is now connected, 
and impels it to go out of the Ego. Of course, the 
character of the activity does not change thereby, 
only its direction changes ; instead of internal it is 
now external, but it is still the same, merely repro- 
ducing, imaging activity. Only, whereas, at first it 
imaged the Ego, it now images the Non-Ego. 

But further, in the above instance the Ego de- 
27 



314 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

termined itself through absolute spontaneity as 
Ego, because it posited itself as the determined and 
determining together in that reflection. It posited 
that which is both determined and determining as 
Ego, for the very reason that it was both the deter- 
mining and determined itself hi that reflection which 
it produced by absolute spontaneity. This law of de- 
termination was, therefore, in the Ego conjointly 
with its application. 

Now, the impulse connects with the reflecting 
Ego, does not modify it, but merely impels it out- 
ward. It does not, therefore, modify either that 
law of determination in the Ego, whereby whatso- 
ever the Ego is to reflect upon, to determine, {ideal- 
iter) must be (realiter) " determined and determin- 
ing together." Hence, also, the Non-Ego, which 
the Ego is to determine, must be both determined, 
and determining, or must be determined through 
itself. Only if the Non-Ego is self-determined 
can the impulse to determine be related to it, be 
satisfied. That impulse demands determinedness, 
perfect totality and wholeness. That which is de- 
termined, and not in the same respect determining, 
is, in so far, effect, and is excluded in reflection as 
something foreign from the thing. That which is 
not also the determined in so far as it is determin- 
ing, is, in so far, cause, and the determining is ap- 
plied in reflection to another somewhat, and thus, 
excluded from the thing. Only in so far as the 
thing is in causality with itself is it a thing. This 
characteristic is applied to the things by virtue of 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 315 

the law of determination, which is transferred from 
the Ego to the things. An important remark. 

ILLUSTRATION. 

Why is sweet, bitter, red, or yellow, etc., a simple 
sensation which can not be divided into many ; or, 
why is it an independent sensation, and not merely 
a component of another one } Evidently, because 
in the Ego there is this law of determination d, priori, 
and it is for the Ego that the sensation is a simple 
one. 

The distinction of the Ego and Non-Ego, how- 
ever, remains in spite of the sameness of their law 
of determination. For in the Ego the reflecting 
and the reflected is also one and the same ; but the 
Non-Ego is only the reflected. 

The question remains. How is the determinable 
given to the Ego 1 How is the Ego connected 
with the determinable .-' 

The Ego reflects upon itself as the determined and 
determining together, and is in so far limited, that is, 
goes only so far as the determined and determining 
goes. But a limited has a limiting. This limiting, 
opposed to the Ego, can not here be produced by 
its ideal activity as was presupposed in the theo- 
retical part of our science, but must be given to the 
Ego. This given opposite we have already as that 
which was above excluded in this reflection of the 
Ego. In other words, the Ego posits itself as Ego 
only in so far as it is the determined and the deter- 



3l6 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

mining, but it is both only ideally. Its tendency to 
have real activity is, however, limited, that is, is in 
so far posited as internal, inclosed, self-determining 
power, (that is, power which is both determined and 
determining,) or, since it is without manifestation, 
as intensive matter. And now, in so far as this 
internal power or intensive matter is reflected upon, 
it is by opposition externalized, and thus the in 
itself and original subjective is changed into an 
objective. 

REMARKS. 

Here we see plainly how the Ego can not posit 
itself as determined without oppositing a Non- 
Ego. It is the impulse — the impulse to go out- 
ward, which, since it can not connect with real 
activity, connects at least with ideal activity, and 
drives it outward. Through the impulse, therefore, 
all determinations of consciousness are connected, 
particularly the consciousness of the Ego and the 
Non-Ego. 

The subjective is changed into an objective, and 
vice versa; allr'obiective is originally p gnbjpptivp 
Since we speak here of a general determined, and 
since no general determined ever arises in con- 
\sciousness, we can only illustrate this by z. particu- 
lar determined. But this we can do clearly enough. 
For instance : something is sweet or sour, red or 
mellow, etc. Such a determinedness is evidently 
iltogether subjective. You positively can not de- 
scribe what this is : sweetness, red, yellow, etc. ; 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 317 

you can only feel it. You can only say : in me is 
the feeling of bitter, sour, etc. The whole matter 
is utterly subjective, not at all objective. From 
such subjective feelings all our knowledge starts. 
Without feeling no representation of an external , 
thing is possible. 

Now, the subjective determination of yourself 
you apply to an external ; the accidence of your 
Ego you change into an accidence of the thing, 
which is to be external, of a substance which is to be 
extended in and to fill up space. Now, you ought 
bng ago to have had some suspicion that this sub- 
stance itself is something purely subjective, since 
you found yourself able to apply something con- 
fessedly subjective to it, without any new feeling 
of a substance having entered you ; and since, 
moreover, such a substance would not at all be for 
you without your having applied the subjective feel- 
ing to it. Only thus is the substance in and for 
you. If it had got into you originally, as a neces- 
sary means wherewith to connect the subjective 
feeling, it m-ust have gotten into you, perhaps, 
through the senses. But the senses only furnish 
us subjective determinations ; the substance is not 
a matter of sensuous sensation, but is purely pro- 
duct of imagination. Or do you see the substance, 
hear it, smell it .' Somebody might say : I feel it. 
But the sense of feeling manifests itself only by the 
perception of a resistance, of an I can not ; and I 
hope you do not feel, but merely draw a conclusion 
as to that which resists. The feeling only goes to 



3l8 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

the surface and manifests itself as, for instance, 
roughness, coldness, warmth, hardness, etc. ; but 
does not go into the interior of the body. Why, 
then, do you extend this warmth or coldness over a 
whole plane, instead of positing it in a single point } 
And, moreover, how do you come to assume an 
interior of the body between the planes, since you 
do not feel that interior } Evidently, through imagi- 
nation. Still you consider this substance something 
objective ; and very justly, since you all have agreed 
and must agree as to its existence, because its pro- 
duction is grounded upon a universal law of reason. 

The impulse is directed upon the self-reflecting 
activity of the Ego as such. The Ego is, there- 
fore, to determine the thing, and hence to posit it- 
self as the determining, or to reflect upon itself as 
the determining. 

This activity of the Ego is one, and can not be 
directed upon many objects. It is to determine the 
Non-Ego, which we will call X. Now, we have 
said it is also to reflect upon itself as thus deter- 
mining. The act of determining X must, therefore, 
be canceled, broken ofi", and this through absolute 
spontaneity, since the reflection occurs through 
absolute spontaneity. 

The Ego in determining is, therefore, limited, 
and from this arises a feeling. Originally, the im- 
pulse to determine went outward, without any deter- 
mination, that is, into the infinite. At present it is 
canceled in a point we will call C. We have thus 



Tim SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 319 

a limitation of the determining impulse, and a re- 
flection of it, as the conditions of a feeling. It is 
a feeling of a limitation of the Ego by the deter- 
minedness of the thing, or a feeling of a determined, 
of a simple. 

In the reflection, which takes the place of the 
broken off" or canceled determining impulse, the 
Ego is to posit itself as Ego, that is, as the self- 
determining in this act. It is evident that the 
posited product of the Ego can only be a contem- 
plation of X, an image of X, not X itself This is 
posited as product of the Ego in its freedom signi- 
fies : it is posited as accidental, as that which might 
also be otherwise ; or as accidental, not in relation 
to the Ego, (for the Ego does not become conscious' 
of its freedom in imagining here — does not reflect 
upon its own reflection,) but in relation to another 
Non-Ego. 

EXPLANATION. 

X, in accordance with the law of determination, 
was to be self-determined. But by virtue of the ex- 
isting feeling it is also to extend to C ; no further, 
but also precisely so far. Of this its limitation the 
ground lies not in the idealiter determining and 
contemplating Ego. The Ego has no law for it. 
Does the self-determining X go only so far } It 
will appear hereafter that, considered in itself, it 
extends into infinity ; but even if there should be a 
distinction in the thing, how is that distinction to get 
within the sphere of action of the ideal Ego t For 



320 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

-the ideal Ego has no point of connection with the 
Non-Ego, and is idealiter active only in so far as it 
has no such connection, as it is not limited by the 
Non-Ego. In popular language : why is some- 
thing sweet and something else sour, opposed to the 
sweet ? To be sure, each is a determined some- 
thing. But, besides this general character, what is 
their ground of distinction .' It can only exist in 
the ideal activity, and must, hence, be contained, at 
least in part, in the Ego, since it is to be a distinc- 
\ tion/^r the Ego. 

Hence, the ideal Ego floats with absolute free- 
dom over and within the limit ; its limit is altoge- 
ther undetermined. But since it is to reflect upon 
itself in this contemplation, it must posit itself as 
determined in it ; for all reflection presupposes de- 
termination. Now, the law of determination is, 
that something is determined only in so far as it is 
determined through itself Hence, the Ego in the 
contemplation of that X must posit the limit of its 
contemplation for itself ; or, in other words, the 
Ego must determine itself to posit the very point 
C as its point of limitation ; and then X would be 
determined through the absolute spontaneity of the 
Ego. 

But X is also an X, which, in accordance with 
the general law of determination, determines itself, 
and is only as such object of reflection. Now, X. 
as X, that is, as both determined and determining, 
extends to C. Hence, the Ego must limit X in C, 
if it is to limit it correctly ; and thus X is not de- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 321 

termined through the absolute spontaneity of the 
Ego. 

The limitation of X in C is orAy felt, not contem- 
plated. The spo7itaneously posited limitation of X 
in C, through the Ego, is to be merely contemplated, 
not felt. But both feeling and contemplation have 
no connection. Contemplation sees, but it is empty ; \ 
feeling relates to reality, but it is blind. A synthe-'^ 
tical union of feeling and contemplation is, there- 
fore, necessary to limit X in C as demanded. The 
contemplation is to limit X through absolute spon- 
taneity, and yet so as to make X appear altogether 
self-limited. This is done if the ideal activity by 
its absolute power of production proceeds beyond 
X and posits a Y, (in the point B, C, D, etc., for 
the ideal activity can neither posit itself the fixed 
point of limitation, nor receive it as immediately 
given.) This Y, opposed to a determined some- 
what, must, firstly, be also somewhat, that is, self- 
determined ; secondly, opposed to X, or limiting X, 
that is, neither determining X, as far as X is deter- 
mined, nor being determined by X. as far as X 
determines, zx\^Sivice versa ; or it must be impossible 
to reflect upon X and Y as one. (Each is a some- 
what ; but each is another somewhat. Without 
opposition the whole Non-Ego is a somewhat, but 
not a determined, particular somewhat.) The law 
is, therefore, that Y and Y shall mutually exclude 
each other. And it is to posit this opposition that 
the impulse determines the ideal activity. The im- 



322 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

pulse in this tendency may be called an impulse of 
reciprocal determination. 

The limitation-point C is altogether posited 
through feeling ; hence the Y beyond C, in so far 
as it is to begin in C, can only be given through a 
relation to feeling. Feeling alone unites both in 
the limit. The impulse of reciprocal determination, 
therefore, also relates to a feeling ; and in this im- 
pulse, indeed, ideal activity and feeling are inti- 
mately united ; in it the whole Ego is one. It is 
this impulse which manifests itself through yearn- 
ing, a yearning for another, opposed to the previous. 

REMARK. 

In yearning ideality and impulse to produce 
reality are closely united. Yearning longs for an- 
other ; this is only possible under presupposition 
of a previous determination through ideal activity. 
Again : yearning is not thought or represented, 
but felt, as the limited impulse to produce reality. 
And thus it appears how in feeling an impulse to go 
outward, hence the presentiment of an external 
world, may manifest itself ; for feeling is modified 
by ideal activity, which is free from all limitation. 
Here it also appears how a theoretical function of 
the Ego can relate back to its practical power, 
which had to be shown as possible if a rational 
being was ever to become a complete whole. 

The feeling does not depend upon us, because it 
depends upon a limitation, and the Ego can not 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 323 

limit itself. Now, an opposite feeling is to arise. 
The question is : will the external condition, under 
which alone such a feeling is possible, arise also .' 
It must arise ; for, if it does not, the Ego has no 
determined feeling, hence feels nothing at all, and 
hence, does not live, and is no Ego. 

The feeling of an opposite is the condition of a 
satisfaction of the impulse, hence yearning is the 
impulse for a change of feelings. The yearned for 
object is now determined, but merely as this, that 
it is to be another feeling. 

Now, the Ego can not feel two feelings together, 
can not be limited in C and not limited in C at the 
same time. The other condition can, therefore, not 
be felt as another. It can, therefore, only be con- 
templated as another feeling, an opposite to the 
previous one. Hence, in the Ego contemplation 
and feeling are always together, and both are syn- 
thetically united in one and the same point. 

Again : the ideal activity can not replace or cre- 
ate a feeling ; it can, therefore, determine its object 
only by this, that it is not the felt object, that all 
determinations except those of feeling may be pre- 
dicated of it. Thus the thing always remains only 
negatively determined for the ideal activity, and the 
felt also undetermined. It is an infinitely con- 
tinued negative determining. 

ILLUSTRATION. 

What is sweet ? You determine it, it is some- 
thing not related to seeing, hearing, etc., but to 



324 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

taste. But what is taste ? That you can only know 
by experience, and can recall it by imagination only 
negatively, that is, in a synthesis of all that is not taste. 
Again, sweet is not sour, not bitter ; and thus you 
can go on and count up all the known determina- 
tions of taste. But, however many you may count, 
an infinite variety of possible new determinations 
which are not sweet remain. 

The only remaining question is, How does the 
ideal activity ascertain that the feeling has changed 
for another .■' Evidently, through the satisfaction 
of yearning, through a feeling of satisfaction. But 
let us examine this closer. 

THE FEELINGS THEMSELVES MUST BE POSITED AS 
OPPOSITES. 

Through ideal activity the -Ego is to oppose an 
object Y to the object X ; it is to posit itself as 
changed. But it posits Y only by virtue of a feel- 
ing, and of another feeling than that which posit- 
ed X. 

The ideal activity is altogether self-dependent, 
not dependent upon feeling. But if only the feel- 
ing, X, is in the Ego, then the ideal activity can 
not limit the object, X, can not say what it is, can 
not characterize. Hence, another feeling, =Y, 
must arise in the Ego, whereby the ideal activity 
can now characterize X, that is, oppose X to a de- 
termined Y. The change of feeling must, there- 
fore, have an influence upon the ideal activity. 
How can this be .■' 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 325 

The feelings themselves are different feelings for 
an outside observer, but they are to be different for 
the Ego itself ; that is, they are to be posited as 
different. Positing is done by ideal activity. Both 
feelings must, therefore, be posited to make the 
positing of each possible ; they must be syntheti- 
cally united, but also opposed. 

How, then, is a feeling posited .■' How are feel- 
ings synthetically united through positing } How 
are they posited as opposites 1 

A feeling is posited through ideal activity. The 
Ego, without self-consciousness, reflects upon a 
limitation of its impulse. From this arises a self- 
feeling. It again reflects upon this reflection, or 
posits itself in it as the determining and determined 
together. Thus, feeling itself becomes an ideal act, 
since ideal activity is transferred into feeling. The 
Ego feels, or, more correctly, has a sensation of 
something, that is, of matter. Through this reflec- 
tion upon feeling, feeling changes into sensation. 

Feelings are synthetically united through ideal 
positing. And their synthetical ground of union 
is this, that, without reflecting upon both, neither 
can be reflected upon as a feeling. When two feel- 
ings are related so as to limit and determine each 
other mutually, you can not reflect upon one with- 
out reflecting upon the other. 

But if they are to be thus related, there must be, 
in each feeling, something suggestive of the other. 
And such a relation we have already indeed dis- 
covered, namely, a feeling connected with a yearn- 

28 



^ 



326 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

ing, that is, with a desire for a change. If this 
yearning is to be fully determined, the other, the 
yearned for feeling, must be shown up. Such an- 
other feeling we have also already postulated. The 
same may determine in itself the Ego in whatever 
manner ; but, in so far as it is the yearned for feel- 
ing, it must be related to the former feeling, to the 
yearning, and must, in so far, be accompanied by a 
feeling of satisfaction. The feeling of yearning can 
not be posited without a satisfaction for which it 
yearns ; and the satisfaction can not be posited 
without presupposing a yearning which is being 
satisfied. The limit is where yearning ceases and 
satisfaction commences. 

How does this satisfaction manifest itself in feel- 
ing .' Yearning arose from an impossibility of de- 
termining, because the limitation was lacking. 
Hence, in yearning, ideal activity and impulse to 
produce reality were synthetically united. Now, as 
soon as another feeling arises : 

1st. The required determining becomes possible, 
and hence, occurs really ; and, 

2d. From its actual occurrence follows another 
feeling. (In feeling itself, as limitation, there is 
and can be no distinction. But from the fact that 
something becomes possible, which was not possible 
without a change of feeling, it follows that the con- 
dition of the feeling has undergone a change.) 

3d. By its actual occurrence impulse and act are 
one and the same ; the determination which the 
impulse requires is now possible, and really occurs. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 327 

The Ego reflects upon this feeling, and upon itself, 
in this feeling, as the determining and determined 
together, as completely united with itself, and such 
a determination of feeling may be called approval. 
The feeling is accompanied by approval. 

But the Ego can not posit this harmony 'of im- 
pulse and act without positing their distinction, or 
something wherein they are opposites. Such is 
the previous feeling, which is, therefore, necessarily 
accompanied by disapproval, (by a manifestation of 
disharmony between the impulse and the act.) 
Not every yearning is necessarily accompanied by 
disapproval ; but, when it has been satisfied, disap- 
proval of the previous feeling necessarily arises, 
and that previous feeling now appears insipid, ab- 
surd. 

The objects X and Y, which are posited through 
ideal activity, are now determined not merely as 
opposites, but also by the predicates of approval 
and disapproval. And thus you can go on and 
determine infinitely ; and all the internal determi- 
nations of things, (determinations related to feel- 
ing,) are nothing but degrees of approval and dis- 
approval. 

But this harmony or disharmony, approval or 
disapproval, which consists as yet only for an out- 
side observer, must become /(^r the Ego itself, must 
be posited b}' it. Whatsoever is to be ideally 
posited, or to be felt, must be connected with an 
impulse ; nothing is in the Ego without impulse. 



328 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

We must show up, therefore, an impulse in the 
Ego which tends to produce that harmony. 

Harmonious is that which may be regarded reci- 
procally as the determined and determining. But 
here the harmonious is not to be a unit, but a two- 
fold ; and hence the relation must be thus : A must 
be in itself both the determined and determining ; 
and so likewise must B. But both must have 
still another determination, (the determination of 
how far) in regard to which A is posited as the de- 
termining, if B is posited as the determined, and 
vice versa. 

An impulse to produce such a harmony lies in 
the impulse of reciprocal determination. The Ego 
determines X through Y, and vice versa. Examine 
this act of the Ego, and you will find that in both 
deterniinations each act is determined through the 
other, for the object of each is determined through 
the other. 

This impulse may be called the impulse of recip- 
rocal determination of the Ego through itself; or 
the impulse to produce absolute unity and comple- 
tion of the Ego in itself 

REMARK. 

(We have now completed the whole circle. First- 
ly, Impulse to determine the Ego. Secondly, Im- 
pulse through it to determine the Non-Ego ; and — 
since the Non-Ego is a manifold, and since, there- 
fore, no particular of the manifold can be in itself 
completely determined — impulse to determine the 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 329 

Non-Ego through reciprocity or change; finally, 
impulse of the Ego to determine itself through it- 
self by means of that change. This is, therefore, a 
reciprocal determination of the Ego and Non-Ego, 
which, by virtue of the unity of the subject, must 
change into a reciprocal determination of the Ego 
through itself. And thus the completeness of our 
deduction of the chief impulses of the Ego is at- 
tested by the return into itself of the circle.) 

The harmonious, the reciprocally through itself 
determined, is to be impulse and act. Each is to 
be viewed as determined and determining together. 

An impulse of this character (that is, determined 
and determining) would be an impulse which abso- 
lutely produced itself, an absolute impulse, an im- 
pulse for the sake of the impulse. (This is con- 
science, the absolute circle, impelling without high- 
er ground. Expressed as a law, it is the absolute 
law, or categorical imperative, thoii shalt!) The 
undetenninedness of this impulse is clearly visible ; 
for it impels without object, is merely formal. An 
act of this character (that is, determined and deter- 
mining) would be an act which is done simply be- 
cause it is done, with absolute self-determination 
and freedom. The whole ground, and all the con- 
ditions of acting, are in the acting. The undeter- 
mined here is also clear enough ; for there is no act 
possible without object, and the act can not give 
its own object. 

The rela.tion between both impulse and act is to 

28* 



330 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. ■ 

be that of reciprocal determination. Such a rela- 
tion requires, first of all, that the act may be re- 
garded as produced by the impulse. 

The act is to be absolutely free, hence not at all 
irresistibly determined, even not through the im- 
pulse. But this does not prevent the act from 
having a characteristic, by virtue of which it may 
be recognized as determined or not determined 
through the impulse. The relation also requires 
that the impulse may be posited as determined 
through the act. 

In the Ego there can be no opposites together. 
But impulse and act are here opposites. As sure, 
therefore, as the act arises, the impulse is broken 
off or limited. And thus arises a feeling. The 
act takes the possible ground of this feeling, and 
posits or realizes it. 

Now, if the act is determined through the im- 
pulse, then it follows that the object is also deter- 
mined through the impulse. The impulse is now 
(idealiter) determinable through the act ; that is, 
it may be characterized as having been directed 
upon this act. 

Hence results harmony, and there arises a feel- 
ing of approval, which is here a feeling of satisfac- 
tion, of complete fulfillment. (But this satisfaction 
lasts only a moment, since yearning returns.) But 
if the act is not determined through the impulse, 
then the object is in opposition to the~impulse, and 
there arises a feeling of disapproval, of dissatisfac- 
tion, of self-diremption of the subject. The impulse 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 331 

in this case is also determinable through the act, 
but negatively ; it was not an impulse directed upon 
this act. 

The act whereof we speak here is, as ever, a 
mere ideal act, through representation. All our ' 
sensuous causality in the sensuous world, which we 
believe in, also only appertains to us mediately 
through representation. 



THE DIGNITY OF MAN. ^ 

Speech delivered by Fickle at the close of the forego- 
ing Series of Lectures on the Science of Know- 
ledge. 

We have completed the survey of the human 
mind ; we have created a foundation, upon which 
a scientific system, as the correct representation 
of the original system in man, may be built. In 
conclusion, let us take a glance at the whole. 

Philosophy teaches us to look for every thing in ^ 
knowledge — in the Ego. Only through it is order ^ 
and harmony brought into the dead, formless mat- 
ter. From man alone does regularity proceed, and "^ 
extend around him to the boundary of his percep- 
tion ; and in proportion as he extends this boun- 
dary are order and harmony also extended. His 
observation marks out for each object of the infinite 
diversity its proper place, so that no one may crowd 
out the other, and brings unity into this infinite 



332 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

variety. By his observations are the heavenly bor- 
dies kept together, and form but one organized 
body ; by it the suns move in their appointed 
courses. Through reason there arises the immense 
gradation from the worm to the seraph ; in it is 
hidden the system of the whole spirit-world ; and 
man expects justly that the law, which he gives it 
and himself, shall be applicable to it ; expects justly 
the future universal acknowledgment of that law. 
In reason we have the sure guarantee that from it 
there will proceed, in infinite development, order and 
harmony, where at present none yet exists ; that 
the culture of the universe will progress simulta- 
neously with the advancing culture of mankind. 
All that is still unshaped and orderless will, through 
man, develop into the most beautiful order, and 
that which is already harmonious will become ever 
more harmonious, according to laws not yet deve- 
loped. Man will extend order into the shapeless 
mass, and a plan into universal chaos ; through him 
will corruption form a new creation, and death call 
to another glorious life. 

Such is man, if we merely view him as an ob- 
serving intelligence ; how much greater if we think 
him as a practical, active faculty .' Not only does 
he apply the necessary order to existing things. 
He gives them also that order which he selected 
voluntarily, wherever his footsteps led him. Na- 
ture awakens wherever his eyes are cast ; she pre- 
pares herself to receive from him the new, brighter 
creation. Even his body is the most spiritualized 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 333 

that could be formed from the matter surrounding 
him. In his atmosphere the air becomes softer, the 
climate milder, and nature assumes a brighter smile 
from the expectation to be changed by him into a 
dwelling-place and a nurse of living beings. Man 
commands coarse matter to organize itself accord- 
ing to his ideal, and to furnish him the substance 
which he needs. What was formerly dead and 
cold arises at his command from the earth into the 
nourishing corn, the refreshing fruit, and the ani- 
mating grape, and will arise into other things as 
soon as he shall command otherwise. In his sphere 
the animals become ennobled, cast aside under his 
intelligent eye their primitive wildness, and receive 
healthier nourishment from the hand of their mas- 
ter, which they repay by willing obedience. ' 
I Still more : around. man souls become ennobled ; 
1 the more a man is a man the more deeply and ex- 
\tensively does he influence men ; whatsoever car- 
ries the stamp of pure humanity will never be mis- 
I apprehended by mankind ; every human mind, 
every human heart opens to each pure outflow of 
humanity. Around the nobler man his fellow- 
beings form a circle, in which he approaches near- 
est to the centre who has the greatest humanity. 
Their souls strive and labor to unite with each 
other to form but one soul in many bodies. All 
are one reason and one will, and appear as co-labor- 
ers in the great, only possible destination of man- 
kind. The higher man draws by force his age 
upon a higher step of humanity ; the age looks 



334 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

back and is astonished at the gap over which it has 
leaped ; the higher man tears with giant arms 
whatever he can seize from the year-book of the 
human race. 

Break the hut of clay in which he lives ! In his 
being he is independent of all that is outward ; he 
is simply through himself ; and even in that hut of 
clay he is occasionally, in the hours of his exalta- 
tion, seized with a knowledge of this his real exist- 
ence ; in those hours, when time and space and 
every thing that is not himself vanish, when his 
soul tears itself by force from his body — returning 
to it afterward voluntarily in order to carry out 
those designs, which it would like to carry out yet 
by means of that body. Separate the two last 
neighboring atoms, which at present surround him, 
and he will still be ; and he will be, because it will 
be his will to be. He is eternal through himself, 
and by his own power. 

Oppose, frustrate his plans ! You may delay 
them ; but what are thousand and thousand times 
thousand years in the year-book of mankind i" — a 
light morning dream when we awake. He conti- 
nues and he continues to act, and that which ap- 
pears to you as his disappearance is but an exten- 
sion of his sphere ; what you look upon as death is 
but ripening for a higher life. The colors of his 
plans, and the outward forms of them may vanish 
to him, but his plan remains the same, and in every 
moment of his existence he tears something from 
the outward into his own circle ; and he will con- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 335 

tinue thus to tear unto himself until he has devour- 
ed every thing ; until all matter shall bear the im- 
press of his influence, and all spirits shall form one 
spirit with his spirit. 

Such is man ; such is every one who can say to 
himself : I am man. Should he not then carry 
within him a holy self-reverence, and shudder and 
tremble at his own majesty .-' Such is every one 
who can say to me : I am. Wherever thou mayest 
live, thou, who carryest but a human face ; whether 
thou plantest sugar-cane under the rod of the over- 
seer, as yet scarcely distinguishable from the brute 
creation ; or whether thou warmest thyself on the 
shores of the Fireland at the flame, which thou 
didst not kindle, until it expires, and weepest bit- 
terly because it will not keep burning by itself ; or 
whether thou appearest to me the most miserable 
and degraded villain, thou art, nevertheless, what I 
am ; for thou canst say to me : I am. Thou art, 
nevertheless, my comrade and my brother. Ah ! 
at one time surely I also stood on that step of 
humanity on which thou now standest — for it is a 
step of humanity, and there is no gap in the deve- 
lopment of its members — perhaps without the 
faculty of clear consciousness, perhaps hurrying 
over it so quickly that I ■'had not time to become 
conscious of my condition ; but I certainly stood 
there also at one time — and thou wilt also stand 
certainly at some time, even though it lasted million | 
and million times million years — for what is time .■• ' 
— upon the same step on which I now stand ; and 



336 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

thou wilt surely at some time stand upon a step, 
where I can influence thee and thou me. Thou 
also wilt at some time be drawn into my circle, and 
■wilt draw me into thine. Thee also will I recog- 
nize at some time as my co-laborer in my great 
plan. Such is to me, who am I, every one, who 
is I. Should I not tremble at the majesty in the 
form of man, and at the divinity which resides in 
the temple that bears his impress, though perhaps 
concealed in mysterious darkness .■' 

Earth and heaven and time and space, and all the 
\ limits of materiality, vanish in my sight at this 
thought, and should not the individual vanish "i I 
shall not conduct you back to him. 

All individuals are included in the one great 
unity of pure spirit. Let this be the last word 
with which I recommend myself to your remem- 
brance, and the remembrance to which I recom- 
liiend myself to you. 



RELIGIOUS SIGNIFICANCE 



OF THE 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



29 



TRANSLATOR'S NOTE. 



The following fragments have been appended to this work 
in the hope that they might make more clear certain of its 
results. 

Theywere occasioned by charges preferred against Fichte 
accusing him of teaching atheism. The clear manner in 
which these ragments set forth the religious significance of 
the ! cience of 1 nowledge, determined us to give them this 
place in the present work. 



THE RELIGIOUS SIGNIFICANCE 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



He who wishes to understand my doctrine of 
religion sufficiently to have a competent judgment 
respecting it, must accurately know, and, as I be- 
lieve, possess the system of transcendental idealism, 
and the pure moralism inseparably united there- 
with. 

I say, must possess it, that' is, must occupy the 
transcendental stand-point. For, so far as I have 
been able to observe in my experience, though I 
would not definitely decide upon it, the mere his- 
torical- knowledge of that system is not sufficient. 
For, whenever it is to be concretely applied, it is 
often forgotten, and those who talk about it as the 
only truth, suddenly let go their hold of it, and fall 
back upon the stand-point of realism. 

I also say, he who wishes to understand it so as 
to have a competent judgment respecting it. Stu- 
dents may exercise themselves upon all parts of 
transcendental idealism, and seek to penetrate it 



340 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

from every side ; but unless they have compre- 
hended the complete series of grounds, and finished 
the whole extent of that system, they only under- 
stand it halfways, or historically. Perhaps they 
may be attracted by the system, may not find it so 
very uneven ; but they have no decisive judgment 
respecting it, unless they have fully comprehended 
it in all its parts. 

Add to this the many philosophical presupposi- 
tions from which critics start. Unless the critics 
first agree with us concerning the fundamental 
principles, we can not dispute with each other. It 
is only concerning the deductions that discussions 
may be entered into. 

Was it necessary to remark this with reference 
to a discussion which has arisen concerning a part 
of a system which can not be understood except as 
part of a whole t It seems to me this ought to 
have occurred naturally to all critics. Or is it rea- 
sonable to pass judgment upon this one part, picked 
up out of the whole, without the least knowledge 
of the premises of that one part, or of the termino- 
logy used in its representation, or of the object 
which is determined by the whole only 1 Is it fair 
to place this isolated part into another utterly op- 
posite system, to interpret its language by the 
meaning of that opposite system, and then — to pass 
sentence upon it .' Or is it fair to complain about 
indefiniteness, when the simple meaning of the part 
can not be found, solely because the whole is un- 
known 1 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 34I 

Is it true or not, that the first originators of this 
discussion had never read any tiling from ray pen 
but thart single article ; much less studied my sys- 
tem ? Nay, did they not, in passing judgment upon 
my system, connect it with utterly different sys- 
tems ? Is it, therefore, to be wondered at, that my 
system has been so vastly misrepresented ? But 
whose fault is it ? 

What none of my opponents evidently possesses, 
and yet what alone is decisive in this matter, is a 
knowledge of the true essence and tendency of cri- 
tical or transcendental philosophy. (Both expres- 
sions here mean the same ; for on this point Kant 
and the better Kantians surely agree with me.) I 
must again call to mind this tendency of transcen- 
dental philosophy, and would request the philoso- 
phical public to give me no occasion to do so again. 

There are two very different stand-points of 
thinking, that of natural and ordinary thinking, 
from which objects are immediately thought, and 
that of so-called artificial thinking, from which 
thinking itself is thought, consciously and purpose- 
ly. The former stand-point is occupied by ordinary 
life and science, {materialiter sic dicta ;) the latter 
by transcendental philosophy, which, for that very 
reason, I have called science of knowledge. 

The philosophical systems before Kant did not 
generally recognize their stand-point truly, and thus 
wavered between the two. The system of Wolf 
and Baumgarten, which immediately preceded Kant, 

placed itself with consciousness, on the stand-point 

;d9* 



/ 



342 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

of ordinary thinking, and had no less an object in 
view than to extend the sphere thereof, and to pro- 
duce new objects of their ordinary thinking by the 
power of their syllogisms. 

Now, to this system ours is absolutely opposed in 
this very matter, that ours utterly denies the pos- 
sibility of producing, by mere thinking, an object 
valid for life and for (material) science ; and that 
ours permits nothing to pass for real which is not 
grounded in an internal or external perception. And 
in this respect, that is, in so far as metaphysics 
are to be the system of some real knowledge pro- 
duced by mere thinking, Kant and I utterly deny 
the possibility of a science of metaphysics. Kant 
boasts of having utterly eradicated metaphysics ; 
and since as yet not one sensible and comprehensi- 
ble word has been uttered to save that science, it 
doubtless has been annihilated for all times to 
come. 

Our system is equally explicit in repudiating all 
extension of knowledge through mere thinking ; 
and for its part merely proposes to exhaustively 
represent and comprehend that thinking. In thus 
thinking that ordinary and only real thinking, which 
it proposes to comprehend, our philosophical think- 
ing signifies nothing, and has no content whatever ; 
it is only the thinking, which is thought in it, which 
signifies and has content. Our philosophical think- 
ing is merely the instrument wherewith we con- 
struct our work. When the work is finished, the 
instrument is thrown aside as useless. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 343 

We compose before the eyes of our spectators the 
model of a body from the models of its several 
parts. You interrupt us in the midst of our labors, 
•and cry out : " Look at that skeleton ! Is that a 
body ?" No, my good people, it is not a body, nor 
is it intended to be one ; it is merely to be a skele- 
ton ! It is simply because our teaching can be 
made comprehensible to others alone by thus join- 
ing part to part, that we have undertaken the work. 
If you wait a little, we shall clothe this skeleton 
with vein.s, muscles, and skin. 

Then, when we are done, you cry again : " Why 
don't you let your body move, speak, and its blood 
circulate 1 Why don't you let it live T You are 
again in the wrong. We have never pretended to 
possess this power. Only nature gives life, not art. 
This we know very well, and believe our system 
favorably distinguished from other philosophies by 
knowing it. If we shape any part othervvise than 
it is in nature, or if we add or leave out any part, 
then you have a right to complain. It is to this 
you must see, if you desire understandingly to 
applaud or reprove. 

The living body, which we artistically recon- 
struct, is common, real consciotisness. The gradual 
composition of its parts are our deductions, which 
can only proceed step by step. Before the whole 
system is completed, all our work is but a part 
of it. Of course, the parts to which the last part 
is joined must already be completed, or there would 
. be no method in our art ; but it is not necessary 



344 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

that they should always be repeated, that we should 
put them into every book we write. We very pro- 
perly presuppose a knowledge of those first parts 
from our former writings, for we can not say every 
thing at once. You have only to wait for what may 
follow after this our last part ; unless, indeed, you 
know how to discover it yourself. 

But even when we shall have completed our whole 
work, and thus shall have advanced it to a complete 
representation of all real and common thinking, (we 
have done this in many regions of consciousness — 
in law, morality, etc. ;* but not yet in the region 
of religion,) it will still be, in the manner in which 
it occurs in our philosophy, not itself a real thinking, 
but simply a description and representation of real 
thinking. 

All reality arises for us only through not-philoso- 
phizing, that is, when either men have never ele- 
vated themselves to philosophical abstraction; or 
when men have again suffered themselves to de- 
scend from its height to the mechanism of life, and 
vice versa, this reality vanishes necessarily as soon as 
men rise to pure speculation, because then they 
have torn themselves loose from that mechanism of 
-thinking which reality is based upon. Now, life is 
object ; and speculation is only the means. It is 
not even means to cultivate life, for speculation lies 
in an altogether different world, and life can only be 

* Fichte had already completed a science of rights and science 
of morality ; a science of religion [Philosophy of Religion] he pur- 
posely abstained from for years. — Translator's Note. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 345 

influenced by what arises from out of life. Specu- 
lation is only means to know life. 

That wherein we are bound up, or which we our- 
selves are, can not be known. To know it, we must 
go beyond it, take up a stand-point outside of it. 
This going beyond real life, this outside stand-point 
is speculation. Only in so far as these two stand- 
points are possible, it is possible for man to know 
himself You may live, and perhaps live very 
rationally, without speculating, for you can live 
without knowing life ; but you can not know life 
without speculating. 

In short : the duplicity which extends through- 
out the whole system of reason, and which is 
grounded in the original duplicity of subject and 
object, is here seized in its highest form. Life 
is the totality of the objective rational being ; and 
speculation is the totality of the subjective ratiotial 
being. One is not possible without the other. 
Life, as an active surrendering to a mechanism, is 
not possible without the activity and freedom (other- 
wise speculation) which surrenders itself ; though 
the latter may not arise to the clear consciousness 
of every individual ; and speculation is not possible 
without the life from which it abstracts. Both life 
and speculation are determinable only through each 
other. Life is most properly not-philosophizing ; 
and philosophizing is most properly not-life. This 
is a complete antithesis, and a point of union is 
here quite as impossible as it is to point out the X, 
which is the ground of the subject-object of the 



34^ THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

Ego. The only union is in the consciousnes of the 
true philosopher, that hoth stand-points do exist for 
him. 

No proposition, therefore, of a philosophy which 
knows itself, is, in that form, 2, proposition for real 
life. It is either a step in the system, to proceed 
from it to other propositions ; or, if it is the final 
proposition of speculation concerning some particu- 
lar branch of knowledge, it is a proposition to 
which perception and sensation must first be add- 
ed, as comprehended in it, in order to be fit for use 
in real life. Even the completed system of philo- 
sophy can not give you sensation, nor replace it. 
Sensation is the only true inner principle of life. 
Kant already has stated this often enough, and it is 
the innermost soul of his philosophy. Jacobi, quite 
independent of Kant, nay, believing himself at 
variance with Kant in this, has also stated it often 
enough. So has Mendelssohn. I also have said it 
often enough, and as energetically as possible, ever 
since the first statements of my system were made 
public. 

My opponents can not, therefore, but have heard 
it ; but they can not get accustomed to it. They 
may have gotten hold of it as a historical proposi- 
tion, but not as a rule of their judgments ; for in all 
their judgments they seem to have forgotten it. 
They are the students of a philosophy which gets 
hold of new truths by reasonings ; and hence, when- 
ever they hear a philosophical proposition, they at 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. ZA7 

once look to see what new truth may have been 
reasoned out by it. 

What, then, is the use of philosophy, and what 
need is there of all the subtle preparations of that 
science, when it is confessed that philosophy can 
say nothing new for life, nay, can not even cultivate 
and develop life ; that philosophy is only a science 
of knowledge, not a school for wisdom ? 

It might be sufficient to say, it is at least a pos- 
sible branch of mental culture which should be 
developed, even though it had no other use. Being 
possible, it should also be realized, for man should 
realize all the possibilities of reason. , 

But the chief use of philosophy, as has been fre- » 
quently stated, is negative and critical. What is 
usually called world-wisdom labors not under the 
difficulty of containing too little, but too much. 
The just mentioned teasoned out truths of former 
metaphysics have been carried into that general 
culture and mode of thinking ; whereas they ought 
to have been separated therefrom. Transcendental 
philosophers propose to separate all those reasoned 
out truths from general culture, and to bring back 
that culture to its truly human, and hence, neces- 
sary and ineradicable basis. This was also all 
Kant proposed to do. 

But indirectly, that is, in so far as its knowledge 
unites with the knowledge of life, it has also a 
positive use. Philosophy is pedagogical in the 
widest significance of this word, for the immediate 
practical life. Because this science has to teach 



348 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

US to comprehend the whole man, it shows from 
the highest grounds how men should be cultured, 
in order to make permanent in them moral and 
religious sentiments, and gradually to universalize 
these sentiments. 

For theoretical observation, for the knowledge of 
the sensuous world, that is to say, for natural sci- 
ences, philosophy is regulative, showing what we 
must inquire of nature, and how we have to ques- 
tion her. But its influence on the sentiments of 
mankind in general consists chiefly in this, that it 
brings power, courage, and self-confidence in man, 
by showing him that he and his whole fate depend 
solely upon himself, or by placing him on his own 
feet. 

And thus a philosophy of religion is by no means 
the doctrine of religion, still less is it to replace 
religious sentiment ; it is simply the theory of reli- 
gion, and its object here is also both critical and 
pedagogical. It proposes to abolish incomprehensi- 
ble, useless,and confusing doctrines about God, which 
by those very qualities afford a target for irreligi- 
ousness. These it abolishes by showing that they 
are nothing, and that none of them fit the human 
mind. It likewise shows how in the human heart 
religiousness is generated and developed, and thus 
how mankind can be educated to be religious ; not 
by means of philosophy, which does not influence 
life, but only teaches a knowledge of it, but by awak- 
ening the true supersensual motive-powers of life. 

The tendency of a philosophical system of reli- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 349 

gion can, therefore, not be correctly apprehended 
until it is completed, until it is an exhaustive pic- 
ture of the whole sphere of human reason. Only 
then can it begin to be pedagogical. 

I have begun a philosophy of religion* in the 
above meaning of the word, and in no other. But 
I have not completed that philosophy, having only 
laid down its basis. To thus complete it will now 
be my earnest labor, and I hope soon to be able to 
satisfy the public concerning it. 

I said above : Transcendental philosophy proposes 
to systematically represent the real general know- 
ledge, but it admits as valid only knowledge found- 
ed upon perception — -rejecting all knowledge pro- 
duced by argumentation. The reality of its know- 
ledge that philosophy, therefore, always derives 
from perception ; but in so far as it must compre- 
hend the necessity and show the deductions of this 
knowledge, it does not appeal to facts ; for, if it did, 
it would cease to be transcendental philosophy. 

Hence, that philosophy can never come into dis^ 
pute with common, natural consciousness, since it 
does not touch that consciousness at all, but moves 
in an utterly different world. It is only at variance 
with a new philosophy which pretends to think out 
new facts ; and hence, whatsoever transcendental 
philosophy may contradict, belongs, since it is not 
to be found in a system of universal reason, to that 
new philosophy. 

* Alluding to the article : " Concerning the Ground of our Faith 
in a Divine World-Government." 

30 



350 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

Now, my philosophy of religion is at variance 
with that new philosophy, partly concerning the 
origin of religion, which the former holds to be in 
a sentiment, the latter to be produced by argument ; 
partly concerning the extent and content of reli- 
gion, which the latter holds to consist of know- 
ledges and doctrines, whilst I hold no such thing. 

A great portion of our theology is such very phi- 
losophy, and a great portion of our religious educa- 
tional books (catechisms, hymn-books, etc.) is 
theology. Hence, I am in conflict with these books, 
as far as they are theology — not so far as they are 
religion ; in other words, so far as their theoretical 
content is concerned ; the deduction whereof those 
books happily rarely attempt. My philosophy of 
religion can, therefore, also enter into no conflict 
with the religious feelings of man in common life, 
occupying, as it does, an utterly difierent sphere. 
Still, the pedagogical results of my philosophy might 
lead to such a conflict ; but in that case they must 
first appear, and as yet they have not been estab- 
lished by me. 

It is, therefore, absolutely irrational to judge of 
my system as a system of world-wisdom, and to 
attack it with world-wisdom. And yet most of my 
opponents have done this. 

Amongst this may be classified all that has been 
said concerning a Fichteian God, a Jacobian God, 
a Spinoza God, etc. Fichte, Jacobi, and Spinoza 
are something different from their philosophy. The 
philosopher has no God at all, and can have none ; 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 35 1 

he can only have a conception of the conception or 
of the idea of God. God and rehgion are only in 
life ; but the philosopher as such is not the whole 
complete man, but is man in a condition of abstrac- 
tion ; and it is impossible that any one should be 
only philosopher. Whatsoever is posited through 
reason is absolutely the same for all rational beings. 
Religion and belief in God is thus posited through 
reason, and hence is posited in the same manner 
for all. rational beings. In this respect there are 
absolutely no many religions, no many Gods ; but 
there is simply one God. Only that in the concep- 
tion of God, which all must admit and agree to, is 
the true ; but that in their conception of God, (not 
the conception of the conception of God,) respect^ 
ing which they, disagree, is necessarily false. All 
are wrong in regard to those points, for the very 
reason that the points can be disputed. That which 
can thus be controverted has been derived through 
argumentation by a false philosophy, or has been 
memorized from a catechism based on a false phi- 
losophy. True religiousness says nothing about it. 
Amongst this may also be classified the attempt 
to oppose my philosophy to Christianity, and to / 
refute the one by the other. True, it has hereto- 
fore always been customary for the philosopher to 
make Christianity harmonize with his philosophy, 
and for the Christian to make his faith agree with 
his philosophical thinking ; but this only proves 
that the men who undertook to do this knew neither 
philosophy nor Christianity. Our philosophy does 



352 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

not dream of such a thing. Christianity is wisdom 
of life, is popular philosophy in the true and highest 
sense of the word ; and can not be any thing else 
without losing its rank and sinking down into the 
sphere of argumentation, and thereby admitting 
the validity of demonstration, and hence exposing 
itself to the dispute of philosophical systems. With 
Christianity as such original wisdom of life, our 
philosophy can not enter into a conflict ; for our 
philosophy is only theory of that wisdom.- Only 
the results of our philosophy might come into con- 
flict with the results of Christianity ; but let me ask, 
where are these results, and, I might add, where is 
true Christianity ? Has it not in all cases, where it 
■reaches us, passed through the crucible of that 
arguriientative understanding t 

Again, it is charged that, according to my system, 
God is not to be the Creator and Governor of the 
world, that my system discards a divine Providence ! 
Why, you dear, good unphilosophers ! For you 
the whole distinction, the whole opposition whereby 
one philosophical system asserts this and another 
denies it, does not at all exist. If you are really 
good and religious, continue to take it in the sense 
in which it is true. I was not addressing you at all, 
but was speaking to philosophers, who may be as- 
sumed to know that distinction, and who yet take 
those dogmas in the sense in which they are not true. 
I only wanted to contradict them ; and they, at least, 
ought to have understood me. Wait yet awhile, 
and I shall get to the other side, and show the 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 3S3 

purely religious significance of these doctrines. 
And then I shall show that you are correct, and 
that I never was quarreling with you. 

In short : my philosophy of religion can only be 
judged, disputed, or confirmed from a transcenden- 
tal point of view. Let that reader who does not 
even yet know what the transcendental point of 
view is be convinced, at least, that he ought not to 
take part in the dispute. 

Most assuredly is religion a proper concern for 
all men, and every one may properly speak and 
argue about it. It is the destination of man to 
come to an agreement on this, the final object of 
reason. But a philosophy of religion is not reli- 
gion, and is not written for all men, and for the 
criticisms of all men. Religion itself is living and 
powerful ; the theory of religion is dead in itself 
Religion fills us with feelings and sentiments ; the 
theory of religion only speaks of them ; it neither 
destroys them nor seeks to create new ones. 

The true seat of the misunderstanding of my 
philosophy, and of it's controversy with ojiposite 
doctrines, which are more or less conscious of this 
opposition, is concerning the relation of cognition 
to actual life. The opposite systems make cogni- 
tion the principle of life ; and believe that by a free, 
arbitrary thinking they can generate certain know- 
ledges and conceptions, and implant them in men 
by argumentation, by which conceptions they be- 
lieve feelings may be produced, desires excited, 
and thus the activity of man determined, Jience, 

30* 



354 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

they hold cognition to be the higher, and life the 
Mower, utterly dependent upon cognition. But my 
''^philosophy holds precisely the reverse. It makes 
life, the system of feelings and of desire, the high- 
est, and allows to cognition only a looking on of 
their working. This system of feelings is through- 
out determined in consciousness, and involves an 
immediate cognition, not derived from conclusions 
or from a free argumentation. Only this immediate 
cognition has reality, and is, therefore, alone the 
^moving principle of life, being itself generated in 
life. Hence, when the reality of a cognition is to 
be proven through philosophy or through argumen- 
tation, ^i feeling must first be shown up — I shall call 
it feeling for the present, until I more definitely 
account for the use of this word — ^with which this 
cognition immediately connects. Free argumenta- 
tion can only penetrate and sift the contents of this 
feeling, separate and connect the manifold of it, 
and thus facilitate the use of it, and bring it under 
the power of consciousness ; but argumentation 
can not increase that content, can not extend or 
change its sphere. Our cognition is given us at 
once, for all eternity ; and hence we can in all eter- 
nity only develop it as it is. Only the immediate 
is true ; the mediated is only true in so far as it is 
grounded in the immediate ; beyond it lies the 
sphere of chimeras and dreams. 

Now, one of the latest defenders of that opposite 
system, Mr. Eberhard, asks me : " Are not moral 
feelings dependent upon the culture of reason T 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 355 

As if there were but one answer to his question, 
and as if I could not but admit it ! It would need 
more space than I can spare now to show up all the 
errors which are involved in that simple and plau- 
sibly sounding sentence. But let me ask : What 
does it mean to make feelings dependent upon the 
culture of reason ? It means that you want to pro- 
duce the above immediate through argumentation, 
to force upon others and yourself through syllo- 
gisms what neither you nor the others originally 
feel or possess. Well, try and make yourself and 
others weep and laugh through syllogisms as much 
as you please. 

I, therefore, reply to his question, and adopt- 
ing his meaning of the word "reason," by no 
means ! That reason of which you speak is theo- 
retical reason, is the power of cognition ! But this 
reason says only that and how something be ; but 
says nothing of an activity, and of a shall, which 
determines that activity. (Nothing of a conscience 
which tells you : You shall do this or that ! — -Trans- 
lator.) 

Mr. E. proceeds : " Why are moral feelings coarse 
in the uncultured man, and in the cultured and 
educated man correct, fine, and extensive .'' Is it 
not because the former is empty of conceptions, 
and the latter rich in correct, clear, and effective 
conceptions .■"" 

Tell me, what does this mean — coarse* feelings } 
Mr. E. will please pardon me. But according to 
* Original : Rau, (raw.) 



3S6 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

my conceptions of feeling, the adjective coarse can 
not be applied to feeling in any manner ; and until 
I have the connection explained, I can not well dis- 
cuss this part of the subject. 

" They are correct in the cultured man !" Here I 
can at least suppose what Mr. E. means. Thejudg-- 
ment concerning an object of morality may be cor- 
rect or incorrect, but by no means the moral feeling 
itself, which as a feeling is an absolute simple, and 
expresses no relation whatever. But what, then, is 
the criterion of the correctness of a judgment .'' 
Perhaps a logical criterion, derived from former 
premises .' It may be that Mr. E. so conceives it. 
But what, then, is the original premise .'' Also a 
logical one .? I have not time here to point out all 
the absurdities. 

His feeling is, moreover, " fine." Now, in popu- 
lar language, one may well say of a man : His 
moral tact is fine, that is, he has acquired a facility 
of quickly and correctly judging moral matters ; but 
it can never be used as signifying : The original 
and true moral feeling (which, being absolute, can 
not be increased nor diminished, and which only 
says, this shall be, or this shall not be !) may be 
raised to a higher degree of perfection. But this 
facility of judgment, is it acquired from life or from 
idle speculation, and is its criterion a theoretical 
principle, discovered through argumentation .' I 
suppose "Mr. E. will say yes ; but I do not say 
yes, from reasons which every one will find in my 
Science of Morality. 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 3S7 

Feeling is, moreover, to be extensive. Now, 
moral feeling extends to all men equally, and is 
directed upon all objects of free activity. The man 
of theoretical culture — for we only speak of such a 
culture, and not of practical culture through the 
cultivation of virtue — differs in this respect from 
the uncultured man only in the extent of his sphere 
of action, but not as such, not in intensity of moral 
feeling or strength of moral will, unless, indeed, 
Mr. E. should prove that theoretical culture can pro- 
duce and increase moral will. It is true this would 
be the result of his premises, but we hesitate to 
hold him responsible for such an assertion, until he 
confesses it expressly. 

Mr. E. proceeds : " Why have the horrors of su- 
perstition disfigured the doctrine of morality T If 
he really means what he says, his question implies : 
Why do wrong conclusions follow from wrong pre- 
niises "i But if he means to say : Why have those 
horrors disfigured morality ? then I ask him again : 
Why has superstition darkened and sullied the con- 
ception of God, which sullied conception could not 
but influence moral judgment, not morality itself 1 
And I answer : Undoubtedly by virtue of a false 
theoretical argument concerning that conception of 
God! 

Hence, if a weak-minded, superstitious, religious 
fanatic should assist in burning a heretic, and ap- 
peal to his moral feelings for justification, ought 
we not to restore those moral feelings, or those 
original conceptions, and free them from the wrong 



3S8 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

direction given to them by false argumentation? 
Moral feeling (conscience) is correct, and can never 
be otherwise than correct, if not led astray by ar- 
gumentation. Or does Mr. E. seriously mean to 
say that there is a variety of moral feelings for dif- 
ferent individuals, and that amongst these there is, 
for instance, one which incites to the burning of 
heretics .■' 

Now, what is that feeling upon which our faith 
in a Divinity is grounded and shown up as real } 

Let me first make a distinction of the word feel- 
ing. Feeling is either sensuous — feeling of a bitter, 
red, hard, cold, etc. — or it is intellectual. Mr. E., 
and all the philosophers of his school, seem utterly 
to ignore the latter class, and to be unaware that 
without the latter class consciousness can not be 
made comprehensible. 

Now, in these pages I am not speaking of sen- 
suous, but of intellectual feeling. It is the imme- 
diate feeling of the certainty and necessity of a 
thinking. Truth is certainty. Now, how do the 
philosophers of the opposite school believe, to know 
that they are certain in a particular case .-' By the 
general, theoretical insight that their thinking 
agrees with the laws of logic .' But this theoreti- 
cal insight is itself only a certainty of a higher de- 
gree ; how can they be certain that they do not err 
in their certainty of that agreeing } By another still 
higher theoretical insight } But whence do they 
get that ? And so on ad infinitum. It is just as 
impossible to obtain certainty in this manner, as it! 



THF SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 359 

is impossible to explain the feeling of certainty. 
Moreover, is that certainty an objective or a sub- 
jective condition ? And how can I perceive such 
a condition except through an absolutely primary 
immediate feeling ? 

But what is this feeling ? It is clear that this 
feeling only accompanies my thinking, and does not 
enter without a thinking and without a particular 
content of that thinking. How could it have, in- 
deed, such a content or a truth in itself .■• 

It is, therefore, evident that, if the feeling of cer- 
tainty is inseparable from a thinking and from the 
content thereof, and if this thinking contains in 
itself the condition of all mediated certainty or 
rationality, all men must agree as to this feeling. 
It is to be presupposed in every human being, 
though you might, perhaps, only make a person 
conscious of it, and not make him acknowledge it 
theoretically ; as, indeed, is impossible, seeing that 
it is an immediate. 

This feeling is, therefore, not only intellectual ' 
feeling in general, but it is the first and most ori- 
ginal intellectual feeling and ground of all certainty, 
of all reality, and of all objectivity. 

It accompanies the thinking, that in the realiza- 
tion of the absolute object proposed for us by our 
moral nature, namely, absolute self-determination 
of reason, there is a steady progress possible ; and 
that the condition of this progress is. the absolute 
fulfillment of our duty in every position of life, 
solely for duty's sake. (The absolute obedience to 



360 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

the voice of conscience, or to the voice of absolute 
reason, or to the voice of God. — Translator.) 
And this feeHng of certainty accompanies such 
thinking necessarily, being itself an integral part of 
that object proposed for us ; it is, moreover, inse- 
parable from the consciousness that we must pro- 
pose that object to ourselves ; in fact, it is in truth 
only the immediate expression of this conscious- 
ness. 

Let us analyze further what this may involve : 
I think : it is possible that reason does constantly 
approach and get nearer its ultimate obje'ct. This 
might, perhaps, be regarded as an arbitrary think- 
ing, a mere problematical positing, which has no 
other advantage than its own possibility. But as 
such it must not be viewed. This thinking shows 
itself up to be, in a certain connection, as a neces- 
sary thinking, without which consciousness would 
not be possible ; and hence, that which results from 
this thinking by logical necessity, that is, by media- 
tion, is equally necessary. 

Now, if I posit in my acting an object, then I 
also posit that object as realized in some future 
time. This is a necessary, logical sequence. But, 
viewing the matter simply in its logical sequence, I 
might as well turn that sentence around and re- 
verse its relation. This has often been done in the 
following statement : it shall and can not propose to 
myself the final object of morality, unless I am 
already convinced that it can be realized in some 
future time. But then, again, I might say, I can 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 36 1 

not be convinced that it is capable of being realized 
unless I first simply propose it to myself. But 
why shall I propose it to myself at all ? 

In short, in the mere logical relation each is cer- 
tain only under condition, and not in itself. Each 
link refers us to the other, but the orginal certainty 
of that consciousness is not explained. 

This certainty can, therefore, only live in the im- 
mediateness of a feeling, and in this feeling these 
two links are originally one in this manner : I shall 
absolutely posit that moral object for myself, and 
shall consider it as possible of realization ; I shall 
consider it possible of realization, and hence posit 
it. Neither is, in truth, the sequence of the othei, 
but both are one. It is one thought, not two 
thoughts ; and it is true and certain, not by virtue 
of a thinking which draws that conclusion, but by 
virtue of a necessity which I only feel. 

Since, therefore, certainty is only immediate and 
feelable, it can not be demonstrated to any one, but 
can certainly be presupposed in every one, since 
those who have it, and who, moreover, reflect con- 
cerning the connection of human knowledge, must 
recognize that every other knowledge is only 
grounded upon it, and that every one, who knows 
any thing with certainty, has started from that 
knowledge, although, perhaps, unconsciously. 

Remark "this : you do not require any one to 
produce this knowledge, but simply to find it in 
himself. Every mediated certainty presupposes an 
original certainty. In the consciousness of every 

31 



v^ 



362 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

one, who is convinced of any thing at all, that cer- 
tainty exists also ; and every one can arise to that 
certainty from any conditioned and mediated know- 
ledge. 

I may here allude to another misunderstanding 
of my system. It is charged that, in my system, 
faith in God exists only for the moral, not for the 
immoral man. This is very correct when it means 
that faith is true only for man, in so far as he is 
moral ; but not when it is interpreted that 'faith 
exists only for those men who are moral. 

For where, then, is the personified, absolute im- 
morality .'' It is an impossibility. Man can only be, 
and be self-conscious, in so far as he stands on the 
field of reason. Without any morality man is but 
an animal, but a product of organization, even in 
his theoretical knowledge. 

This, then, is our result : Absolute certainty and 
conviction (not mere meaning, opinioning, and 
wishing) of the possibility — not to determine one's 
self, that is, one's will by the conception of duty, 
for this we recognize as possible by doing it, but — to 
ptomote the object of reason by thus determining our 
will through the conviction of duty, even beyond 
OUR WILL, is the immediate of religion, and is ground- 
ed in the soul of man in the manner we have shozvn. 

Here I must insert a remark concerning the use 
of language which I can no longer postpone with- 
out making myself ambiguous, and exposing myself 
again to old objections. 

The word being signifies always immediately an 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 363 

object of thinking, a thought. Now, either to this /f { 
word is also appUed the predicate of an existence, 
a permanent and lasting, in sensuous perception 
outside of thinking, and in that case it signifies real 
being, and when applied to an object means, that 
object is — or to that word is applied no other predi- 
cate of being, but its thinking — and, in that case, 
the significance of such being is purely logical ; 
and the word is only signifies the logical copula in 
which the manifold of predicates is fixed by think- 
ing in a unity of the logical subject. In that case, 
you can not say of an object "it is" but it is to be 
thought as this or that. There are further distinc- 
tions to be made here, of which I shall speak after- 
ward. 

There are other words related to the expression 
" being," which have also these two significations : 
The word "principle," for instance, which I have 
used, signifies, in a system of real being, a first, 
from which I can calculate a second and third, even 
without sensuous perception and with categorical 
certainty, thereby anticipating experience. But in 
this sense of the word the intelligible principle, 
freedom, is never principle of a real cognition, is 
never ground of an explanation and anticipation, 
that is, you can not foresee what will become actual 
through freedom. We only know through percep- 
tion what is actual ; and for the very reason that 
we do not recognize the product of freedom as a 
link of a comprehensible chain of causes and ef- 
fects — it being an absolute first, and partially cog- 



364 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

nizable only in perception — do we say, freedom is 
a principle. Not principle in the actual sense, as 
ground of an immediate and necessary factical de- 
terminedness, but in the logical sense, as principle 
of possibilities. 

It is the same with the word law. In the sen- 
suous world law signifies that determination of 
power from which, as principle, the consequences 
can be deduced in the manner just stated. But 
when applied to the finite beings — who are free in 
the empirical sense of the word, that is, who are 
thought as simply determinable, and not deter- 
mined — the word law means a shall, a categorical 
imperative, that is, a determinedness of freedom 
through freedom, and, therefore, no mechanical, no 
immediate determinedness. But when applied to 
the infinite, or to reason, /car' k^oxf^v — to which the 
empirical freedom just now mentioned can not be 
ascribed, as itself the result of finity — the word law 
signifies simply the necessity to always expect 
from that reason a determined content, determined 
(not materialiter, for in so far it is absolutely un- 
known to us, and, a priori, not to be deduced, but) 
formaliter, or determined through its object, the ul- 
timate object of reason — to expect from it always an 
infinite, inexhaustible content of freedom for all ra- 
tional individuals;* although no existing deter- 

* Or, in other words, the necessity to expect from infinite reason 
that it should ever manifest itself in the conscience of all individuals, 
and thus render them free, moral beings, or at least furnish them 
the content of that freedom. — Translator's Note, 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 365 

minedness can be shown up from which it might 
mechanically result, since we are here not in the 
sphere of the objective, but at the absolute ideal 
source of spirit. The word law has, therefore, here 
also no actual significance from which external and 
necessary results might be derived, but only logical 
significance, as gathering together that infinite con- 
tent of freedom of the individuals into one concep- 
tion. 

It is the same with the word world. In its ac- 
tual significance it means a finished whole of exist- 
ing objects, in a reciprocal determination of their 
being, each of which being what it is, because all 
others are what they are, and vice versa ; a whole, 
wherein, with a perfect knowledge of the laws of 
the world, we could determine the nature of each 
particular from that of all others. When applied 
to rational beings, that word signifies also, it is true, 
a totality, an influence of all upon each one, and of 
each one upon all ; but not an influence which can 
be determined in advance, as it can be in nature, 
because in the world of rational beings this in- 
fluence has its ground in being. Hence, the word 
world has here also only a logical, not an actual, 
significance. 

The expr-ession, order of a supersensuous world, 
has also been used ; nay, I have often used it my- 
self But this expression is misapprehended, when 
it is understood as if the supersensuous world we7'e 
before it had order, and as if order were thus but 
an accidence of that world. On the contrary, that 

world only becomes a world by being ordered. 
31* 



366 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

Hence, whenever the purely intelligible is spoken 
of, all these and similar conceptions, that is, all 
conceptions which are derived from being and 
only determine it further, are used only in their 
logical, not in their actual significance. 

I state this to put an end to a reproof frequently 
made, that I make use of the same words which I 
condemn in others ; but I must use them to make 
myself understood, and I must take them from lan- 
guage in their accepted significance. But I use 
them in another sense than my opponent uses 
them, as ought to be evident from the deduction 
of the conceptions which they designate. 

In stating our final result, we have stated the 
manner in which only the philosopher views reli- 
gion ; not exactly as a transcendental philosopher, 
but generally as an abstract thinker, precisely as 
he seizes also the conceptions of duty, morality, 
etc., only in their abstraction. The command of 
duty can never appear in its generality to man in 
actual life, but only in concrete determinations of 
the will. In so far as a man truly and always de- 
termines his will by that command of duty, (con- 
science,) he is a moral man, and acts morally. 

In the same way religion never appears to man 
in actual life in general, but only in so far as in 
each special case, when he determines his will by 
conscience, he is firmly convinced (and this convic- 
tion is a result of that determination) that what he 
so wills and does is also outside of his individual 
will, absolute object of universal reason ; that it 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 367 

• 

will occur and must occur simply because it is in- 
volved in that absolute object of reason, and that 
his individual will, in determining itself by the 
command of duty, is but the tool of that absolute 
object. Only in having this conviction is man re- 
ligious. Hence the man who, in all the conditions 
of his life, acts and thinks in so acting, " I there- 
by promote that which shall be, that is, the abso- 
lute object of reason," is a perfectly virtuous and re- 
ligious man, even though he might stop at that 
simple thought and never combine the manifold of 
what shall be iijto the unity of absolute reason. 

But even the ordinary acting of life compels 
men to unite the similar of their experience, and 
thus to shape general rules out of general concep- 
tions. As soon as this is done in any region of 
knowledge, it is done in all its regions, and hence 
certainly in the region of religion and morality, if 
morality and religion are dear to men. 

But it is not necessary that they should rise 
to the highest abstraction, to a conception which 
unites all others of the same kind, and from the 
unity of which all others may be derived ; for this 
would require a systematic, philosophical thinking. 
As a general rule, men are content to reduce the 
manifold to several forms and fundamental concep- 
tions. 

The basis of religious faith was the conviction 
of an order or a law, by virtue of which from obe- 
dience to the command of duty must certainly re- 
sult the absolute object of reason, and hence the 



368 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

actual attainment and realization of' which each in- 
dividual in his moral acts can but strive to attain. 

Let us analyze what is contained in this convic- 
tion : Firstly, that which exclusively and abso- 
lutely depends upon my own will, namely, to. deter- 
mine it by the voice of duty. Secondly, the reli- 
gious faith that in thus determining my will some- 
thing is achieved which lies beyond the province 
of my individual moral will. 

The second is connected with the first by reli- 
gious" faith. The moral sentiment is completed in 
the first, but we shall soon see that it can only 
arrive at a rational and confident assertion in the 
second ; and that thus morality can only be confi- 
dently realized in religion. It is therefore an un- 
just reproach to say that our theory utterly cancels 
religion and leaves it but its name, replacing it by 
morality. 

Indeed, I can not will, except, by the law of my 
finity, (I must always will a determined, limited 
somewhat,) that is, except I divide my in itself in- 
finite will into a series of finite will-determinations. 
Hence, in the demand that I should will as duty 
commands, is also involved the demand that I 
should will a determined somewhat. That this de- 
termining of the will through the voice of conscience 
(not through argumentation as regarding the possi- 
ble result of my will) can never deceive is known 
through faith, is known immediately, not medi- 
ately, through argumentation. Here, therefore, is 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 369 

the first connecting link between pure morality 
and religion. 

From that determination of the will an act re- 
sults, and from this act, again, other consequences 
result in the world of rational beings ; for I see 
only this world, the sensuous world being simply a 
means for me — consequences which I can neither 
foresee nor calculate. In fact, these consequences 
are no longer in my control, and yet I have faith 
that they are good and conformable to the absolute 
object of reason. And this faith I hold with the 
same original certainty which impelled me to the 
first act ; nay, I could even not act unless this 
faith always accompanied me. Now, this is reli- 
gion. I believe in a principle by virtue of which 
every determination of the will through duty as- 
suredly effects the promotion of the object of rea- 
son in the universal connection of things. But 
this principle is utterly incomprehensible in regard 
to the mode and manner of its working ; and yet 
it is absolutely posited with the same originality 
of faith which pertains to the voice of conscience. 
Both are not one, but both are absolutely insepa- 
rable. 

Let us proceed with our analysis. The deter- 
mination of the will is always only the present, and 
contains what depends upon us alone. But for its 
own possibility it is at the same time accompanied 
by the presupposition of a something past, and by 
the postulate, that a future something, modified by 
it, will be its result. 



37° THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

It is accompanied by a presupposition. Not the 
fact that I have a duty by which to determine my 
will, for that is the result of pure reason ; but the 
fact that I have this determined duty as mine is 
the result of my position in the whole world of 
reason. Did I not exist or were I another, which, 
of course, is an absurdity, or were I existing in an- 
other community of rational beings, then such a 
determined duty would not enter at all as mine. 
But, occupying the position I do, I am bound to act 
according to the voice of my conscience ; and this 
I can not do without presupposing at the same 
time that this very position of mine is taken into 
the account of the ultimate object of reason, and is 
the result of the causality of that absolute prin- 
ciple. Hence, the faith in my conscience involves 
also the faith that the world of reason, which must 
be presupposed for the acts of all individuals, is 
equally produced and ordered by that principle. 
Expressing this popularly, or illustrating it by the 
analogies of our finite consciousness, it means : the 
world of reason is created, maintained, and governed 
by that absolute principle. It is accompanied by 
a postulate, that is, by the postulate of a future 
something, which is the continued causality of that 
determination of our will to promote the final ob- 
ject of reason, and hence the maintenance and 
equable development of all rational beings in the 
identity of their self-consciousness ; everlasting 
progress of all toward the ultimate object of rea- 
son. All rational beings must, therefore, be main- 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. S/I 

tained in their eternal existence, and their fates 
directed toward blessedness, that is, toward their 
liberation through pure morality. 

It is clear that we here think only acts, events, a 
flow of action, but no being, no dead permanency ; 
a creating, maintaining, governing, but by no 
means a creator, maintainer, governor. The faith 
we have spoken of does not enter upon these theo- 
retical questions. It rests upon its own basis with 
firm conviction, and there is not the least ground 
for going beyond it. 

The confession of faith now reads as follows : I, 
and all rational beings, and our relations to each 
other, in so far as we do distinguish ourselves, are 
created by a free and intelligent principle, which 
maintains them and leads them toward an ultimate 
object ; and whatsoever does not depend upon our 
action to realize that object is done without our in- 
terference by that world-governing principle itself 

Still, the principle of which those many predi- 
cates are asserted is to be but one. I can not, by 
the laws of my thinking, proceed from one of these 
predicates to the other, without presupposing a 
permanent substrate to which these predicates be- 
long, or without generating that substrate by this 
my very thinking. I do not, however, look upon 
this substrate as my production, for the simple rea- 
son that I produce it necessarily by virtue of the 
laws of my thinking. Now, this thinking of the 
one principle which unites the manifoldness and 
the distinction of the predicates is itself the perma- 



372 THE 'SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

nent ; and hence, we have in the one act two deter- 
minations which always accompany each other as 
opposites, but each of which is only through the 
other, and which only in this opposition form the 
act of thinking ; namely, one thinking which is al- 
ways the same, that of the unity of the principle ; 
and one flowing and changeable thinking, that 
which proceeds from the one predicate of the prin- 
ciple to its other predicates. These predicates have 
arisen in me immediately together with my moral 
resolve, and with the original certainty which ac- 
companies that resolve. But the oneness of the 
principle arises in me only when, by abstracting 
from that moral requirement which contents itself 
with the certainty of the predicates, I proceed to 
reflect upon the separation of those predicates from 
their moral relation. 

The oneness I get merely by mediation ; the pre- 
dicates themselves I have immediately. 

The only fitting parallel to that immediateness 
and mediating thinking is furnished by the think- 
ing of our soul, (mind, or what you will call it.) 
My feeling, desires, thinking, willing, etc., I know 
of immediately by accomplishing those acts. They 
come into my consciousness by no act of media- 
tion, but only by my positing them, by my being 
in them ; they are the immediate kot' Ikoxh^. So 
long as I remain in this consciousness, as I am 
'wholly practical, wholly life and deed, I only know 
my feeling, desiring, willing, etc., as they occur one 
after the other, but I do not expressly know myself 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 373 

as the unity and as the principle of these various 
determinations. It is only when I elevate myself 
above the reality of these distinctive acts, and, ab- 
stracting from their difference, gather them together 
in me only in their commonness, that the con- 
sciousness of the unity arises in me as the principle 
of these manifold determinations ; and this product 
of our abstracting and comprehending thinking is 
what we call our soul, mind, etc. 

Now, if I am but ripe for that abstraction, that 
is, if I take it from out myself, and do not accept it 
traditionally, then that one principle can only be 
thought as a for itself existing and working prin- 
ciple, but not as a mere quality or predicate, inhe- 
rent to some substance or another. It will, there- 
fore, have to be described not as spirituality per- 
taining to some substance, which, being not spirit 
itself, could thus only be thought as matter, but as 
fure spirit ; not as a substantiated world-soul, but 
as a pure, for itself existing being ; not as a creat- 
ing, maintaining, and governing, but as creator, 
maintainer, and governor. And this very properly 
and in accordance with the laws of our thinking, if - 
we are once resolved to rise from the immediate- 
ness of life and activity to the field of theoretical 
abstraction. 

Let it not be forgotten both conceptions have 
arisen only through -thinking and through an ab- 
stract, not through a necessary or concrete, think- 
ing. They are, therefore, not related to perception, 

32 



374 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



but are only logical subject. They are by no means 
real subject, or substance. 

Only the predicates of both conceptions occur in 
perception, and hence contain a necessary, real 
thinking, that is, in sensuous perception various 
predicates occur in a sensuous, objective connec- 
tion ; and in this respect it may be said that the 
subject or substrate of these sensuous predicates 
belongs to the realm of real thinking. But this 
can not be said with reference to those supersen- 
suous subjects, the soul or the creative spiritual 
principle. 

What, then, may these conceptions involve ? 
Evidently nothing but the predicates of the percep- 
tion, from which they have arisen by an abstracting 
thinking. Thy soul is nothing but thy thinking, 
feeling, etc. God is nothing but the creating, gov- 
erning, etc. 

You may draw conclusions from the conception 
of the real substance, but never from that of the 
logical subject. Through the former our knowledge 
may be expanded, not through the latter. If some- 
thing is real substance, it comes under the condi- 
tions of sensuous perception ; is somewhere and at 
some time, is accompanied by sensuous predicates. 
But none of these determinations can be applied 
to these conceptions. 

Even the conception of pure spirit can not assist 
in such further conclusions. Even the determina- 
tions, borrowed from our soul, do not suit that con- 
ception. We ascribe them to our soul, not through 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 375 

mediating thinking, but through immediate con- 
sciousness. But concerning God immediate (mo- 
ral) consciousness says only what has been stated. 
And to draw conclusions from this beyond it, we 
have no ground, and there is no possibility to do it. 

What I have here stated is transcendental philo- 
sophy, not life-philosophy. From it the regula- 
tives for the construction of a life-wisdom must first 
be deduced. Only that which proceeds from life 
has a retroactive effect on life — mode of thinking, 
of acting, etc. Life gives birth only to the imme- 
diate faith I have mentioned ; but not to the logi- 
cal subject, and its erroneous further determina- 
tions. 

That immediate faith is, therefore, to be pre- 
eminently cultivated, and held as the main thing. 
The logical part will come of itself, and is correct, 
proper, and not dangerous only in so far as it thus 
forms itself of itself. That faith, however, is not to 
be cultivated by argumentation, but by practice in 
life and moral development. 

Only through the culture of this immediate faith 
do men arise to religious faith, though they may 
not know it ; for it alone is the true and univer- 
sally valid origin of the religious faith. This, of 
course, is only proved by the investigations of a 
thorough transcendental philosophy. 

The pedagogical rules for a religious education 
of the people are, therefore, as follows : 



376 THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

Religious culture can not be begun by teaching 
religion ; for religion without morality is utterly 
incomprehensible ; and, since people try at least to 
comprehend it, leads to superstition. / It can only 
begin in a culture of the heart, and ingrafting in it 
pure virtue and morality. J 

Through virtuous sentiments religion creates it- 
self ; and all the teacher needs to do is to call atten- 
tion to this faith of religion, which accompanies all 
moral consciousness, and neither needs proof, nor 
is capable of proof, because it announces itself as 
the most original part of our being. Religious cul- 
ture, indeed, must not be regarded as something 
which is to be placed into a man — for whatever 
thereof you place into him is surely false — but as 
something, which is already in him, and needs only 
to be developed, of which he is only to be re- 
minded. 

Hence, there is to be no teaching of religion at 
all, but merely a developing of that original, reli- 
gious consciousness. 

But least of all should such teaching begin with 
pretended doctrines of the existence of God. We 
are only immediately aware of his relations to us, 
and you must begin with these. The " existence " 
will then come of itself, and will be truly believed 
only when it has thus developed itself 

Nor is the being of God to be determined, cha- 
racterized, and its specific mode of existence to be 
pointed out ; for this our thinking can not do, as 
we have abundantly shown. |_We are only to speak 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 377 

of his acts, and to vivify, strengthen, and keep in 
consciousness always the faith in them.^ The con- 
ception of God can not be determined by categories of 
existence, but only by predicates of an activity. 



32* 



